Part 1 contains Ch 1-60
Time for Part 2

------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------

Ch 61: Utopia Planets by Gentle Small Dreams

[Scene: Planet Evoir – Chronoscene Reflector Room]

Alolan Ninetales stood quietly before the shimmering Chronoscene Reflector, the folds of her pale blue sundress motionless in the still chamber. Her timeless expression bore the patience only a Hourai-blessed immortal could possess.

Projected before her was a real-time view of Neo-Earth, a restless human world, buzzing with ambition and desperation.

Countless mortals, their lifespans brief, continued to point their eyes and rockets toward unreachable galaxies. Futile dreams.

“They'll never make it in their lifetime...” Alolan Ninetales muttered dryly, flicking her tails with faint disdain. 
“Unless they find a way to live forever, which they likely won't. Mortals always waste what little time they have chasing distant specks... instead of saving the ground beneath their feet.”

The Reflector showed fleets of privately owned spacecrafts lifting off, funded by the elite. These ships rarely returned. Some crash-landed. Others arrived at inhospitable worlds, only to be greeted by cleverly disguised Enefftian Pokémon scammers, who lured desperate travelers into ludicrous schemes.

Alolan Ninetales rolled her eyes.

“Still falling for that ‘free utopia planet’ ad? Honestly.”

-

[Scene Shift: Pokeplanet – Orbit Archive View]

With a whisper of wind from her tails, she tuned the Reflector to a familiar star. The Pokeplanet.

At least here, she mused, many still lived in harmony with their environment. But even this world wasn’t free of hubris.

The display now showed a sleek chrome spaceship landing awkwardly on a barren, dust-gray planet.

Inside: two Steel/Electric-type Pikachu astronauts, descendants of Kantonian Raichu and Alolan Raichu, emerged from their pod with confidence, suits shimmering with tech and pride.

They posed dramatically at the hatch. One tapped a button, and the door slid open.

They stepped out without atmosphere readings. Without caution. Without air.

Moments later, they dropped.

“Brilliant...” Alolan Ninetales said, not even blinking. “Spent a year flying across the void just to suffocate on arrival. No instincts. No humility.”

She turned away from the Reflector, her sundress fluttering as her tails curled thoughtfully behind her.

“They’re always trying to escape. But sometimes, the real escape… is accepting where you are.”

She left the chamber, silence lingering in her wake.

-

[Scene: Planet Evoir – Chronoscene Reflector Room, Day 2]

The polished chamber lit softly as the crystalline reflector stirred to life once more. Alolan Ninetales stepped inside with her usual grace, her pale blue sundress whispering with her motion. This time, she wasn’t alone.

Trailing behind her were two familiar figures, Vaporeon, the ever-composed immortal in her frilled maid dress, and Flareon, her loyal husband in sharp butler uniform. They entered with quiet curiosity, their synchronized footsteps the mark of long companionship.

“I want to show you what I saw yesterday...” Alolan Ninetales murmured, gesturing a gloved paw toward the Reflector as it shimmered again.

She brought up the footage of Neo-Earth’s latest batch of would-be star-chasers, rockets taking off into cold oblivion, elite mortals seeking meaning in distant galaxies. Once again, the three watched as another spacecraft landed on a barren rock, its occupants suffocating moments after stepping into a vacuum they never prepared for.

Vaporeon lowered her ears, sighing.

Flareon shook his head.

“Such waste...” he muttered. “If only they cared for their homes like they care for running from them.”

Alolan Ninetales nodded.

“Which is why I’d like you to see something else.”

With a flick of her tails, the reflector’s projection spun, stars blurring into pink and gold, until it steadied on Erosbloom-89, the planet of love and gentler awakenings.

The image focused on two human figures.

Aqualice, a woman with calm, intelligent eyes behind sleek glasses, her long blue hair swaying with every step. A functional maid dress equipped with subtle water-jet wings carried her with ease. In her arms, always, was her beloved: Burnabon.

He wore a neat butler uniform, his short red hair tousled from motion. His flame-channeling gloves glowed faintly as he cooked, cleaned, and tended with quiet diligence, all while resting in his girlfriend’s bridal carry as though it were the most natural state of being.

For a full year now, they had lived this way, joyfully. Immortal not because they sought escape, but because they responded, unknowingly, to a subconscious cry during their time of despair… a cry answered by Bloominian Meloetta herself.

“No dreams of galaxies...” Alolan Ninetales said softly. “Just love, sustainability, and small things that matter.”

Vaporeon blinked thoughtfully, her fin-like tail swaying.

“They water the plants…”

Flareon added with a small smile,

“...and cook for everyone else, too.”

On the Reflector, Aqualice and Burnabon were now helping a group of local villagers harvest rare fruits near a sun-drenched grove. Burnabon, still carried, threw chopped vegetables into a pot with practiced flicks of his flame-gloves. Aqualice laughed and adjusted her grip, careful not to drop him (cannot drop him anyway), while stirring the pot with her barely free hand.

Vaporeon and Flareon shared a knowing look.

In many ways… it felt like looking into a mirror.

“They really still reminding me of us...” Vaporeon said softly, brushing her fin-hand over Flareon's shoulder.

“But human...” Flareon replied, just as gently, leaning into her touch. “And just as devoted.”

The three immortals watched a little longer. No flying ships. No suffocating. Just food, care, laughter, and love that didn’t need to be shouted into the void of space to matter.

Alolan Ninetales gave a rare, genuine smile.

“And that is how you reach the unreachable.”

-

[Scene: Erosbloom-89 – Eastern Hemisphere, Solarvee’s Garden]

The sky shone with soft gold, brushing its warmth over the rolling, fertile slopes of the eastern region. Sun-kissed breeze danced across the layered gardens built into the rocky terrain, each terrace blooming with edible flowers and hardy vegetables, well-cared for by none other than Solarvee, the Rock/Psychic explorer girl.

Dressed in her signature sun visor and practical boots, Solarvee hummed softly as she levitated a cluster of nutrient-rich stones into the soil, enhancing the roots of her crimson-rooted radishes. She glanced up at the sight of familiar shadows approaching.

Aqualice drifted into view, ever serene, her water-jet wings gliding low above the earth. In her arms, as always, is Burnabon, resting with one arm slung over her shoulder, his fire gloves tucked behind his back like a sleeping ember. Together, they landed beside Solarvee, the gentle spray of water wings watering some nearby bushes mid-landing.

“Mind if we help with lunch?” Aqualice offered with a warm smile.

Solarvee grinned and waved them in with a rock-levitated basket of sweetroots.

“You two know the drill. Burnabon, you’re in charge of grilling again.”

Burnabon smirked from within his eternal cradle.

“As long as Aqualice doesn’t try to roast the veggies mid-carry again…”

A gentle nudge from her water jet made him hush with a smile.

Not far off, a third presence watched them with half-hearted interest. Enefftian Arcanine, Electric/Psychic type, and former resident scammer of NFT777-Enefftia, stood by a shallow rock pool with a fishing rod balanced on his shoulder. His fur was windswept, and his manners cleaner now. He’d been stuck here on Erosbloom-89 for over a year… and something had changed.

Gone were the horniness and sales pitches. Now he wandered the coasts as a simple fisherman, trading fresh catches for vegetables and conversation.

Spotting Solarvee, he approached with a grin.

“You know, you’re glowing today. Did the rocks compliment you, or is it just me?”

Solarvee didn’t even blink. With one psychic tug, she floated a few coins toward him and took the basket of glimmering fish.

“Here. Payment in full. Now go.”

Arcanine blinked.

“...Right. See ya.”

He turned and left, tail flicking once, voice muttering a good-natured “You’re no fun” as he vanished into the rocky path back to the coast.

Just as the fish were being placed into preparation trays by levitating stones, another pair of immortals floated down gently beside the garden wall.

Seifuku Woman and her beloved, Gakuran Man, an ancient couple of unfathomable age, their love having lasted 2.5 billion years, waved warmly. As always, she carried him in bridal fashion, and he rested comfortably as if it were second nature. Which, by now, it was.

“Still gardening, Solarvee?” Seifuku Woman called out.

“Still carrying him?” Solarvee quipped back with a grin.

The group laughed as they set up the long lunch table under the flowering sunbramble tree. Friends reunited, comfort as eternal as the sunlight on this planet.

-

[Scene Shift: Planet Evoir – Chronoscene Reflector Room]

The ethereal crystals of the chamber glowed faintly as the latest scene played: gardens, laughter, couples held in arms, eternal peace.

Vaporeon, still in her maid dress, leaned gently forward with a sparkle in her eye, and, without warning, scooped Flareon into her arms again.

“I’m not letting you go the rest of the day...” she teased, adjusting her hold just enough to make it snug.

Flareon, dressed in his butler uniform, sputtered.

“H-Hey! This isn’t part of the...!” He folded his arms and turned his head, blushing.
“...Whatever. Not like I hate it or anything.”

Vaporeon smirked.

“Tsundere confirmed.”

The chamber doors opened with a soft tone, and Gardevoir, still aglow with authority and wisdom, stepped in, her psychic presence mingling with the warmth of the room. She looked around at the joyful mischief of her fellow immortals and at the peaceful replay of Erosbloom-89's surface projected above.

She crossed her arms, satisfied.

“This is what I fought for...” she said calmly. “A solar system where dreams stopped being toxic and started becoming gentle.”

The others nodded, knowing full well: it wasn’t just peace they’d built.

It was a future that no one needed to escape from.

------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------

Ch 62: Ingenius Math Descendants of Ninetales

[Scene: Pokeplanet – Present Day, 6.9 Million Light Years from Evoir]
Location: Poketopia (yes, still called that)

Time has pushed forward, billions of years since the golden eras of Ho-Oh’s miracles and the reign of legendaries. The rebirths have ended. True legendaries and mythicals now belong only to the history scrolls. The last of them perished over 2 billion years ago, precisely 390 years after the events of Saga 4.

And yet, Poketopia still stands.

No longer a tourist hub, it is now a fortified, high-security city-state where caution rules policy. After millennia of chaos, it became clear: no divine phoenix would come to undo mistakes anymore.

But hope doesn’t always need revival.

In the educational district on the southern edge, a dual-typed Eeveelution, Fire/Water-type, clad in shimmering Heatran-plated scales, stood at the front of a dome-shaped youth center. Her tail curled neatly, steam rising softly from the contrast of fire and water as she lectured calmly, a holo-slate levitating before her.

This was Heatranvee, descendant of Vaporeon and Flareon, born of Poketopian roots and the gentle principles they’d passed on.

Two young students sat before her, still trembling a little.
A Ground/Dark-type Neonian Piloswine, shaggy and uncertain, and beside her, a more delicate-looking Ice/Psychic Neonian Braixen with crystalline ears and a troubled gaze.

They were cousins, descendants of Greninja x Delphox and Mamoswine x Alolan Ninetales. Despite their powerful bloodlines, their spirits had faltered.

“Our math exam grades dropped off a cliff…” Neonian Braixen mumbled, nearly tearing up.
“We tried to memorize everything, but it just wouldn’t stick.”

Neonian Piloswine nodded slowly, eyes dim.

Heatranvee gave them a patient look, then used her tail to tap the holographic display.

“Because memorization alone isn’t learning...” she said firmly. “You didn't understand the why. That’s the root of good thinking, something more important than any revival.”

She opened a practice exercise not from the exam but from their daily lives, counting soil acidity ratios, predicting steam pressure curves.

Slowly, their eyes began to light up.

Behind them, a wall plaque quietly displayed names of founders and moral pillars: Vaporeon. Flareon. Lil Eve. Keldeo.

Their legacy lived on, if not in miracles, then in small victories.

-

[Scene: Planet Evoir – Chronoscene Reflector Chamber]

The glowing panels cast soft illumination across the round crystal platform. Three immortals sat together, watching the distant feed from Pokeplanet: Alolan Ninetales, ever elegant in her light blue sundress; Vaporeon, tail lazily wrapped around Flareon’s; and Flareon, flopped in her arms again, being quietly carried without protest.

The room was peaceful... until a sigh broke the silence.

“Why is my lineage so mentally fragile sometimes…?” Alolan Ninetales muttered, eyes drifting away from the screen.

“Maybe it's all those brains and no chill...” Flareon shrugged.

Vaporeon poked him in the side.

“Hey. Be nice.”

The doors slid open with a cheerful hum, and Lil Eve floated in like a breeze, still dressed in her iconic schoolgirl seifuku, immortal eyes shining like stars.

“Saw the whole thing already...” she chimed. “That Heatranvee’s doing a great job. You should be proud.”

Alolan Ninetales blinked.

“Still… maybe I should start a math class.”

Lil Eve grinned wider.

“Only if you finally pass your coding test first.”

A beat of silence. Then...

“Oh please not that again...” Alolan Ninetales groaned, tail drooping as Vaporeon burst into gentle laughter.

Even Flareon cracked a smile as the room shifted from legacy to levity, glowing softly under the starlight of a future still being written.

-

[Scene: Planet Evoir – Chronoscene Reflector Room, Later That Day]

The crystal orb shimmered again, catching everyone's attention as it switched feeds. The peaceful Pokeplanet visuals faded, replaced by an explosion of garish colors and dissonant jingle tunes.

The new feed was live: a drone transmission from NFT777-Enefftia, the infamous casino-planet.

The camera, mounted on a floating scout drone, zipped through the chaotic neon skyline of the gacha-glutted empire. Gaudy banners waved across skyscrapers in pixelated flames and rainbows. Giant screens flashed grotesquely overhyped slogans:

“Draw NOW for a chance at the ultra-rare LEGENDARY HUMAN WAIFU!!”
“SQUARE ROOT SPECIAL EVENT: √((((((((2)))))))) PERCENT CHANCE!”
“NEW NINETALES-THEMED FIGURINE SET, 0.0000003% DROP RATE!!”

Controlling the drone feed remotely were two of the most dangerous minds from the past war: Serenede, the coldly efficient human war strategist, and Enefftian Ninetales, her playful yet cunning vulpine accomplice, herself descended from Alolan Ninetales, yet corrupted by the Enefftian culture of profit and temptation.

They laughed over comms as the banners flickered by, each more absurd than the last.

Inside the Chronoscene Reflector Room, Alolan Ninetales instinctively squinted.

“Oh no...” she muttered. “Not that format again... Who even writes drop rates like that?”

Lil Eve leaned closer, eyes mischievous.

“Come on, do it. Code it. I dare you.”

Alolan Ninetales narrowed her eyes.

“You want me to decode √((((((((2)))))))) just to make a point?”

“Yep.”

“...Fine.”

She pulled out a palm-sized crystal terminal, her tail tapping rhythmically against the floor as she brought up a minimal compiler. Her delicate claws danced across the glowing keys.

Seconds later, she stopped. The result hovered on screen:

≈ 1.41421356% drop rate

Alolan Ninetales stared at it flatly.

“And that's supposed to be exciting?”

Lil Eve smirked.

“Hey, better than 0.0000003%.”

Alolan Ninetales sighed with all the weight of someone who had seen the rise and fall of galaxies.

“How did a descendant of mine end up enabling this?”

Vaporeon peeked over her shoulder and snorted.

“At least they didn’t use imaginary numbers this time.”

Flareon, still being held, tilted his head.

“Give them a week.”

They all groaned in unison.

-

Another spaceship, clearly from the same creators, suddenly dashed in and slammed into the earlier gacha-bannered vessel. 
This time, the drop rate displayed across its hull was even more grotesque:

√√√√√√√√2

In a synthesized voice, the ship politely announced apologies to any nearby alien species for the previous ship’s existence.

The now-crashed gacha ship spiraled out of control and landed squarely on another of Enefftia’s scam vessels, this one a garish MLM ad ship. It had no passengers, only an unnamed automated controller.

Noting the collision, the MLM ship promptly rerouted itself directly into a drifting asteroid. Its guidance system, confused by the solar system’s magnetic field and unable to detect the invisible local sun, registered no reason to stay.

Back in the Chronoscene Room, Alolan Ninetales stared in silence... then facepalmed.

“My descendants are... actual ‘math genius idiots,’” she muttered.

With a sigh, she typed out the unholy √√√√√√√√2 into her interface and calculated the drop rate.

The result popped up on screen.

“It’s even lower. Just by a bit.”

She facepalmed again, ears twitching in mild disbelief.

“I’ve lived for about two billion years to see... this...” she said, dryly. “And somehow, it’s funny.”

-

Alolan Ninetales was still staring blankly at the screen when the door slid open behind her.

She turned, just in time to see Flareon, tightly wrapped in fire-proof and watery ropes, being effortlessly carried in Vaporeon’s arms like a squirming plush toy.

His fluffy tail twitched in protest.
“H-Hey! It’s not like I wanted to be tied up or anything…! I was just trying to, guh, explain logically!” he stammered, looking away with a deep blush.

Vaporeon narrowed her eyes at him. “You were rude to Ninetales.”

Without giving him time to wriggle out of his excuse, she leaned in and kissed him squarely on the cheek, firm, slow, and smug.
“That’s your punishment...” she whispered.

Alolan Ninetales blinked once, then twice. “…You two are unbelievable.”

As if in sync, all three turned their attention back to the glowing math result still lingering on the screen.

√√√√√√√√2 ≈ 1.090507732

There was a long pause.

Flareon, still in Vaporeon’s hold, tilted his head. “That’s… it?”

Vaporeon blinked. “…That’s barely even lower than just √2.”

Alolan Ninetales exhaled a long, dry breath. “Two billion years of wisdom and this is what the galaxy gives me…”

They all silently agreed, this entire mathematical scam thing was stupid. But in a way, tragically hilarious.

------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------

Ch 63: KELDEO-E

[Scene: Evoir, Filming Fields – The Next Morning]
The soft golden sky of Evoir cast its morning glow over the grassy plains near the Chronoscene Tower. Vaporeon, still in her frilly maid dress, glided gracefully through the field with a mischievous smile, her arms still wrapped tightly around a tied-up Flareon, who had yet to regain his freedom. His fluffy tail flicked in quiet protest, but he wasn’t truly upset. His cheeks were tinted with a tsundere red.

Flareon (mumbling through the fireproof-and-watery ropes):
"Th-this is a violation of autonomy..."

Vaporeon (teasing):
“Shush, you're still being punished for mocking Ninetales.”

The two paused as a new figure approached, Keldeo, the immortal gakuran-wearing Water/Fighting stallion. His confident stride was matched by the clanging sounds of something mechanical galloping behind him.

Beside him rolled the recently unveiled creation:
KELDEO-E, a shining sword-wielding, junk-collecting, ridable robot horse, glistening with metallic aqua plating and powered by a solar-mana core. Commissioned by Galaxian Magnezone, this machine bore the dignified stance of a knight and the purpose of a restorationist.

In the distance, Evoirian Rapidash, a dazzling Fire/Water mare, stood ready with steam rising gently from her mane, serving as the director in Keldeo’s upcoming film, KELDEO-E: The Rebirth Circuit.

Lil Eve stood nearby, wearing her usual sailor uniform, tapping on her oversized drone controller. Floating beside her was BIGEVE, the eight-elemental flying Eevee-shaped mech, its tails glowing in rotating hues.

Lil Eve (nodding):
“I came up with the KELDEO-E concept after seeing those Neo-Earth human elites chasing galaxies again... and still letting their own planet rot.”

Keldeo (patting the mech's side):
“Let them chase stars. I’ll plant trees under the moonlight.”

BIGEVE whirred approvingly, puffing out tiny gusts of wind and fire, creating a small double rainbow in the air.

Flareon (still tied):
“Where's my robot…”

Vaporeon:
“You are my robot.”

Lil Eve (grinning):
“Let’s film something that matters for once, not gacha, not scams, not square roots of disappointment. Just meaning.”

-

[One Month Later – The Premiere of KELDEO-E: The Rebirth Circuit]

Across projectors in solar gardens and floating screens over serene Evoirian skies, the long-awaited film KELDEO-E rolled out. Attendees across Evoir and sympathetic corners of Erosbloom-89 tuned in, many gathering in community theaters with flowers in hand and recycled snacks on plates.

-

[Act 1 – The Longing]

KELDEO-E, the outdated robot stallion, patrols the ruins of Neo-Earth. With a worn mane of wires and rust-flecked hooves, he plays old records of romantic humans, couples holding hands, dancing under lamplight, sharing meals. He sighs, a mechanical whinny echoing through the hollow cityscape.

KELDEO-E (internal monologue, static-pitched):
"I was built to serve. To ride beside them. To love their life... not mourn their memory."

-

[Act 2 – The Intrusion]

A thunderous descent. A spaceship lands, filled with chrome-plated resource-collector bots, every model visibly superior in design. Among them floats BIGEVE, sleek, deadly, Eevee-shaped with a feminine voice and eight-elemental capability.

BIGEVE scans KELDEO-E. Target lock: "Obsolete."

He panics, hides, trembles in the shadows. His sensors pick up... life. A lone green sapling, struggling in concrete.

Gently potting it, he rolls out. Offers it to her, a token of peace.

BIGEVE stares.

Then, without a word...

She bridal carries him, sapling still safe in his hooves, soaring skyward.

-

[Act 3 – The Betrayal]

Back aboard the mothership, suspicion brews. The elite robots gather.

A drone snarls, “Unauthorized relic detected.”

BIGEVE shields him.

“I’m not like you. I don’t erase. I remember.”

With a burst of rainbow plasma, she unleashes a full elemental barrage ,  fire, water, electric, grass ,  blasting her way through. KELDEO-E is helpless in her arms, clutching the sapling as they bolt toward the last remaining humans.

-

[Act 4 – The Confrontation]

The humans... have grown corpulent. Lazy. Distracted by food tubes and idle luxuries.

BIGEVE sets KELDEO-E down.

He steps forward, trembling.

“Please... one more chance. For life.”

A slovenly man scoffs, but BIGEVE charges her lightning. He flees.

A lone woman steps up.

“...Let’s try again.”

Others join, moved.

-

[Act 5 – The Return]

They land on Neo-Earth. The pot is placed.

BIGEVE summons Grass. KELDEO-E performs a watery Sword Dance, drenching the soil with purified runoff.

A young human approaches and hands him a gleaming, updated sword.

They all watch as the sapling shivers... then blossoms.

-

[Act 6 – The Bloom]

The planet breathes again.

Humans jog. Gardens return. Lakes ripple. Life pulses.

On a hill, KELDEO-E and BIGEVE stand proudly. She bridal carries him under a tree of iridescent leaves, metallic petals fluttering in the breeze.

She kisses him. Their forms gleam beneath twin suns.

The End.

-

[Post-Film Reactions – Evoir, Evening]

In the soft glow of the Chronoscene Room:

Vaporeon still cradles Flareon, who remains tied up even after a full month, slightly more resigned to his fate, but clearly still tsundere.

Flareon (grumbling):
“Tch... overdramatic film... but... not bad.”

Vaporeon (smiling, tail swishing):
“I saw you blush at the kiss scene.”

Flareon:
“D-did not!”

Lil Eve descends nearby, proudly bridal carrying Keldeo, the original immortal stallion himself, now grinning sheepishly like a rebellious boyfriend caught red-hooved.

Lil Eve:
“Think the humans got the message?”

Keldeo:
“If not, we'll make a sequel.”

All four gaze at the final still image on the screen, a sapling silhouetted against a reborn sky, and nod in solemn joy.

-

[Scene: After the Film – Echoes and Growth]

The film ended.
The Reflector screen dimmed, humming softly as it shut itself down.

A moment of stillness followed. Then, with a mechanical flutter, a glossy promotional poster slid out from the Reflector's archive slot and drifted to the floor.

Title:
"KELDEO-E: The Rebirth Circuit"

Printed on it: KELDEO-E, smiling calmly, eyes soft and sincere. Beside him stood BIGEVE, her expression warm, protective, almost maternal. Behind them, stylized circuitry bloomed like vines beneath a peaceful sky. It wasn’t menacing.
It wasn’t cold.
It was… hopeful.

And yet, that image brought everything crashing back.

-

Gardevoir’s breath hitched the moment she saw the word synthetic. Her eyes narrowed.
She remembered the metallic snap of bone, the smell of scorched Hatterene fur.
Her impostor bot had looked just like her. Had acted like her.
Had killed an innocent Hatterene before she could intervene.
She’d torn that machine apart herself, assisted by Miraidon.
Watched her own face shatter into twisted chrome.

-

Alolan Ninetales’ fur bristled beside her.
She remembered waking up inside ice, trapped, paralyzed.
Hearing her impostor using her voice, then the impostor got destroyed by Mimikyu embarassingly.
The way it mocked her without ever saying a word.
She hadn’t screamed. She couldn't.

-

Gardevoir turned away.
Ninetales followed.
Their exit was wordless, abrupt.

Lil Eve blinked. “What just...?”

Keldeo looked from the poster to the empty doorway. “They were... upset?”

“They were impersonated...” Lil Eve murmured. “Back in the Bot War. Saga 3. Without consent.”

“They think this is happening again?”

“No. They remember.”

A heavy silence fell.

Then, a few minutes later, quiet footsteps returned. Gardevoir stood in the doorway again, Alolan Ninetales just behind her.

They didn’t speak at first. Gardevoir simply walked up to the poster and studied it again, really looked at it.

KELDEO-E’s smile was genuine.
BIGEVE’s stance wasn’t imposing. It was protective. Almost gentle.

“…This isn’t them...” Gardevoir finally said.

“No. It’s not...” Alolan Ninetales agreed. Her voice was softer now.

Gardevoir exhaled. “Sorry for storming out.”

Lil Eve smiled faintly. “You earned that right, many times over.”

Keldeo nodded. “You still want to leave?”

Gardevoir shook her head. “No. We’ll stay.”

“We’ve seen monsters wear our faces before...” Alolan Ninetales said. “Doesn’t mean every synthetic does.”

Gardevoir gave a quiet nod toward the poster. “Let’s give them a chance.”

------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------

Ch 64 : 9 Minus 1 Then Square Math Class

[Scene : The Quiet Entry]
Setting: The polished wooden hallway leading into the Evoirian living room.

Vaporeon walked with steady grace, arms wrapped securely around Flareon’s form. The once-fiery butler was still bound in soaked, fireproof ropes, his tail flicking just slightly in protest, more from pride than discomfort.

She stepped into the living room without announcement. The atmosphere was peaceful, the air cooled by slow-turning ceiling fans. Alolan Ninetales sat by the window, cloaked in the soft glow of late afternoon, her light blue sundress fluttering faintly in the breeze.

Flareon stirred, glancing toward her. There was no hostility, no rivalry, just recognition.

-

[Scene : A Quiet Compliment]
Setting: The same room, still, with only the sounds of wind and distant birds.

Flareon’s ears twitched before he finally broke the silence.

"You know... your descendants..." he said, his voice dry but sincere, "They’ve inherited more than just your looks. Clever. Practical. They’re... sharp in all the right ways."

Alolan Ninetales looked toward him slowly. Her gaze was not cold, merely reflective. She said nothing, but her silence gave weight to his words. No deflection. No sarcasm. Just a moment acknowledged.

-

[Scene : Release]
Setting: Center of the living room rug, sunlight spilling across the floor.

Vaporeon gently knelt, still holding Flareon with care. With methodical fingers, she began to untie the soaked bindings, each knot loosened with a soft rustle.

The ropes fell away one by one until Flareon was finally free, the damp remnants coiling loosely on the floor like discarded memories.

She helped him sit upright, her expression calm, yet touched with the quiet satisfaction of resolution.

-

[Scene : Iced Tea and Subtle Thanks]
Setting: Small side table in the living room, with a pitcher and three glasses.

Flareon stood up on his own, rolling his stiff shoulders before making his way to the tray. He carefully poured the tea, taking extra care not to let his inner heat warm the glass.

He carried it to Alolan Ninetales without flair or sarcasm, offering it with the proper form of a servant, though not without meaning. She took it, nodding once in acceptance.

-

[Scene : A Pat, and a Grin]
Setting: By the center of the room, as the sun lowers and shadows begin to stretch.

As Flareon turned to retreat, Vaporeon gently reached out and patted his head.

A pause.

He didn’t brush her off, didn’t scoff. Instead, a slow, sideways grin crept across his face.
"Yeah, yeah... I missed this too..." he muttered, not looking at her but not hiding either.

For the first time in months, his pre-tsundere warmth surfaced, not burning, just gently glowing.

-

[Scene : Chapter 64 Realization]
Setting: Still in the living room, the atmosphere peaceful and light-hearted.

As the calm settled, Alolan Ninetales’s eyes narrowed thoughtfully.

“This… is the 64th chapter...” she said, almost to herself. Then a faint, foxlike smirk curved her lips. “Perfect.”

She rose from her seat and, with a practiced flick of her tail, summoned six old and new devices beside her, each glowing faintly, from retro to modern.

“2-bit. 4-bit. 8-bit. 16-bit. 32-bit. And now...” She turned grandly. “64-bit.”

The room shimmered with quiet blue light as she struck a pose, invoking a subtle melody, Alolan Ninetale’s Perfect Math Class, an ancient remix from the Dragonlet danmaku archive. The tune played softly in the background as she began to code midair with icy glyphs.

-

[Scene : The Math Flex]
Setting: Symbols hover in a projected grid around her like a floating chalkboard.

“Let’s finish with elegance...” she whispered with pride, and with a curl of her tail, typed:

(9 − 1)² =

The result pulsed: 64.

“Perfectly square. Perfectly elegant...” she declared, tail swaying like a metronome.

-

[Scene : Reactions and Revival of Playfulness]
Setting: Still the living room, now filled with playful, nostalgic tech aura.

Flareon blinked at her performance. “That was... ridiculous...” he muttered.

But then, after a pause, he clapped. “Ridiculously impressive.”

Vaporeon nodded with a small, proud smile, then added her own soft clapping, just enough to turn the teasing moment into something warmer.

Flareon turned to her, not resisting the pull of the moment anymore. “Y’know what...”
He leapt into her arms, bridal-style, tail curling with satisfaction. “I missed being carried.”

She caught him effortlessly, chuckling, and kissed his forehead once, 

Then twice...

And again...

Until it reached sixty-four gentle kisses, like ticking numbers in her memory.
He melted into her arms with each one, no longer resisting who he was with her.

-

[Scene : United Applause]
Alolan Ninetales watched the scene unfold with raised eyebrows, then calmly joined in the applause, her tails clapping like fans folding open. The music faded into gentle echoes.

“Chapter sixty-four...” she said with a knowing smirk. “Not bad for a math class.”

-

[Scene : Advanced Math, the Unhinged Way]
Setting: The same living room, bathed in the fading light of late afternoon, soft tech-glow from the bit devices still present.

With the 64-bit finale still floating beside her, Alolan Ninetales flicked her tail again and summoned a new string of icy equations in the air.

“Let’s go deeper...” she murmured, smirking like a professor with too much free time.

She wrote:

((9 − 1)²) + (√9 + ⁶√64)

The symbols pulsed once, 
64 + (3 + 2) = 69

She paused. Glanced at the others.

Then, with no shame, declared softly but confidently:

"Nice."

Her tone was utterly composed, dignified... and completely self-aware.

-

[Scene : Affection Multiplied]
Vaporeon giggled behind her paw, then turned back to Flareon, still content in her arms.

“Well then...” she said, tightening her hold just slightly, “Since it’s still the 64th chapter…”

She leaned down and kissed him again.

Once.

Twice.

Three more times.

Five in total.

A bonus round.

Flareon blinked, still blushing from the earlier barrage, but this time he clapped, while still in her arms, with the enthusiasm of someone surrendering to joy.

“This...” he said with a wide grin, “is unhingedly cute. Who knew math could feel like this?”

-

[Scene : The Echo of Wholesomeness]
Alolan Ninetales closed her floating math panels with a swirl of ice, but her tail still twitched in amusement. “That’s because you were never in my class.” she quipped.

Vaporeon rocked Flareon gently in her arms, her smile calm, proud, and just a bit smug.

And for a moment, even with immortal weight behind their souls, the three of them let the silliness linger, a moment where elegance, play, and affection intersected like perfect geometry.

-

Author’s Note :
Immortality Doesn’t Cancel Karma

Flareon’s month-long restraint, bound in waterlogged, fireproof ropes and carried effortlessly in Vaporeon’s arms, wasn’t just a humorous punishment. It was karma, distilled into immortal form.

His blunt remark about Alolan Ninetales’ descendants back in Chapter 62 may have seemed minor in mortal time, but among the ageless, every word has echo. And Vaporeon, ever the graceful enforcer of balance, delivered that echo with soft strength and sensual discipline.

Yet what matters most is not the punishment, but Flareon’s growth from it.

He came to realize that his recent tsundere edge had grown sharper than it should. Pride had blurred into bluntness. Deflection had masked his sincerity. And while never cruel, he’d lost some of the warmth that once defined him.

So here, in Chapter 64, he finally let go of the pride and gave honest praise, not just to right a wrong, but because he meant it. In doing so, he earned his release, not just from the ropes, but from a fragment of his own emotional restraint.

And in her usual calm strength, Vaporeon welcomed this moment of clarity. She didn’t just untie him. She kissed him. Praised him. Carried him again, this time, by his own choice.

Because even in a world where love endures forever, it still needs to be nurtured, checked, and reshaped. And karma, as always, remembers.

End of Chapter 64

-----------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------

Ch 65: Poketopia 3 Glitched Boss Rush

Scene : Loop of Trials
In the infinite stillness of the Death Loop Tablet, Regigigas endures yet another game, another performance in pursuit of a more merciful death.

Lately, his efforts have not gone unseen. The ground/steel-type streamer, Cosmician Sandslash, has been broadcasting Regigigas’ games to wide acclaim. What was once silent torment is now spectacle, offering him dignity, if not peace.

-

Scene : The Bot Gauntlet Announcement
One day, the tablet shifts.

A new challenge appears:
Fight all 30 illusion-replicated bots from the old Bot War, the terror that once plagued Pokeplanet in Saga 3.

Victory grants a gentle death... delivered by Durabot’s soft Dragon Pulse.

Regigigas pauses.
He remembers them well. He’s seen their war footage, a copy gifted to him by the real, immortal policewoman Gardevoir.
Even Alolan Ninetales, serene in her sundress, had turned away in embarrassment when her bot’s footage played.

-

Scene : Opening Rounds – Cannon Fodder
He begins with the weakest:

Blisseybot slaps him harmlessly. Regigigas flicks her away like a leaf.

Greedentbot follows, no threat.

Pikabot is next. Gigas scoffs: "This one represents fear? Pathetic."

Slowbot, Eldebot, and Venubot offer slightly more resistance, but fall all the same.

-

Scene : Avenge the Fallen
Then comes Cinderbot.

Regigigas narrows his eyes.
He remembers Cinderace, one of Darkrai’s murder victims in Saga 2.
"This one fell to darkness..." he mutters, and with a thunderous blow, he “avenges” the fallen.

-

Scene : Mid-Tier Brawls
Sylveonbot, Wigglybot, Garchompbot, Zardbot (Charizard's bot), Zerabot, Snorlaxbot, each one manageable.

Then:

Crustlebot.
The walls press in. The trolling is real.
But Regigigas recalls the NaclCraft mod. He counters the maze’s logic and strikes the core.

-

Scene : Ice and Grief
Ninetalebot appears, freezing the air.

He remembers falling to this illusion before.
"Not this time." He pierces the bot’s chest.
"Forgive me, real one..."

Mamobot follows. Unknown to him, he mimics Mamoswine, the long-lost husband of Alolan Ninetales. He defeats him without knowing the sorrow he stirs.

-

Scene : Creators and Regrets
Then, twin echoes of redemption:

Mimebot, the reflection of the fallen creator.

Crambot, the partner in crime.

He hesitates... and bows before striking.
"Your real selves saved my world. Rest now."

-

Scene : Steep Climb Begins
Next come the heavy hitters:

Absolbot, Talonbot, Gengarbot, Blastoisebot, all strong, but not unbeatable.

Greninjabot uses Double Team to infuriating effect, but is eventually stomped.

-

Scene : Fighting Spirit
Then, the wildest fight: Machampbot.

He approaches with glowing ゴゴゴ aura, fists flying in a JoJo-style ORA ORA ORA barrage.

"This is Fighting Wind Requiem!" he roars, "You will never reach the truth!"

Regigigas mutters, "King Crimson."
He lands a perfect surprise counter. Machampbot falls.

-

Scene : Personal Echoes
Lucabot down.
He remembers the real Lucario, Gardevoir’s late husband. His eyes soften.

Gardebot is vicious, moonblasting, black-holing.
Regigigas finds a pole, counters her slowness, and slams her into defeat.
"Forgive me, true protector."

-

Scene : Final Trials
Trevbot mocks him. “Bots are the future.”
Regigigas ignites a flame cannon. No future for this one.

Dragobot whispers: “Kill yourself. Let go.”
Regigigas redirects the divebomb strikes and ejects the bot into space.

Espeonbot hits where it hurts, replaying past death scenes, violating his psyche.
"No..." he mutters, "Flareon's real mother would never do this."
He plants surprise bombs and ends her.

-

Scene : The Final Boss
Tyranitarbot.

A fair, one-on-one slugfest, no illusions, just pure strength.

Regigigas remembers killing the real Tyranitar in Saga 4, only for Ho-Oh to resurrect him... and die in return.

"Stone. Floor. Slam."
He breaks the bot with dignity.

-

Scene : Mercy Granted
Then, Durabot appears, calm, warm, and kind.

No malice. No hostility.

Just a gentle, whispering Dragon Pulse to grant Regigigas the least painful death he’s earned all cycle.

-

Scene : Stream Applause
From outside the Death Loop Tablet, Cosmician Sandslash grins.

His chat explodes in applause.
He raises a metal claw: "Let’s give it up for our gentle titan, Regigigas!"

-

Scene : Chat Reactions and Reverence
The stream erupts.

Cosmician Sandslash’s chat floods with praise:

"He bowed to Mimebot... that’s class."
"Did you see how he spared no blow, yet respected the real ones?!"
"The queen would be proud... Gardebot may fall, but Gardevoir stands eternal."

Some viewers even clip the apology to Gardebot and the whisper to Ninetalebot, calling them “the kindest deathblows ever delivered in gaming history.”

-

Scene : The Forwarded Stream
Cosmician Sandslash hesitates for a moment… then decides.

He forwards the full VOD to Gardevoir, knowing she will understand the nuance.
He doesn’t forward it to Alolan Ninetales, not out of malice, but out of tact.
She’s proud, and that bot... wasn't her finest hour.

-

Scene : Reactions at the Immortals' Domain
In the eternal villa atop Evoir's observatory, Gardevoir receives the footage.

She watches quietly, eyes calm, one hand over her heart.

A soft smile forms.

But she isn’t alone.

From the corner, Alolan Ninetales had peeked.
She watches too.

When Ninetalebot appears and freezes... only to be pierced with an apology...
Her ears twitch.
Her cheeks burn.

She dives under a pillow, mortified.

-

Scene : Enter the Fire and the Tide
Moments later, the Fireboy and Watergirl arrive.

Flareon, the immortal butler, senses something’s up.
Vaporeon, ever graceful, leans beside her embarrassed husband.

Then Flareon sees Espeonbot on the playback.

His breath stops.
That was the impostor of his mother.

He clenches a paw softly.

“I still remember... Saga 3...” he murmurs. “When I couldn’t move... when her face wasn’t hers anymore...”

Vaporeon nods gently.

“I remember too. That’s when I lifted you... bridal style. And Saga 4 onwards... It all started from there.”

A warm silence.
Alolan Ninetales hears them from under the pillow.

-

Scene : Deflection and Thermometers
Alolan Ninetales peeks out, ears red.

She blurts, “S-So... how’s that thermometer challenge going, Flareon?”

He blinks. “Wait, what...?”

“Let’s go test it in the lab! Temperature resilience, right?” she insists.

Vaporeon chuckles.
“Water between fire and ice...” she teases. “I’ll be the safety net.”

-

Scene : A Heated Lab Break
In the immortal lab, chaos ensues:

The room’s temperature spikes from Flareon’s side.

Ice crystals and temperature dropped form on Alolan Ninetales’ side.

Vaporeon swirls through the middle, keeping balance.

Their laughter echoes through the crystal walls.

From afar, Gardevoir watches the chaos and smiles again, fond and motherly.

-----------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------

Ch 66: The Boy Who Loved Bugs, 666 Parent Warns

[Scene - Flashback, Neo-Earth, Some Years Ago]
There once lived a boy on Neo-Earth.
He didn't speak much.
He didn't make many friends.
He collected insects.

Not to harm.
Not to dominate.
But to understand.

He built tiny homes for beetles in the roots of trees.
Named every butterfly he met.
Whispered softly to centipedes like they were his classmates.

He called himself Buggleby.
No one else ever used that name. Only he did.

His parents didn't understand.

“Catching bugs? That’s not how you make a living.”
“Stop being weird.”
“You need a real future, in a store, an office, anywhere normal.”

They mocked his notebooks.
Burned his sketches.
Threw out his beetle jars.

But when you're told your love is unacceptable long enough…
Eventually, something breaks.

And so it did.

Buggleby fought back.
Physically. Emotionally. Loudly.

The system labeled him a danger.
Society deemed him a mistake.
His parents… too little, too late.

And so, they exiled him.
To Diamond-666, the cold fortress world of authoritarian humanity.

-

[Scene - Diamond-666, Before the Peace, The Scientist’s Descent]
On Diamond-666, where kindness was a liability and empathy a myth, Buggleby thrived, if one could call it that.

Among broken geniuses and scarred minds, he joined humanity’s grimmest scientific circle.
Together, they developed Poké Balls, containment orbs born from both fascination and obsession.

For Buggleby, it was no longer about sharing life with insects.
It was about owning them.
Controlling them.
Reducing nature to parameters.

He never laughed again.

One day, without ceremony, Buggleby stood before the capsule bay, waved once to the scientist-leader Oaker, and ejected himself into deep space.

He did not scream.
He did not look back.
He had programmed the course himself:

Into the system’s sun.

A glowing farewell to a world that never let him belong.

His parents tried to apologize.
To reverse the exile.
To say the words they never said.

But by then…

It was too late.

-

[Scene - On Evoir, in Present Day]
The tale was recovered and rendered into crystal holovid.
Evoir’s mortal education council marked it “Essential Viewing: Parental Responsibility.”

In the immortal family wing, a rare moment unfolded.

Flareon, in his butler garb, sat still.
Vaporeon, the eternal maid, curled her water-trimmed tail around her family.
And between them, in a neatly pressed seifuku uniform, sat Lil Eve, their daughter, the immortal born of contrast and care.

The video ended.
No music.
No narration.
Only silence.

Flareon's flames dimmed as he blinked at nothing.
Vaporeon looked to her daughter, not to instruct, but simply to exist beside her.

Lil Eve didn’t cry.
She didn’t need to.
She understood the message deeper than most mortals ever could.

The silence wasn’t awkward.

It was sacred.

And then, gently, to disrupt the quiet, Vaporeon whispered:

“Would you have befriended him, Lil Eve?”

A pause.
A nod.

And Flareon added:

“We would’ve let him build bug homes in our garden.”

Lil Eve smiled.
Just a little.

-

[Scene - Evoir, West of Neo-Evoir City - Flames, Water, and the Mind]
After the tale of Buggleby faded from the screen, silence lingered, but it did not last forever.

Flareon, Vaporeon, and Lil Eve stepped outside their domehouse atop the cascading glade of western Neo-Evoir City. The sky shimmered in tones of twilight, an eternal dusk unique to this region.

Down by the spiraling walkway, voices rose in heated waves.

A family quarrel.
One all too familiar.

At the edge of the plaza stood a sharply robed Galaxian Alakazam, a male of stellar origin and sharp discipline. Psychic/Dark by typing, he radiated logic… and impatience.

“You waste your life collecting junk parts, Kadrabra! Why not refine your mind into real science? A career that matters!”

Opposite him, the younger Cosmician Kadabra, Psychic/Steel, forged from satellite steel and comet cognition, defended himself.

“It’s not junk! I can fix things! I can repurpose, rebuild.”

“To what end? You won’t be respected. You won’t be safe.”

Their argument rattled the small crystals lining the sidewalk.

Standing behind them was Cosmician Gothitelle, Ice/Dark, mother, wife, and muted observer. Cloaked in her velvet black coat and icy breath, she looked on in silence, afraid to interject.

But just as Kadabra's aura flared silver-blue, an oncoming Steel Beam, born of frustration, 

Lil Eve moved.

A whip of Flamethrower Trail snapped between them, parting the emotional storm with living fire.

Then came Surfing Waterfall, a spiraling ribbon of water that splashed from the sky down upon Kadabra, soaking him in its calming cascade.

“Enough...” Lil Eve whispered. “You’re not enemies.”

Galaxian Alakazam's eyes glowed, ready to strike in response, until Flareon stepped in, matching his energy. Flames roared at his fingertips, unmoving but unyielding.

“Do not escalate this. You're still his father.”

Meanwhile, Vaporeon approached the frozen Cosmician Gothitelle with a gentle nod.
She handed her a portable holovid crystal.

“Watch this. You may see your own story… if things had gone worse.”

Cosmician Gothitelle trembled, but obeyed. Her fingers clasped the holovid.

Flareon, flames still humming from his paws, forced the father to watch alongside her.
Lil Eve conjured Grass Vines, wrapped them gently around Kadabra, not to restrain, but to still his wandering mind.

Together, under quiet starlight, the arguing family watched the entire footage of Buggleby’s fall.

And when it ended…

No words were spoken for several minutes.

Cosmician Kadabra bowed his head.

“Maybe I don’t want to escape into junk collecting... but to help others fix what they throw away.”

Galaxian Alakazam breathed heavily, then looked to his wife, his son, then down at his own trembling hands.

“Maybe… I was afraid. Afraid he’d suffer like I did. But I never saw he just wanted to be… whole. I can still support that. Gently.”

Cosmician Gothitelle, holding back tears of cold vapor, finally stood straight and stepped forward.

“Then do it. Support him. Encourage him. Guide, don’t command. We do this together.”

The family stood closer now. Still awkward. Still cracked. But no longer breaking.

-

[Scene - Diamond-666, Present Day - The Sunless Lab]
On the gray-blue surface of the battle-worn planet of Diamond-666, inside the Peace Archives Tower, a different figure read from the past.

Professor Junipa, a woman in her late 40s with streaks of white in her hair and wisdom in her voice, she's a lab coated human with pencil skirt and glasses, stood in silence over a dusty capsule labeled:

“Buggleby - Suicide Archive - 97-SS-Class Clearance”

She read the note.
All of it.
Quietly.
Without blinking.

Then she turned toward the comms window, which revealed the sunlight of the local system reflecting off a trade vessel inbound from NFT777-Enefftia.

It had been one year since she signed the Poké Ball Abolition Act.
She had replaced containment with partnership.
Captivity with care.

Her voice echoed softly into the recorder:

“Your pain changed our path, Buggleby.
I wish you could’ve seen what your legacy really became.
Not containment.
But caution.
Not fear.
But reform.”

She set the note back in its vault and locked it once more.

Far above her, the satellite relays beamed the newest laws across the system.

-

[Scene - Neo-Evoir City, Evoir, After the Argument Calmed]

In the heart of Evoir, a young psychic/steel-type Cosmician Kadabra polished his first handmade repair drone, with his mother smiling nearby, and his father watching, silent but proud.

As dusk deepened and quiet returned to the neighborhood, Cosmician Kadabra busied himself behind the family’s workshop alcove, sorting through old scraps and refit tech. Amid tangled wires and rusted plating, his hand brushed against something odd, three small sticks wrapped in aged tape, tagged with fading hazard symbols.

He squinted. “...Dynamite?”

Turning to his father, now seated nearby with a warm cup of cosmic tea, he held them up.

“Hey… is this stuff safe to experiment with?”

Galaxian Alakazam stared at it, his brows lifting in alarm.

“No. Absolutely not. Those are chemically unstable and pre-date our current safeties. Do not touch the fuses.”

There was a time when Cosmician Kadabra would have argued. Would have rolled his eyes. Would have said you’re just overreacting again.

But not today.

“Alright. Got it. I’ll dispose of them the right way.”

He smiled faintly as he packed them safely into an isolation container.

“Guess even imperfect parents still know dangerous stuff when they see it.”

Galaxian Alakazam chuckled, nodding in approval, both at the caution and the wisdom.

Behind them, Cosmician Gothitelle emerged from the porch with a datapad, waving it like a mother proud of her trivia.

“Actually, if you do want to know what kind of junk’s secretly explosive, Cosmician Sandslash has an entire stream series called ‘Boom or Bunk’. He’s reviewed all sorts of weird old tech. I’m a paid subscriber, by the way.”

Cosmician Kadabra blinked.

“Wait, you watch streamers?”

“I don’t just watch, I participate in the monthly Q&A.”
She winked. “You should too. If you’re gonna work with salvaged tools, learn from someone who knows which ones can vaporize your eyebrows.”

He laughed, real, unforced laughter, for the first time in days.

“...Yeah. That sounds fair.”

As they returned indoors, the repaired family felt lighter somehow.
Not perfect.
But healing.

And far away, in a corner of Evoir’s digital sky, Cosmician Sandslash’s next episode thumbnail lit up:

"Tonight on Stream: 3 Items You Should NEVER Use Without Goggles - One of Them Is ALIVE."

-----------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------

Ch 67 : Temperature Bender Silliness

[Scene: VBend Simulation – “Gentry Mansion: Maid & Butler Edition”]

The digital air shimmered as Vaporeon, eternal maid of Evoir, logged into the VBend chamber. The system loaded her in, except this time, not as herself. Not quite.

She stood tall in a crisp butler uniform, tailored to her aquatic curves, giving off a poised, masculine aura. Her arms, broad and well-formed, gleamed under the simulated light as she rolled her sleeves and flexed with quiet confidence.

A moment later, her partner phased in. Flareon, the ever-dutiful immortal butler, now materialized in a lacey, monochrome maid outfit, head slightly tilted, a frilly cap balanced atop his messy orange hair. He blinked, voice shy and soft as chiffon.

“I-I suppose I’ll wear this today,” he said, unusually meek. “Might as well commit, right…?”

Vaporeon chuckled deeply, walking over and sliding a strong arm behind his knees.

Before Flareon could react, she lifted him with ease, one arm beneath his legs, the other supporting his back. A full butler-carry.

“D-dear!” he gasped, cheeks flushed. But then… a giggle. Soft, musical, and wholly feminine.

She grinned with masculine pride. “Told you I’d carry you no matter the universe.”

And like that, they stayed there, kissing in the virtual sunbeams, tangled in that role-reversed tenderness for three peaceful in-game hours.

-

[Scene: The Next Morning – VHumanMon Login Chamber]

The avatars reloaded, new platform, new world.

Vaporeon entered first, materializing as a human woman with a flowing blue ponytail, sleek figure, and athletic poise. She stretched out her arms and picked out a cheerleader outfit, complete with pom-poms and a confident smirk.

Flareon followed, this time as a modestly toned human man with pointy red-orange hair. He browsed the presets with a thoughtful squint before settling on the quarterback uniform, classic reds with padded shoulders.

“It’s been a while since we did these outfits,” he noted.

“I still remember how to lift a quarterback,” Vaporeon teased.

Before he could react, she swooped in again. With perfect human muscle memory, she bridal-carried him across the locker room zone. He let out a brief sound of surprise, then smiled.

“I’m never too heavy for you,” he whispered, relaxed in her arms.

“Never...” she replied, her voice low and steady. “Even in this world, I’ll always carry you.”

They walked on through the stadium-themed starting zone like that, cheerleader carrying quarterback, neither ironic nor comical. Just two immortals weaving love through the shape of every world they entered.

-

[Scene: Poketopia – Neo-Evoir City, Shallow Lakeside]

The sky above Neo-Evoir City glowed in soft amber as the sun began its descent, casting long reflections over the tranquil shallow lake that wound through the central park of Poketopia. The water shimmered like polished glass, disturbed only by ripples from Vaporeon's graceful steps.

In her arms, Flareon rested calmly in butler fashion, arms lightly draped around her shoulders, his tail flicking in playful sync with her gait. She held him bridal-style, just as they often did in their cherished VR games, maid carrying butler, but now in quiet real-world serenity.

The lake was shallow enough to cross, but Vaporeon insisted on carrying him.

“You walked all day,” she had said. “Let me take you the rest.”

But halfway through, a sudden blast of cold struck the lake’s surface. A shimmering mist, followed by a sudden crackle of ice magic. The water around Vaporeon's legs abruptly froze, up to her thighs. The motion halted. The prank had backfired.

“Ninetales…” Flareon mumbled under his breath, sensing who was responsible.

From the treeline, a faint giggle vanished behind a snowy tuft.

Still cradled in her arms, Flareon’s inner heat aura began to radiate gently. The warmth pulsed in waves, not furious or flaming, but steady like a hearth in winter. The ice began to melt, drop by drop, his ambient warmth freeing her limbs without her needing to struggle.

She smiled as she looked down at him. “I guess I’m the one being carried now.”

He looked up at her, smile soft and unguarded. “I’ll always melt you out. You carry the weight, I carry the fire.”

The ice fully dissolved. The rippling water returned, flowing beneath them, the surface echoing with soft waves, like a torch carried on tide, love enduring even in elemental mischief.

And so she continued walking, her arms around her eternal partner, the tide carrying her flame, the flame keeping her free.

-

[Scene: Evoir – Temperature Calibration Lab, Neo-Evoir City]

The sleek, glass-walled temperature lab shimmered under the glow of crystal-lit panels, a high-tech facility rarely used for competitions, until now.

Vaporeon stood in the center, clipboard in paw, tail swishing as she wore a mock-serious expression. A digital thermometer floated beside her, calibrated precisely to 0.000001 accuracy. She glanced at the two buckets in front of her, one gently boiling, the other crusted in hoarfrost.

Across from each other stood the elemental duelists:
Flareon, exuding intense radiance with the playful grin of a boy ready to show off.
Alolan Ninetales, dignified yet determined, the tips of her snowy fur glowing faint blue.

“I apologize again for the lake stunt.” Ninetales said, bowing her head lightly. “I didn’t expect it to freeze that suddenly.”

“No hard feelings.” Flareon smirked, “But now we settle it... the 69°C challenge.”

“Accepted!” she replied coolly, her breath visibly frosting the air.

-

[Moment Later – Calibration Round Begins]

Flareon stepped forward first, conjuring a precise burst of flame into the water bucket. It bubbled steadily as he held his paw over it like a chef monitoring soup. After a few seconds, he stepped back with confidence.

Alolan Ninetales approached hers, encasing it with a swirling blizzard spiral. The ice crept inward like petals folding in reverse, until the center crystallized to absolute stillness.

Vaporeon carefully dipped the thermometer into Flareon’s bucket. The display blinked for a moment, then read out:

69.696999°C

Flareon puffed his chest proudly.

Then she turned to Ninetales’ frozen bucket. The probe pierced the surface like glass cracking under light pressure. A moment later:

–69.666999°C

A brief pause.

All three of them said it in chorus:

“…Nice.”

They all burst into soft, controlled laughter, Vaporeon covering her face with a paw, Flareon bending slightly with a snort, and even Alolan Ninetales letting out a rare, melodic giggle.

“You win by decimals.” Flareon nodded toward her.

“No...” Ninetales smirked, “we’re both professionals in extreme conditions.”

“Still,” Vaporeon said, clearing her throat and regaining her judge voice, “the real winner is the science of friendship… and math jokes.”

“Boo.” Flareon grinned.

-

[Scene: Death Loop Tablet – Thermal Gauntlet Level]
The air sizzled, crackled, and froze in mad alternation. In a nightmarish simulation of fire, ice, and drowning hazard roulette, Regigigas lumbered forward with heavy, slow-paced leaps. Below him, Sharpedos swarmed in frigid waters, snapping their teeth at anything that dared touch the surface. Above him, flamethrower turrets swung back and forth like wicked pendulums, while ice spikes jutted out from unpredictable directions.

The platforms beneath him were either slick with frost or steaming with heat, often both within seconds. Fire pillars hissed upward. Ice fragments shattered underfoot. The temperature gauge above the screen flickered like a dying signal.

Regigigas cursed under his breath as another fireball nicked his arm.

"Temperature error: 999°C to -999°C detected."
"Pain level adjusted."

“Of course it is,” he muttered, ducking just in time before an ice spike grazed his back.

-

[Scene: Streaming Room – VBend Hub, Neo-Evoir Orbit]
Cosmician Sandslash, wearing his full streamer headset and plush gaming chair, watched intently, one paw dipping into hot soup, the other scooping ice cream. The thermal contrast didn't bother him, it was on theme. His overlay chat buzzed as viewers laughed, sent tips, and threw emojis of fire and snowflakes.

Chat: “He’s dodging like a toaster in a blizzard LMAO”
Chat: “Can Sharpedo bite through legendary plates?”
Chat: “WHAT’S THIS TEMPERATURE RNG???”

“LET’S GOOOOOO, GIGAS!” Sandslash shouted with a grin. “This is your redemption arc! Don’t let the Sharpedos get your ankles again!”

As he prepared his next comment overlay, VBend suddenly activated, syncing his avatar live on-stream. Sandslash blinked, and in an instant... 

He appeared on the virtual side screen as a girl in a cropped “Gamer Girl” T-shirt and sparkly skirt, complete with bold eyeliner and sassy pose. The transformation was seamless.

He tilted his head, looked at the screen, then deadpanned into the mic:

“…Yep. VBend got me again. Genderbent mid-soup.”
He flexed with mock pride. “Still handsome. Let’s stream it anyway.”

Chat exploded.

Chat: “Gamer Girl Sandslash arc LET’S GO”
Chat: “You slay. Literally.”
Chat: “She’s beauty, she’s grace, she’s the soup queen of space”

Back inside the game, Regigigas saw the “Gamer Girl Sandslash” avatar cheering him from a floating screen above, giving thumbs-ups between bites.

“YOU CAN DO IT,” Sandslash’s squeaky genderbent voice echoed.
“Just don’t fall in the soup.”

Regigigas sighed heavily, dodged a flaming platform, then got hit by a freeze beam.

“…I miss being in a forest.”

-----------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------

Ch 68 : Extraterrestrial Food Run

[Scene: Interplanetary Route – En Route to Div-9K]
Cosmician Sandslash leaned back in his loop-powered space cruiser, a grin stretched across his snout. The spacecraft, shaped like a giant metallic Sonic loop-de-loop, spun violently in a blur of rings and centrifugal energy. The Sonic Space Loop engine roared louder the faster it looped, converting childlike nostalgia into quantum propulsion.

“Alrighty, seven-day chill trip to Div-9K.” Sandslash muttered into his mic, licking a scoop of mochi-styled ice cream. “Just me, my chat, interstellar snacks... and my eternally cursed guest.”

He turned to the side, a secure containment glass tablet pulsed in the co-pilot’s seat, held upright by stabilizing rings and layered protective charms. Inside it: Regigigas, still in his Death Loop Tablet, currently mid-game and very not chill.

-

[Scene Within the Death Loop Tablet – Regi Rush Zone]
Regigigas, with his colossal frame cartoonishly squashed into the shape of a Sonic knockoff, was sprinting through a jagged 2D side-scrolling hellscape. Below: pits of spikes. Above: flamethrower drones. Timer: ticking toward zero.

He crushed a speed boost orb, dodged an anvil, and barely slid under a collapsing wall of magma bricks.

“REGI RUSH: ACT 4 – OGI ONIONLAND”

At the far end of the horizon, his reward and exit bait floated gloriously: giant golden onion rings, pulsing with unhealthy fats and sweet scent illusions.

“GET TO THE ONION RINGS IN TEN MINUTES OR DIE FROM SPACE SUFFOCATION.”
“IF YOU WIN: DEATH BY HEART FAILURE. SOFTER. MORE DIGNIFIED.”
“TIME REMAINING: 01:23”

He grunted in pain as an unexpected spring trap launched him backward into a cryonic wind tunnel. A red warning blinked:

“YOU SLIPPED ON GARLIC GREASE – STAMINA REDUCED.”

“Who built this level?” Regigigas wheezed, struggling to move.

-

[Scene: Back to Reality – Sonic Loop Cruiser Cockpit]
“...Right, chat, he's getting to the onions...” Sandslash said with a mouthful of popcorn, leaning into the camera in his VBend girl form, now with virtual sunglasses and his “LOOP ME HARDER” t-shirt. “If he makes it, it’s a fatty death, not a vacuum scream one.”

The chat exploded.

Chat: “RUN REGI RUN”
Chat: “SUFFER FOR THE RINGS”
Chat: “LOOPED SO HARD HE BECAME HIS OWN FAN GAME”

The Sonic Space Loop passed another moon, looping again.

-

[Scene: Final 10 Seconds – Inside Regigigas’ Game]
He launched off the final hill. The giant onion ring monument glowed with triumphant grease light. Regigigas panted, he could taste the caramelized burn.

5 seconds.

He dove, face first, into the onion ring portal.

-

[Scene: Space Cruiser]
The tablet flashed “SOFT DEATH UNLOCKED – cardiac arrest simulated in sleep mode.”

Cosmician Sandslash nodded. “Good job, big guy. You earned your onion.”

He leaned back, engines humming gently now as they neared Div-9K, stars bending softly around the curved windows. A warm silence filled the cruiser cabin, punctuated only by Sandslash spooning ice cream into his mouth.

“Next game,” he whispered, “Regigigas becomes a cooking papa…”

-

[Scene: Div-9K – Electro Market District, Noonlight Haze]
The Sonic Space Loop cruiser touched down gently, kicking up electric pollen dust from the vibrant glowing plants that laced the walkways of Div-9K. Neon petals shimmered in midair, and delivery drones buzzed overhead like cicadas on espresso.

From the open market plaza, a loud voice rang out.

“Yo! Long time, Sandslash!”

Enefftian Scovillain, a rare Grass/Electric variant of his species with hypercharged twin heads and a stylish utility vest, was carefully unloading a cart of locally grown electro-chillis, handing over a crate to a tall, buff human with kitchen scars and martial bandages: Pizzero, Fighting-type-typed, the battle-chef of Div-9K.

Pizzero grinned. “These’ll light up the tongues and the scoreboard.”

Cosmician Sandslash, still in his VBend girl avatar, waved and jogged over. “Need a tour guide, and you’re the spice trail boss. I wanna see how Div-9K’s eating these days.”

Scovillain chuckled, his electric tendrils flaring with pride. “You’re a customer again, huh? Alright. Let’s start with the Voltage Alley.”

Sandslash nodded, carrying the Death Loop Tablet under one arm like a clipboard.

-

[Scene: Within the Death Loop Tablet – Regigigas: DoughMaze Horror]
Inside the flickering screen:

Regigigas now lumbered through a nightmare-flavored digital maze, modeled after a parody version of Pac-Man. The grid shimmered with sprinkled donut dots, each one reducing his final pain level if eaten. The background was a dissonant lullaby remix, warped like a broken record.

MISSION: CONSUME ALL DONUTS BEFORE BEING DRAINED.
“DEATH GOAL: TYPE-3 DIABETES WITH SUGAR COMA EUTHANASIA”
ENEMIES: GENGAR ILLUSIONS x4 – CONTACT = DREAM EATER

He turned a corner, just as a giggling Gengar illusion phased in from a wall, shimmering purple with psychic residue.

“DREAM EATER ENGAGED.”

The titan's heavy legs slowed. The maze bent sideways. Sprinkles melted into teeth. His head pounded, nightmare loops, personal regrets, and flashes of Saga 3 flashed before his mind. His body became heavy with syrupy dread.

Outside the tablet, a red warning blinked:
[MENTAL COLLAPSE IMMINENT – DREAM SPIKE 87%]

-

[Scene: Voltage Alley – Div-9K]
“Yo, uh, your guy’s getting munched by dreams again.” Scovillain warned, noticing the flicker.

Sandslash clicked his tongue. “Eh, he'll walk it off. The donut ones are kinder deaths compared to the lava races.”

He gently tapped the tablet. “C’mon big guy. You can tank one Gengar bite.”

Scovillain led them past neon spice stands, thunderfruit cafes, and an open-air VR salon.

Pizzero caught up, holding a mini-calzone and flipping it like a kunai. “Hey, if your titan buddy wakes up and wants to die eating, I got this twelve-layer electric lasagna. One slice’ll shut down an elephant.”

Sandslash’s eyes lit up behind gamer girl glasses. “Add that to the mercy meal tier.”

-

[Scene: Voltage Alley Pizza Stand – Div-9K, Afternoon Heat Pulse]
The neon buzz of the market was briefly interrupted by a flustered voice.

Pizzero, wiping sweat from his brow with a fireproof towel, leaned closer to Cosmician Sandslash, who was still cheerfully posing in his VBend girl-mode.

“Hey uh… buddy. Mind turning off the avatar filter for now?”
He scratched the back of his neck, eyes awkwardly darting away.
“I’m kinda… women-shy. You know. Can’t focus when you’re rocking the whole… gamer skirt thing.”

Sandslash blinked. Then sighed, half-laughing. “Fair enough.”

With a flick of his console ring, the VBend filter shimmered off, and Cosmician Sandslash returned to his default male form, broad-shouldered, sandy armored plating polished with a casual matte, and a backpack still hung with energy drink clips.

“Better?”

Pizzero relaxed visibly. “Much.”

He placed an order into the terminal. “Four electro-chilli pizzas, two with double plasma sauce.”

Just then, he glanced at the Death Loop Tablet, which was now perched upright on the table.
The glow flickered… and the screen burst into movement.

-

[Scene: Inside Death Loop Tablet – Regigigas: Pizzero Tower]
Cue distorted jazz horns and clanging pans.
Regigigas was sprinting across an absurdly vertical tower of crumbling platforms and chaotic pizza traps, in a side-scrolling fever dream called:

“Pizzero Tower: Regigigas Remix”
“Your Goal: Get Too Fat To Live. Outrun the Pizza-Tyrant Before He Grates You.”

He ground-pounded through cheese golems, dodge-rolled past pineapple traps, and wall-jumped off parmesan cliffs.

The boss chaser, a terrifying Tyranitar illusion shaped like an overbaked slice, roared behind him, crust ablaze.

Regigigas surged forward, final room, a mountain of pizzas awaited.

He devoured them all, even the anchovy-loaded horror.
Screen flashed:

“P-RANK ACHIEVED – BITTERSWEET DEATH INCOMING.”

His sprite inflated to absurd proportions. The screen gently faded to a soft piano note and a title card:

“Cause of Death: Delicious Overload – Well Done.”

-

[Scene: Voltage Alley Table – Div-9K]
The performance ended. The screen dimmed.

Cosmician Sandslash tapped the record stop button.

Pizzero raised his eyebrows, genuinely impressed. “That was... incredible.”

Enefftian Scovillain whistled, arms crossed. “He P-ranked that? That game made a 900 IQ Xurkitree cry on stream.”

Sandslash stretched his arms, smiling. “Titan still got it. Death with flavor.”

Then came a faint buzz from the tablet, a text prompt:

REGIGIGAS REQUEST: ORDER CELEBRATORY PIZZA – SHAPE: ME
TOPPINGS: THICK CRUST. LOTS OF ONIONS.

Sandslash laughed aloud. “He wants a Regigigas-shaped pizza.”

Pizzero cracked his knuckles. “Then I better make it. You don’t ignore a death loop champion’s last meal, even if he’s got a hundred more coming.”

Scovillain high-fived Sandslash, eyes gleaming. “This is why Div-9K’s the best vacation spot. Even deaths are gourmet here.”

-

[Scene: Voltage Alley – Div-9K Open Market, Sunset Orange Haze]
The scent of sizzling electro-chillis filled the alleyway as another customer duo strolled into view:
Divian Empoleon, a tall, regal Water/Poison Pokémon with sleek navy-blue armor plating, walked confidently beside his longtime neighbor, the graceful Divian Milotic, her long, vine-wrapped fins flowing like silk and eyes gleaming like dew-touched leaves.

The two stopped abruptly at the sight of the Regigigas-shaped pizza being boxed up.

Empoleon (raising an eyebrow): “Is that… meant to be who I think it is?”

Sandslash (nodding proudly): “Yep. P-ranked his own doom in Pizzero Tower. Had to reward that, obviously.”

Before Empoleon could reply, Scovillain sparked a bolt from his fingertips to re-energize the soil plot beside the oven, a crackle of greenish-blue electricity struck the local pepper crop.

Divian Milotic gasped, jumped with a flutter... 
...and instinctively leapt into Empoleon’s arms.

Empoleon (steady, amused): “Still the same reflexes, huh?”

She blinked, embarrassed, as Empoleon gently lowered her.

Meanwhile, behind the counter, Pizzero had vanished, ducking behind his prep station again, cheeks flushed red.

Milotic noticed.

Her eyes widened, a little mischievous sparkle in them, then, without missing a beat, she dove behind a tall pizza crate, whispering:

Milotic: “If he’s gonna hide, I’m hiding too. Rules of mutual shyness.”

There was a short, stunned silence…
Then Sandslash, Empoleon, and Scovillain all burst out laughing.

From behind the crate, Milotic called playfully, “You can come out now, Pizzero. I promise I won’t sparkle too hard.”

Gingerly, Pizzero peeked over the counter, then seeing Milotic still half-hiding, he managed a bashful smile and finally stood up straight.

Pizzero: “Empoleon, good to see you again. One Regigigas Special?”

Empoleon: “Yes, and pass my congrats to Sandslash. That death looked glorious.”

Cosmician Sandslash (grinning): “Most painful heart failure ever streamed. I’m putting it on my channel’s banner.”

Empoleon chuckled, placing the order. Milotic slowly stood too, brushing some imaginary dust off her leafy fins, pretending the last two minutes hadn’t happened.

-

[Scene: Voltage Alley – Div-9K, same location, still sunset-tinted]
The wind whooshed loud.

Suddenly... 
A thudding metal clatter echoed through the square.

A runaway robot, sparking and wobbling, sped past the group. Behind it, a young woman, clearly human, athletic build, dressed in molten-orange overalls and flaming skirt, her flame-scorched ponytail whipping behind her, chased after it.

Human Woman (Fire/Ground, panting): “Stop! Stop, you half-baked weldpot!”

BOOM!

The robot detonated into a small fireball. A metallic leg flew into a fruit stand. The woman, thrown by the shockwave, flailed mid-air... 

Pizzero blinked once, dashed like a fighting flash...
...and caught her bridal-style inches before she hit the bubbling shallow canal (a swimming pool) beside the alley.

The others paused in awe.

Sandslash (impressed): “Yo.”

Empoleon (soft chuckle): “He’s still got reflexes.”

Scovillain (grinning): “Smooth!”

Milotic peeked out from her hiding spot behind the crate, eyes wide.

Pizzero landed lightly on his feet, placed the stunned woman gently on the nearby bench.

Pizzero (quickly, flustered): “You okay? You smell like scorched curry but you’re light as dough.”

Fire/Ground Woman (blushing): “Y-yeah… I think I broke three ribs and my dignity.”

Before she could say more, Pizzero sprinted away again, diving behind the large crate... 

...but instead of hiding beside Milotic, he accidentally dove right into her, knocking them both into the narrow space between boxes and rolling directly into the entrance hatch of his Chillicano pizza ship’s side compartment.

Metal doors shut.

Milotic (inside, faintly): “…I’m not sparkling too hard, I swear.”

Outside:

Sandslash and Scovillain burst into full-on laughter, leaning on each other.
Empoleon tried to keep a straight face, but his muffled snorts betrayed him.

Regigigas, watching all this in his Death Loop Tablet (now playing a Dating Sim game where failure leads to being ghosted into oblivion), laughed out loud for the first time in weeks.

Regigigas (text bubble): “BEST DEATH BY EMBARRASSMENT: UNLOCKED.”

-----------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------

Ch 69: So Nice

[Scene: Living Room and then Lab]

Alolan Ninetales sat gracefully on a fluffy sofa in the living room, still dressed in her trademark sky-blue sundress that flowed like icy mist. With a half-smile and a wink to the audience, she said coolly, “Welcome to Chapter 69… Nice.”

She stretched out her legs, tail curling with anticipation. “Let’s continue the thermometer challenge.” she declared, elegance meeting mischief.

Soon after, the front door slid open. In walked Flareon, the forever butler, steam gently rising from his fur, followed by his radiant wife Vaporeon, the eternal maid. Both beamed with childish excitement.

On Flareon’s side of the challenge: a bubbling pot of vegetable soup flavored with spicy herbs and roasted roots. As the steam danced into the air, Vaporeon dipped the thermometer into the broth.

“69.9669°C.”

“Perfect.” Flareon grinned with pride, steam puffing out from his cheeks.

On the opposite side, Alolan Ninetales revealed her treat: a delicate glass bowl of fruit-infused ice water, frozen just right to create a shimmering fruit ice cream sorbet. Vaporeon measured the chilled mix.

“-69.6699°C.”

“Nice symmetry!” Ninetales said with a smug tilt of her head.

Just then, the door creaked open again.

Lil Eve, still in her seifuku school uniform, blinked curiously. “What are my parents and Aunt Ninetales doing?” she sniffed the air, catching the rich aroma of veggie soup.

Trailing behind her was her boyfriend, Keldeo, dressed in his neat black gakuran jacket. The two walked over and peered at the thermometer readings.

Together, with a deadpan blink and instant harmony, they said:

“…Nice.”

Vaporeon burst out laughing, tail slapping the tile floor. “She gets it!” she said proudly. “Our girl really gets it.”

Once the soup cooled to eatable warmth, and the frozen fruit sorbet softened just enough, Gardevoir, dressed in her formal policewoman coat, arrived to act as the impartial judge. She tasted both with absolute seriousness.

“Shockingly good!” she finally admitted, licking the spoon with quiet awe.

-

[Scene: HydroPyro Café – Steamy Branch]

Later that day, the vegetable soup was ladled and shared at the HydroPyro Café’s steamy branch, warmed by Flareon’s fire. The fruit sorbet was brought in a frost-lined carrier by Vaporeon and Ninetales, chilled to perfection.

Customers raved. The combination was a “thermal fusion tasting event.”

And in the corner of the chalkboard menu, a playful title was scribbled by Lil Eve:

Chapter 69 Special: Nice.

The challenge had become a new seasonal tradition.

The warm buzz of conversation filled the café as diners sipped steaming soup and spooned delicate fruit sorbet, laughter floating beneath the clinks of spoons and cups.

Just then, the glass door slid open with a ding, and in strutted Cosmician Sandslash, wearing his relaxed streamer hoodie over a flashy vest printed with star maps. He held up his portable cam drone with one paw, waving to his followers.

“Yo viewers, we’re live from HydroPyro Café's Chapter 69 Special... and yeah, it’s exactly what you think.”

Following behind him, Regigigas’s Death Loop Tablet floated in with quiet humming, projecting the titan’s current game. The screen displayed a burning digital battlefield of flaming cannons and frost traps. Regigigas, sluggish but determined, was dodging hazards while solving a live math challenge.

The question blinked across the screen:

| What is √9 × 23?

Fireballs rained from above. Ice beams skimmed the bottom floor. Regigigas had only seconds. He leapt across falling platforms, stomped a fake answer button ("115"), slipped on a slippery tile, and at the last possible second…

BOOM... he landed on “69.”

The crowd inside the café jolted and turned toward the tablet’s screen.

“69!” someone shouted.

The answer confirmed with a green flash.

Perfect answer. Minimal death.

Everyone clapped as a fireball barely missed the titan’s head.

-

Alolan Ninetales, ever so elegantly resting at the dessert counter, lifted her teacup and smirked.

“Fun fact...” she said coolly. “Sixty-nine squared is 4,761. Sixty-nine cubed is 328,509.”

She flicked her tail dramatically.

“Notice anything, darlings? Together, both numbers use every digit from 0 to 9. No repeats. No omissions.”

The café went silent for a moment.

Then, everyone said in unison:

“Nice.”

-

Cosmician Sandslash sipped his fruit-chili soda and grinned to the camera.
“This entire planet just gets it.”

-

[Scene: Outside HydroPyro Café – Steamy Branch]

A cool breeze rolled through the plaza outside the café as the diners inside still chuckled from the Regigigas math moment.

Dragonvee, the radiant daughter of space and timelines, stepped gracefully down the street in her shimmering temporal maid uniform, deep violet with golden clockwork embroidery subtly ticking along the hem. She adjusted her glasses with pride, noticing the familiar auras ahead.

She blinked.

Vaporeon, her eternally majestic mother, was proudly holding Flareon upside-down in a ridiculous flourish, his tails flopping down like a chandelier as his butler uniform stayed neatly pressed despite gravity's betrayal. His cheeks puffed in silent protest, a faint blush beneath his fur.

The moment Vaporeon spotted Dragonvee…

“You saw nothing...” she declared in mock-seriousness, instantly rotating Flareon into a perfect bridal carry, her arms firm and her smirk smug.
Flareon gave a helpless sigh, then shyly nuzzled her shoulder anyway.

-

Nearby on a frosted garden bench, Lil Eve stood up with her seifuku skirt swaying, holding a glowing Frost Print stylus. She giggled, spun once, and tapped the air.

From thin vapor, a perfect ice sculpture formed midair:

- A glowing 69, ornate and translucent.

- Below it, two koi-like fish frozen nose-to-tail in a mirrored spiral, a symbol of playful duality.

The café doors swung open briefly as those inside looked out and saw the masterpiece.

“Nice.” they echoed again.

-

Then, like lightning, Lil Eve revved her Electro Drift shoes, zooming toward Keldeo across the plaza in a charged blur.

“I’m gonna get you, stallion~”

“Wai...” Keldeo didn’t finish.

She pounced, tackling him into the soft grass with a spark-filled impact. With giggling confidence, she kissed him full on the lips, pinning him down with a satisfied grin and frizzed-up hair.

From the Death Loop Tablet still floating near the café, even Regigigas chuckled weakly at the romance slam.

Cosmician Sandslash, still streaming, gave a thumbs-up.

“Chapter 69 still delivering.”

-

[Scene: Regigigas's Death Loop Tablet – Math Doom Arena]

Inside the surreal digital deathtrap, Regigigas was mid-leap between melting ice tiles and fireball cannons. His breath was heavy. The distorted robotic announcer voice rang:

"Solve or Die: sin(69°), Choose your fate."

Four glowing platforms hovered in the lava mist below, each labeled:

A) 0.969

B) 0.699

C) 0.934

D) 0.500

Regigigas, battered but focused, narrowed his eyes.

"No memes!" he growled under his breath, dodging a rogue icicle.

He stomped down onto C) 0.934, the true answer. The platform lit gold. A choir of harmonized Pikachu voices cheered in Latin.

A giant floating Pi-symbol pie descended slowly, glowing with golden crust and raspberry swirls shaped like sine waves.

"Cause of death: Overwhelming delight."
"Category: Trigonom-nom-nometry."

Regigigas grunted with faint pride as he munched away.

-

[Scene: HydroPyro Café – Staff Lounge]

Alolan Ninetales lounged across a velvet bench, sipping from her glacier martini. The projector screen in the corner flickered on, playing archived recordings from the Enefftian sector.

Onscreen, a brightly colored ad played from an unlicensed MMO gacha:

“Unlock forbidden skins for your battle fox now!!”
“69% for uncommon body oils! 6.9% for mythic poses!”
“Now hijacking Neo-Earth’s Play Store with seductive flair!!”

The Enefftian Ninetales descendant on screen did a suggestive wink, then got covered in glitter confetti.

Alolan Ninetales squinted… slowly blinking.

She sipped her drink.

“…Not sure if nice… or legally concerning.”

Cosmician Sandslash, still streaming from a corner, tried to stifle laughter while slowly turning the camera toward her face.

Vaporeon shouted from the kitchen: “Definitely not our brand, don't download that!!”

Flareon muttered: “This is why we check permissions…”

Lil Eve poked her head out and whispered: “...is that your niece?”

Alolan Ninetales: “Not anymore.”

-

[Scene: HydroPyro Café – Lounge, Evening Heat & Chill Hour]

A faint shimmer of psychic distortion spiraled above the projector. Lil Eve, in her crisp seifuku with the ends glowing faintly, narrowed her gaze. Her eyes flared into indigo intensity as she used Psybeam Focus, levitating the offending gacha tape like a cursed artifact. She spun it dramatically.

Alolan Ninetales: “Execute it. No mercy.”

Lil Eve smiled faintly. With a twist of her tail, she unleashed a stylized Pulsive Foul Play, a rippling force of chaotic justice embedded with meme retaliation.

The tape burst midair with a shatter-snap!

The crowd, without missing a beat, roared:

"Nice."

-

[Scene: Still in the café, seconds later]

The snap! sound of the tape caught Flareon off-guard, instincts overriding chill. He yelped softly and leapt reflexively, into the waiting arms of Vaporeon, who caught him effortlessly, bridal-style as always. She didn’t even blink, only smirked and held him tighter.

They paused.

Then, just because they could:
They kissed. 69 times.

Every kiss sweet, slow, and with growing steam, by kiss #28, Vaporeon had shifted into full glow-hug mode, and by #69, Flareon was melting into her.

Lil Eve, leaning with a cheeky fang-smile:

“Nice.”

Next to her, Keldeo choked on his tea, flushed bright red.

Lil Eve (tilting close): “You’re next, Gakuran boy.”

He gulped again. Harder.

-

[Scene: Chronoscene Reflector Room – Elsewhere]

The door creaked as Alolan Ninetales stepped in, still in her timeless sky blue sundress, now looking nostalgic.

Inside, Gardevoir, forever composed in her police uniform, tapped holo-screens monitoring web traffic with digital flame tags labeled:
“porkyman dot com” – Status: Safe filter engaged. Adult verification: passed.”

She glanced at the counter:

“69 visitors today.”

Paused.

“Nice.”

Ninetales approached gently with two carefully packed memory albums. One for Gardevoir.

69 photos of her with Lucario, in quiet moments, battlefield glories, shy embraces at dawn.

And one for herself:
69 photos with Mamoswine, silly snowball wars, summer beach stumbles, frost-bitten cuddles.

Gardevoir touched a photo softly, her lips trembling between smile and ache.

“Nice… and bittersweet.”

Ninetales knelt and ran quiet mental arithmetic, tail tips glowing faintly as the photo resolutions uploaded.

“All resized to fit: 6969 x 6969 pixels.”

A solemn pause.

Then together, like a ritual:

“Nice.”

-----------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------

Ch 70 : Evoir Shielded from Gamble MOBA Pandemic

[Scene 1: The Discovery]
[Setting: Cosmician Sandslash’s cozy planetary data den, dimly lit, screens floating around him.]

Cosmician Sandslash leaned back in his anti-grav chair, idly flicking through interplanetary game streams. A pop-up appeared, loud and gaudy:

“New 5v5 MOBA! Trade Dividends, Last-Hit to Win!”

Curious, he opened it, and immediately recoiled.

“...Ew. NFT777-Enefftia garbage. A last-hit scam dragon MOBA?”

Onscreen, humans flailed in laggy combat against bots, teammates included. Lootboxes dropped from the dragon like casino chips. It was Humanity Dividend UNITED, and it was everything wrong with gaming.

He hit Record Stream and spoke calmly to the mic:

“Alright folks, this game is shitty. Do not play. It’s all bots, it’s pay-to-win, and yeah, it’s from Enefftia. What did you expect?”

-

[Scene 2: Judgement Room]
[Setting: Chronoscene Reflector Room, polished like glass, runes blinking gently.]

Gardevoir stood in quiet vigilance, overseeing live feed pings across the planetary network. A flag blinked: “Content Report: NFT777 Suspicion”.

With a flick, she reviewed the stream. The name of the game alone earned a raised brow. When she saw the gameplay and exploitative mechanics, she didn’t hesitate.

“Predatory pay structure. Bot inflation. And advertised as competitive?”

She lifted her badge and issued a command:

“Humanity Dividend UNITED: Banned. Interplanetary-wide.”

The badge pulsed blue, and the title was scrubbed from all legal channels.

-

[Scene 3: Regigigas’ Loop Continues]
[Setting: HydroPyro Café, back booth, Regigigas hunched over the Death Loop Tablet.]

Regigigas was locked in another simulated match. A fake MOBA match. On-screen, he moved carefully across a digital lane, alone against illusion bots, all former limited-bot-roster enemies.

He was 1v9, and the win condition was simple: last-hit a fast-moving Rayquaza illusion.

Cosmician Sandslash entered the café and noticed the glowing tablet.

“No… don’t tell me they echoed into your tablet too.”

Regigigas didn’t look up.

“They did. They always do.”

An Illusion Snorlax barreled down midlane, slamming an AOE stun that forced Regigigas to blink-dash backwards. Meanwhile, a Talonflame illusion rained fake crits from above, shouting pre-recorded trash talk like:

“Buy the premium wings to fly faster!”

Regigigas growled:

“Shitty MOBA casino scumbag devs…”

-

[Scene 4: Echo Filter Online]
[Setting: Back room of HydroPyro, Sandslash and Regigigas at a diagnostics table.]

Sandslash plugged into the tablet's audio-echo receiver system. He wrote a new script:
Echo Rejection Protocol v1.0

It filtered game titles and viral phrases associated with Enefftian gacha-bloatware, preventing them from influencing Regigigas’ tablet simulations.

“It’s not a perfect fix,” Sandslash warned, “but it’ll keep that specific garbage out.”

Regigigas nodded.

“I’ve died worse. But I’d rather not die from fake Talonflame ult spam.”

Sandslash smiled grimly.

“Then let’s make sure that era stays dead.”

-

[Scene 5: Chronoscene Reflector – The Unholy Truth]
[Setting: Gardevoir’s monitoring room, soft luminescent rings scanning across floating panels.]

Alolan Ninetales stepped in, her sky blue sundress trailing lightly. Her gaze was immediately drawn to a specific flagged recording on the largest panel. It was the game they had just banned, Humanity Dividend UNITED, but not from archives. It was live.

From the fractured reflection of Neo-Earth, real humans were still playing it.

What they saw next left both speechless.

- A working man, eyes sunken, lost five matches in a row. The stream cut mid-frame, his suicide note left on his desk.

- A teenager, screaming profanity at his mother after a ranked loss. He was arrested after assaulting his father.

- Another adult, pale and shaking, had spent his rent on premium skins. His girlfriend left. He walked onto a train track that night.

- A younger boy in a schoolyard, slamming his phone and screaming incoherently. His classmates filmed it, not understanding. They just called him “the MOBAddict.”

Alolan Ninetales turned her head, tearless but stunned.

“Good riddance...” she said coldly.
Gardevoir nodded in silence. “But Neo-Earth… they welcomed this filth.”

-

[Scene 6: NFT777-Enefftia – Schemes in Motion]
[Setting: A tall black tower lit by spinning gacha wheels, symbols of scamming pride.]

In a private upper floor suite, Enefftian Pikachu sat smugly behind a desk littered with profit charts. Holograms displayed rising engagement, even from angry users.

He looked out the window at a planetary feed showing Gravitation55, where protests called for his execution. He smiled.

“Let them cry...” he muttered. “War makes markets. I’ll replace Rillaboom as general soon enough.”

In walked Serenede, commander of NFT777-Enefftia and a human girl with a conviction for strategy over greed. Flanking her was Enefftian Ninetales, fire/psychic type, elegant and persuasive, and indirectly descended from Alolan Ninetales herself.

“Why the suffering?” they asked in unison. “This isn’t what we built.”

Enefftian Pikachu shrugged.

“Gacha’s just a mechanic. It's the people that lose to themselves.”

But he didn’t say the truth: that it was designed to be that way. He needed Serenede’s credibility and Ninetales’ allure to sell more digital lies. He used them. And they didn’t yet see it.

-

[Scene 7: Evoir – The Boundary of Compassion]
[Setting: Nightfall in the elevated Chronoscene Spire, gentle wind fluttering cloth.]

Gardevoir turned off the feed, looking distant.

“We can't cross timelines or save everyone.” she said. “Only those who step here, or those who choose peace.”

Alolan Ninetales sat beside her, folding a paper petal quietly in ritual.

“Then may those beyond us find wisdom through their pain…
…because if not even the pandemic was enough, nothing we say will reach them.”

They both looked up, Evoir's stars twinkled as ever. Eternal, unbroken.

From this distance, the fire and noise of Enefftia and Neo-Earth were but echoes, fading into space.

And Evoir remained untouched.

-----------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------

Ch 71 : Scam Fallout Dystopia Planets Pt 1

[Scene – Ice Fairy Reflections]
Alolan Ninetales, forever draped in her sky blue sundress, sat once again in the Chronoscene Reflector room. A bucket of icy fairy popcorn in hand, she gazed into the monitor, brushing her fur delicately as the images of Neo-Earth flickered.

“I used to run a little ice cream decoration shop in Pokeplanet,” she told the viewer with a quiet smile. “Low profile, low stress. Mamoswine, my beloved, guarded the cold zones of Poketopia before he passed. And now I’m here, in Evoir… immortal since the start of Saga 4. Funny how life turns.”

She popped another cold-puff kernel into her mouth, then turned her gaze grim.

“And humans… they just keep digging holes deeper.”

-

[Scene – Humanity, Divided by Design]
Back on Neo-Earth, the game Humanity Dividend UNITED had already destabilized social trust. But Enefftian Pikachu wasn’t finished.
Now he added a multi-level marketing scheme, one that rewarded recruiters with fake promises of wealth via gacha skin sales.

The outcome was nuclear in spirit:

- Crime skyrocketed.

- Addiction spread like virus.

- Entire cities rioted over leaderboard placements.

- World leaders themselves became addicted to the illusion of “earning” through play.

And through it all, Enefftian Pikachu wore a smile of cuteness, a false mask, while feeding fake status reports to Serenede and Enefftian Ninetales.

-

[Scene – Enter the Rillaboom]
It wasn’t Serenede, nor her gacha partner, who unveiled the lie.
It was Enefftian Rillaboom, the true general, tired of the whispers.

Seeing the disorder firsthand, Rillaboom took control.
He deployed Enefftian forces and colonized Neo-Earth outright. Humanity, already broken and bitterly divided, collapsed under foreign rule.

Some Diamond-666 exiles, now refugees-turned-friends of Enefftia, watched smugly:

“Told you so, Neo-Earthlings. Elitism never saved you.”

-

[Scene – Turnabout: The Mastermind Falls]
Serenede and Enefftian Ninetales, finally putting the pieces together, realized they’d been used, their creative gacha designs twisted into weapons of war. They leaked the truth behind Enefftian Pikachu’s manipulation.

The backlash was immediate.

General Rillaboom, furious at being a puppet in Pikachu’s plan, turned on him.
Enefftian Pikachu was stripped of rank and enslaved, forced to live among the broken humans he once ruled.

His smile faded for good.

-

[Scene – Viewer’s POV: “Just… What.”]
Back in Evoir, Alolan Ninetales slumped in her seat, snow-flecked popcorn tumbling from her fingers.

She blinked.
Once.
Twice.
Then, deadpan:

“…What even was that? Did reality just unpatch itself?”

She sighed deeply.

“No one in Evoir would fall for that, right? …Right?”

She paused, eyes narrowing just in case.

“Back to popcorn.”

-

[Interlude – The Price of Pikachu]

The skies over Neo-Earth no longer knew sunlight. Neon bled across cracked asphalt.
Billionaires fell to vengeful mobs.
World leaders were executed mid-broadcast.
It was no longer a warning. It was a dystopia fulfilled.

Among the debris of culture and order, even the enslaved began to rot from within.

Buggleby’s parents, once sheltered by false hope, now sat chained to factory rigs, whispering apologies to their long-lost, exiled son.

“We’re sorry… Buggleby…”
They died by starvation, a slow and conscious rejection of the nightmare.

Enefftian Pikachu, shackled beside them, now stared into nothingness.

“So this is what it means… to be a Pikachu in this story.”

He remembered how even the original Pikachu was humbled, aged into a quiet Raichu under Urshifu’s philosophy, choosing death over endless fame.

No thunder left.
Only static.

-

[Scene – Evoir: Fourth Wall Icing]

Alolan Ninetales, now leaning sideways in the soft-cushioned viewer chair of the Chronoscene Reflector room, lifted her gaze as the scene played.

No words for a while. Just popcorn crunching.

Eventually, a soft huff through her nose.

“…Fourth wall acknowledged. Even I didn’t expect that level of downfall.”

She turned to face the viewer again, that immortal serenity flickering into mischief.

“So. Being a Pikachu isn’t the plot armor it used to be.”

She clicked the remote.

“Well played, fate. Well played.”

-

[Scene – Three Months Later: The Unforgivable Grave]

The sky over Neo-Earth dimmed for good.

What took only three months was enough to make the planet unrecognizable.

Factory smoke replaced clouds.
Humans cried not for help, but to be eaten.
And some requests were… granted.

Enefftian Tyrantrum, having long ditched morality for mineral profits, stood atop a scorched tower.
A group of half-starved survivors knelt before him, one mumbling:

“Please… we’re just meat now anyway…”

Tyrantrum shrugged.

“Don’t beg. It’s pathetic.”

He ate them without ceremony.
The digestion powered another batch of mining bots.
Neo-Earth’s core now pumped resources to NFT777-Enefftia like an enslaved heart.

-

[Scene – The False Uprising and the Mistake]

But tyranny breeds resistance.

Gravitation55, long harboring vengeful cephalopod-like aliens, had enough.

They launched an unsanctioned liberation strike. In mere weeks, dozens of human camps were freed.

One alien, wielding a blade of dark ion, stared at the now-praying humans.

“Freedom comes with one price. Kill the rat. Kill Enefftian Pikachu.”

The deed was done on livefeed.
A blur of laser fire.
A stylized, censored explosion of blood.
Enefftian Pikachu was no more.

Cheers erupted…

…until some humans, drunk with regained voice, declared war on the aliens instead.

“They’re just squids! They’ll enslave us too!”

Gravitation55 responded. Mercilessly.

Now, only the supporting humans, those who acknowledged the aliens as their liberators, remained free.
The rest?
Collateral in the next phase of interplanetary warfare.

-

[Closing Cut – Evoir, Still Untouched]

From her icy seat, Alolan Ninetales twirled a candy cane stick in her mouth, slowly.

“Civilization can’t be saved if the survivors act worse than the villains.”

She looked at the viewer again, ice blue eyes never blinking.

“And people say immortality is boring.”

[To be continued...]

-----------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------

Ch 72: Scam Fallout Dystopia Planets Pt 2

[Scene – Interplanetary Lockdown]

In the center of Evoir’s vast cosmos-hub, Gardevoir stood with crossed arms, eyes gleaming like polished pearls under artificial starlight.

“Initiate Operation Silverscreen. Lock all ports. Route cloaking active.”

At her signal, allied planets shimmered, Div-9K, Erosbloom-89, and Heavenly Verdant among them, activating stealth grids so sophisticated they tricked even death loop sensors.

“This isn’t retreat. This is preservation.”

Like an invisible pandemic of madness, Enefftian fallout now seeped across stars.

Alolan Ninetales watched the hidden worlds flicker out of cosmic visibility, sipping her icy tea.

“We really are back to ghosting the galaxy, huh.”

-

[Scene – Return to the Broken Neo-Earth]

Through a secured route, Serenede, now sixteen and more composed, descended upon the ruins of Neo-Earth with Enefftian Ninetales beside her.

They bore tainted wealth, dirty Enefftian money, and gave it freely to the scattered, half-rebuilding survivors.

But the moment some Neo-Earthlings turned their anger toward their own kind, flames of infighting rose again.

“You're just tools of the enemy!”
“She took their money, she’s the traitor!”

A projected forcefield bloomed between the mob and its scapegoats, Serenede, arms spread, her voice calm.

“Enough. I was once exiled too. At seven. My parents were dreamers, communist, idealist, foolish maybe… but they never hated.”

The crowd paused.

Trees were planted later that day.

And at the edge of the diplomatic camps, Octopus-like Gravitation aliens circled cautiously, until Enefftian Ninetales lit gentle blue flames, grilling gifts of fruit and protein for them with practiced elegance.

Charmed and fed, the aliens bowed slightly.

“She should lead both NFT777-Enefftia… and this cursed Neo-Earth.”

But Serenede shook her head.

“I’m still learning. And never point your tentacles at Diamond-666… Junipa lives there. Rillaboom’s not one to forgive.”

-

[Scene – Diamond-666’s Steelroots]

Among red metal trees and industrial skies, Enefftian Rillaboom held Junipa in bridal-style, the fierce but quiet strategist and his long-standing partner, close.

“No more wars reach this soil...” he vowed. “Only trade. Only vigilance.”

An assassin crept through the shadows, an Octopus alien, radicalized beyond diplomacy.

Steel Vines shot outward, piercing the assassin through in a flash of shining blood.

The corpse fell.
The silence lingered.

“Peace needs teeth.” Junipa whispered.

“Then we bare them together.” Rillaboom replied.

-


[Scene – A Goddess Observes]

Back in the wintry observatory halls of Evoir, Alolan Ninetales exhaled.

She watched the latest death through the Reflector’s faint shimmer.

“And there it is. Another body. Another day.”

She curled her tail around her tea, steam mixing with the faint frost of her breath.

“This isn’t ending. It’s just the beginning of a longer fall.”

-

[Scene – The Alien’s Apology and the Corpse That Leaked]

The winds of Diamond-666 whistled between the ruined steel towers where the assassin’s body lay, blackened, twitching, leaking something alive.

A greenish mist curled from the wound.

Rillaboom’s eyes narrowed.

Before he could say a word, one of the Gravitation55 Octopus alien leaders, older and wearier than her kin, floated down and bowed.

“On behalf of my kin… I offer apology. That one was too far gone.”

She raised a vial, summoned sterile barriers, and sucked the mist into containment before the tendrils of infection could reach Junipa’s boot and skirt.

“I ask no payment. Only peace. This death need not become more.”

Rillaboom, calmly wiping blood from his chestplate, replied:

“You sure? I’ll buy that virus off you. Could be profitable in select future conflicts.”

Junipa nearly dropped her sidearm.

“You what, Rilla, this is not a garage sale for bioterror.”

But she sighed, already activating trade protocols.

“Fine. Make it a classified vault transaction, at least.”

“Good girl.” Rillaboom grinned, pounding a vine-sealed data pad into confirmation.

The alien leader floated back into shadow, muttering something in her own tongue, roughly translated:

“...these mammals are insane.”

-

[Scene – Lockdown Lifts, But The Watch Persists]

A month passed. Peace flickered, tentative.

Neo-Earth rebuilt its satellite mesh. Gravitation55 returned to its underwater cities. NFT777-Enefftia remained under surveillance, having lost its craziest commander Enefftian Pikachu to his own schemes.

The Interplanetary Lockdown was lifted.

But Div-9K didn’t play dice.

The moment the gates re-opened, every single spaceport was rigged with virus scanners, nano filters, and verification drones.

Evoir followed suit, strict but smooth.

Inside Gardevoir’s chamber, glowing white and serene, she placed a hand on the dome-shaped Planetary Reflector Core, sensing all traveler pulses.

“We, the immortals, are safe. But others bleed far too easily.”

Her voice was as gentle as ever, yet cold, like a knife in silk.

She turned her gaze to the upper garden balcony.

There, Lil Eve, still tiny and pink-eyed in her bridal-robe state, carried a sleeping Keldeo in her arms.

Keldeo’s dream seemed peaceful.

Lil Eve blinked at the floating signs announcing "LOCKDOWN ENDED."

“Huh… did I miss something?” she whispered.

-

[Scene : Cute Unhinged Wins]
A soft shimmer of frost opened a gate near the Reflector Deck.

Alolan Ninetales arrived with her usual gentle, icy trail, tail flared, aura pristine, a popcorn bag levitating near her left ear.

She raised a brow at Lil Eve, still bridal-carried by Keldeo in half-doze.

“So that’s where you were...” Ninetales remarked, crunching a star-shaped popcorn.

“Four months. Four. You, your little boyfriend, and your VR-addicted parents, Vaporeon still holding Flareon like some floating bride.”

Lil Eve giggled, shameless.

“It was cozy. I heard war happened. So I slept.”

She bounced Keldeo slightly, like settling a plush into position.

“We’re going back in for eight more months. Mom and Dad said we should finish the dream year. It's... safe.”

“Safe is good.” Ninetales said, with a sideways smirk. “Just don’t forget to blink once in a while.”

The winter fox looked out toward the sky, where Reflectors once glared at worlds gone mad.

“Y’know, I’m starting to realize… Evoir has its own version of unhinged.”

She took a slow breath.

“But at least here, it’s cute.”

She flicked her tail once more, then returned to her icy seat to watch the cosmos quietly blink in and out of chaos.

-----------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------

Ch 73 : Eternal Cosplay Wonderland

For four uninterrupted months, reality and VR blurred into one blissful continuum for the immortal family. Within the soothing sanctuary of Evoir’s VR core, Vaporeon never once let go of Flareon, carrying him in her arms through digital dreamscapes while their real-world bodies remained in stasis, comforted by soft, humming life support.

In this boundless playground of themed fantasies and loving roleplay, they embraced new identities month by month, rekindling joy through constant reinvention.

-

Month One – Stadium Spirits: Cheerleader & Quarterback

The maid and butler archetypes were set aside for something louder, wilder. Vaporeon became a confident cheerleader, short skirt, pom-poms, and spirit bursting with every leap. Flareon, her ever-flushed partner, took the role of quarterback, proudly resting in her arms as they executed synchronized field stunts and celebration lifts worthy of a highlight reel.
Lil Eve joined in as another cheerleader, pouncing on Keldeo, who wore a quarterback uniform too tight for his dignity. He went along with it anyway, flushed and helpless in the face of his partner’s energy.

-

Month Two – Wonderland Masquerade: Alice & the Mad Hatter

The scenery shifted, teacups floated, chessboards twisted skyward, logic bent softly. Vaporeon now dressed as Alice, delicate and dreamy, while Flareon was the ever-grinning Mad Hatter, playful and smug. She still carried him, this time over pink tulip fields and spiraling staircases in the clouds.
Lil Eve, now a mischievous, striped Wonderland catgirl, tugged on Keldeo’s coat. He wore a nervous White Rabbit outfit and kept looking at his pocketwatch, but never ran.

-

Month Three – School Fantasy: Seifuku & Gakuran

This time, they embraced a quiet, romantic school-life fantasy. Vaporeon wore a proper sailor-style seifuku, elegant in motion, while Flareon, clad in a crisp black gakuran, remained cradled in her arms as they wandered campus rooftops beneath golden sunsets and gentle sakura winds.
Lil Eve remained distant, watching from afar, already thinking of the next transformation. Keldeo joined her, still a bit awkward in his formal gakuran, but undeniably at ease by her side.

-

Month Four – Maid and Butler, Reinvented

Returning to their original theme, they leaned fully into the dynamic, not out of obligation, but because it felt like home. Vaporeon, in a refined maid uniform with soft silver embroidery, walked slowly through a simulation of an old Evoir manor, Flareon snug in her arms, dressed sharply as a devoted butler.
Lil Eve and Keldeo returned in matching maid and butler outfits of their own, reversed roles played for laughs and gentle affection. It was quieter this month. War outside had faded; peace had space to grow.

-

Now – Pony Forms: Eternal Friendship Patch

And then came the surprise update, a new filter freshly added to the simulation: Lil Ponyta Patch: Friendship Edition.

Vaporeon was the first to transform, her body now a sleek pastel-blue pegasus mare, wings flaring from beneath a fitted maid uniform. Her grip on Flareon never faltered. Flareon himself transformed into a bold orange unicorn stallion, still wearing his crisp butler outfit with a swirl of magical aura around his horn.

Lil Eve squealed in delight as she took on the form of an earth pony filly in her seifuku, while Keldeo blinked in shock at his new appearance: a seapony with both legs and a finned tail, gakuran still somehow fitted to his glimmering body.

“Friendship is Magic?” he muttered. Lil Eve nodded and flopped against him with a grin.

They all collapsed into a glowing meadow, stars blooming overhead like lanterns. For now, they could stay in this world for another month, or another year. Time was kind here.

And far beyond their dream… Evoir remained safe. The outside world didn’t need them just yet.

-----------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------

Ch 74 : Shifting Stars, Peace-Chaos Contrasts

[On Evoir]

In the skies of Evoir, where clouds glimmered with psychic resonance, Alolan Ninetales stood silently atop an ice-sculpted balcony, gazing into the distant arc of space. Her vision pierced the void, seeing what the mortals below could not: the healing scars of Neo-Earth.

-

[On Neo-Earth]

The cursed digital battlefield that had sparked a four-month war, Humanity Dividend UNITED, was finally no more. The game was delisted, its servers dismantled and buried deep within Neo-Earth’s orbit-side quarantine vaults. But not all were satisfied.

Clusters of former players, broken by addiction and ego, still raged across forums and protests, demanding the game’s return as if it were a right. Yet the new world leaders, chosen not by profit but by survival, responded not with further conflict but compassion. Refunds were issued. Mental health centers received funding. The old elites had either fled, been shamed into silence, or faced trials. The age of parasitic digital schemes began to crack.

Instead of funneling resources into artificial scarcity and casino-coded nightmares, space programs across Neo-Earth redirected toward exploration and sustainability. Environmental satellites replaced payload drops. These eyes in orbit now scanned for scamware signatures and economic anomalies, forming a planetary immune system against future digital plagues.

Neo-Earth would never be the same.

It didn’t need to be.

-

[On NFT777-Enefftia, Far From the Ashes]

Serenede, a sixteen years old, had made her choice. Though born on Neo-Earth and once exiled with her family, she no longer called it home. Instead, she remained among the strange geometry and tech-rituals of NFT777-Enefftia, serving as a living bridge between humans and the powerful Enefftian Pokémon.

She had witnessed too much to turn back. She had silenced rioters, taught diplomacy to scorched cities, and soothed angry minds with reason. She had watched Enefftian Pikachu fall and seen the Octopus aliens learn to apologize.

And now, she stood beside Enefftian Rillaboom, the jungle-forged warlord turned uneasy guardian. He had developed a dangerous bio-weapon, born from a corpse-virus nearly unleashed on Diamond-666.

“Never again...” she reminded him, voice calm but unshakable. “Only as a last resort.”

He didn’t argue.

Despite their differences, species, origin, history, Rillaboom respected her. She, more than any war hero or strategist, had ensured that Neo-Earth did not repeat its fall.

Serenede watched the stars alone that night.

Not with fear. But with resolve.

-

[On Evoir]

High above the orbits of the recovering worlds, Alolan Ninetales operated the Chronoscene Reflector, gently shifting its shimmering panels from Neo-Earth to Div-9K. The cursed game that fueled the war, Humanity Dividend UNITED, was delisted, and the planet’s mindset began to heal. Now, Ninetales turned her attention to a world untouched by that madness.

As the light bent through the Reflector, Div-9K came into full view.

-

[On Div-9K - A Life Beyond Gacha]
On Div-9K, Typed Humans lived freely among their Divian Pokémon counterparts, far removed from gambling economies or corporate rot. Peace had taken root, and harmony unfolded in the form of daily joys.

Beside a clear fountain, Divian Empoleon, noble and composed, held Divian Milotic, his Grass/Water-type partner, in his sturdy arms. They watched a lighthearted performance just ahead: Enefftian Scovillain, a retired Grass/Electric war veteran, was putting on a show titled Electric Chili Spectacle. Sparks flew from spicy fruits flung in arcs, some igniting midair, others sizzling out before hitting a safety net.

On the sidelines, Pizzero, a Fighting-type human man with a muscular build and rigid posture, stood with forced calm. His eyes darted between the Scovillain's fire show and the gathering crowd, clearly on edge.

He muttered beneath his breath:

“Alright Pizzero. You’ve been in battles. You’ve sparred in zero-G. You’ve dodged chili pepper shrapnel. You can survive this… as long as no girl comes talk to...”

Then another voice, feminine...

“HEY! Muscle-head!”

The words hit him like a stray punch from Machamp.

It was Foxvy, the Fire/Ground-type woman in a sunlit ponytail and athletic frame, striding toward him in a soft orange sundress. Her confident energy clashed against his flustered nerves.

“You still remember, right?” she teased, flicking her ponytail. “The day I chased that busted robot during the Cosmician Sandslash’s visit, and it exploded right over that pool?”

Pizzero blinked rapidly, sweating. “...You were going to fall in.”

Foxvy grinned. “And you caught me. Bridal style. You looked away the whole time like I was some lava bomb.”

Pizzero scratched the back of his head, turning pink at the ears. “Tactical reflexes…”

She smirked and returned to the crowd, leaving him frozen in place like a statue. 
One of Scovillain’s chilies popped in front of him, and he didn’t flinch, his nerves were already maxed out.

-

[On Div-9K - Typed Romance Zones]
Further across the plaza, Alolan Ninetales’ Reflector focused on the Typed Human Couple Zones, quiet areas designed for date outings and relationship bonding. Most of the couples followed a clear pattern: the partner with the type advantage carried the other in elegant bridal style.

- Blackard, a sleek Dark-type man in a black formal suit, carried his partner Elfynie, a gentle Psychic-type woman in a dreamy pink date dress.

- Snowmanner, an Ice-type man with a shirtless fashion statement, carried his Grass-type wife Leafyla, adorned in a flower-petal inspired dress, her arms around his neck as he twirled her playfully.

- A familiar scene echoed a certain other pair from Evoir:
Froggy, a Water/Rock-type muscular man in a sharp blue suit, confidently carried Foxvy, his Fire/Ground-type wife, who smiled and leaned into his chest, dress flowing with every step.

Foxvy giggled at something he whispered, probably teasing about Pizzero again.

-

[Back on Evoir]

As the Chronoscene Reflector slowly closed its view, Alolan Ninetales whispered, more to herself than anyone:

“Div-9K... truly one of the lucky planets.
To befriend Gardevoir, to be spared the madness, and to live with love as the law.”

She smiled faintly, the light of Evoir glinting off her fur. The contrast between hellish worlds and healing ones had never been so vivid.

-----------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------

Ch 75 : Streams Beyond the Loop

[Scene : Orbit Broadcast and Illusion Warfare]
High above Evoir, inside a reflective streaming capsule, Cosmician Sandslash was mid-broadcast. The ambient hum of satellites drifted in the background while a flickering screen showed a familiar figure trapped within: Regigigas, locked inside the Death Loop Tablet once again.

Today’s torment? A mock military strategy sim, reminiscent of ancient illusions. Onscreen, Regigigas commanded armies of yellow-furred, twitchy-eyed Pikachu-shaped units, clearly projections and not real beings.

“Go on, march yourselves into fate...” Regigigas muttered, sending waves of his illusion forces into fire traps, minefields, and wall-mounted zappers.

His tone was dry, yet gleefully cruel. This was more than a simulation, it was personal catharsis. With every zapped Pikachu unit, he seemed to shed another layer of resentment, mocking their long-glorified media image.

Cosmician Sandslash quietly monitored the chat while sipping mineralized berry tea.

“Guess he's venting again.” he muttered. “Let the titan have his meltdown.”

-

[Scene : Real Games, Real Hearts]
After Regigigas’s illusion war ended in satisfying explosions, Sandslash transitioned into showcasing something far more grounded: a fair and balanced base-builder game.

“Alright, time for something honest...” he announced.

This game, forged by a Fighting/Psychic-type Evoirian Pangoro, was everything the cursed war-era games were not. No exploitative traps. No rigged draws. Instead, players could build, manage, and even show off their worlds with pride. Optional cosmetics were priced reasonably, bought only by devoted fans who wanted to support the dev.

Sandslash displayed his well-fortified steel dojo village, fully built without any pay-to-win shortcuts.

“Took effort, but that’s the point....” he said, zooming in on a meditation garden. “Pangoro really got the philosophy right.”

Once his tasks were done, he switched again, this time to a beloved classic: SteelCraft.

-

[Scene : The Spirit of Steel]
SteelCraft had become a treasured relic of gaming in Evoir. What made it special wasn’t nostalgia, but the legacy it carried. 
It was originally created by Steelvee, the rare Steel-type Eeveelution, born mortal despite having Vaporeon and Flareon as immortal parents.

Steelvee had once struggled with the weight of legacy, never inheriting immortality, but poured all his clarity, balance, and wisdom into one thing: the perfect sandbox creation game, along with his wife Alexian the Persian-like alien. 
That legacy lived on, now preserved by Cosmician Zangoose (male, Steel/Dark) and Galaxian Persian (female, Steel/Poison), a direct descendant of Steelvee himself. They upheld his vision with integrity, ensuring every player got a full experience with a one-time purchase and zero manipulation.

“A real monument.” Sandslash said with pride. “And it still stands.”

-

[Scene : Another Death Loop, Bittersweet Release]
Back inside the Tablet, Regigigas had just been loaded into a new SteelCraft-inspired simulation. The twist? This time, he wasn’t a warlord, he was a miner.

Armed with a chunky steel pickaxe, Regigigas had to gather iron while being chased and challenged by illusionary Garganacl-shaped miners, each wielding their own tools, trying to claim the same resources.

He had three lives.

On the first and second attempt, he fumbled, pierced through by glinting steel tools, pain-coded to the nerve.

By the third try, he finally gathered enough ore to forge a gleaming steel beacon. With immense effort, he activated it and stood in its glow.

Rather than being torn apart again, this time he was incinerated cleanly, without agony, a rare painless death. The screen faded to white.

Cosmician Sandslash paused, then clapped.

“See? Even the cursed deserve a kind end… sometimes.”

His chat agreed, spamming silent applause emotes and steelheart icons.

-----------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------

Ch 76: The Online Hooves That Hold Us

[VR Wonderland - Ponyta filter]

Inside the peaceful dreamscape of VR Wonderland, still under the effects of the whimsical My Little Ponyta filter, the Immortal Four wandered gently:

- Vaporeon as a graceful pegasus mare,

- Flareon as a fiery unicorn stallion,

- Lil Eve as a playful earth pony filly,

- Keldeo as a spirited sea pony colt, his hooves webbed, his tail fin shimmering.

As always, Vaporeon never stopped carrying Flareon, front legs curled securely beneath his frame, her wings occasionally flapping with rhythm to maintain their shared balance. Even in quadrupedal equine forms, their bond, and their carry dynamic, remained beautifully unbroken.

While exploring a blooming forest meadow textured in painterly strokes and rainbow lighting, the group came across two other pony-like figures. Logged in from Div-9K, they were familiar avatars:

- A young earth mare with subtle shimmering stripes across her coat, who held a slightly older earth stallion colt in a bridal carry position.

- It was Dawtiny, the adopted Fairy/Poison daughter of Divian Empoleon, proudly Ponytaified.

- In her hooves lay Brendle, the adoptive Grass/Dark son of Divian Milotic, his expression calm and content as she gently walked with him in her embrace.

They had been in this pose for several hours, logged in for quiet time far from Div-9K’s gentle but structured society.

Lil Eve’s ears perked up. “Hey, those two look familiar!”

Keldeo swirled his watery tail. “Wait a sec… aren’t those...?”

Dawtiny paused mid-step, blinked, and then smiled warmly as she realized who had just stumbled upon them.

“Oh! Vaporeon, Flareon… and Lil Eve! Keldeo too? I remember you all, from our visit to Evoir!”

Brendle tilted his head, looking at Vaporeon’s wings and hooves. “You’re still carrying him, huh?” he chuckled softly.

Flareon raised a hoof as if to wave, but Vaporeon tucked him tighter into her chest. “You bet she is,” Flareon murmured with a proud blush.

The groups reunited under shimmering dream trees. As they rested, they caught up gently, memories from Evoir, glimpses of Div-9K’s peaceful progress, and the quiet, shared understanding that in times of peace, holding the ones you love was reason enough to remain logged in a little longer.

-

Despite the wild transformations brought on by the My Little Ponyta filter, the familiar uniforms gave it all away.

- Vaporeon, the pegasus mare, wore the refined flow of her maid outfit, delicately adapted to equine form, frills fluttering with every wingbeat.

- Flareon, regal even as a unicorn stallion, bore the dignified lines of his butler uniform, his collar and cuffs still sharp despite the pastel dreamscape.

- Lil Eve, as a spirited little earth filly, had her schoolgirl seifuku fitted perfectly to her smaller frame.

- Keldeo, the sea pony colt, rocked his tiny gakuran, adapted for aquatic gallops and floating glides.

These touches made them instantly recognizable to Dawtiny and Brendle, whose own equine forms wore casual but coordinated spring attire, a sign of their close bond, but also their mortal grounding.

The group shared warm, nostalgic chatter beneath a dreamtree blooming with virtual petals. Laughter filled the filtered air, until Dawtiny glanced at her in-game status and sighed with a small, theatrical pout.

“Dinner call from Div-9K base. Our mortal bodies still run on mortal bellies.”

Brendle chuckled, adjusting himself upright from the carry. “Fair enough. Though… I could’ve stayed like this all evening.”

Dawtiny smirked, nuzzling his mane. “You’ll be back in my hooves after dessert.”

Vaporeon smiled softly, still carrying Flareon. “Enjoy it. We’ll be here.”

As the Divian couple gracefully logged out, leaving behind softly twinkling light trails, the Immortal Four remained. Time, after all, held little power over them here.

Keldeo swam a small circle midair. “So… want to explore the bubble valleys next?”

Lil Eve raised a hoof, energetic as ever. “Only if Mama does a twirl while carrying Papa again!”

Flareon folded his front legs confidently. “She always does.”

Vaporeon just smiled… and with a beat of her wings, lifted them all forward, back into the dream.

-

[VR Wonderland - Sea Palace]

Within the crystal-domed splendor of the Sea Palace Map, cascading light fell like ripples through water. Vaporeon, ever graceful in her pegasus maid form, held Flareon close in her front hooves as they soared between softly glowing archways of coral and pearl.

Flareon shifted slightly in her embrace, giving a faint chuckle. “Every palace feels like a honeymoon suite when you carry me like this.”

“Then I chose the right wings.” Vaporeon replied playfully, nuzzling his snout.

But the mood turned gently curious as they rounded a bend and spotted a secluded balcony framed in flowing kelp curtains.

There stood Dragonvee, their draconic daughter, now Ponyta-filtered into a majestic kirin-like form, soft gleam of scales, gentle hooves, and flowering antlers that shimmered like lotus branches. In her forelimbs, she carried someone close: a pale-green stallion Verdanian Ponytaified Eeveelution from the planet Heavenly Verdant, known as Verdantvee, a rare Poison/Electric typing, evolved long ago through the exchange path from Div-9K.

The two were resting atop sea-lily cushions, tranquil and clearly deep in closeness. Dragonvee’s eyes were half-lidded, her voice low and warm as she whispered something that made Verdantvee smile bashfully.

Then she looked up, and saw her parents.

Her eyes widened a little, but instead of panic, she gently dipped her head. “M-Mother, Father… I didn’t expect you two here.” Her tone was respectful, if a bit sheepish.

Vaporeon floated down lightly, still holding Flareon. “We were just sightseeing,” she said with a gentle laugh. “Though I see someone else is too…”

Flareon raised an eyebrow with a knowing smirk. “Carrying a boyfriend, hmm? Runs in the family.”

Dragonvee’s cheeks flushed softly, and she nodded, still holding Verdantvee close. “He’s… kind. From Heavenly Verdant. We met through a cross-world festival circuit. I… hope to see him beyond VR someday.”

Verdantvee nodded quietly, glancing between them with admiration.

Vaporeon gave a small smile. “You chose well. Just remember, romance is more than how you carry him. But... carrying helps.”

Dragonvee giggled softly. “Yes, Mother.”

After a polite bow, she turned with Verdantvee in her hooves and gently glided off toward the more private wing of the palace.

As the two vanished beneath the arched waterfall gate, Flareon looked up. “Do you think we embarrassed her?”

Vaporeon chuckled. “No… I think she was proud we saw.”

-

[On the planet Heavenly Verdant]

As Verdantvee logged out of the VR wonderland, the Sea Palace dissolved into drifting data sparkles, leaving behind only warmth in his heart and a slight shimmer in his fur.

He returned to the glowing green skies of Heavenly Verdant, a tranquil planet where nature pulsed with calm electricity and floral mists drifted like dreams. Though still new to many across the systems, Heavenly Verdant had been quietly growing for over 3,030 years, its people descended from Divian Pokémon who settled here via ancient trade routes. Among them were the rare Verdinian Eeveelutions, born from unique evolutions only possible on this soil.

Verdantvee was one such soul, Poison/Electric, with soft pale-green fur that carried both voltage and a vine-like fragrance. He walked alone through the crystalline path toward a cozy café lined with bioluminescent ivy. The VR session left him slightly dazed, but mostly... fluttery.

Outside the café stood a tall, elegant Verdinian Lilligant, radiant in a calm, motherly way. Her petals curled slightly with age, but her eyes remained nurturing as ever.

“Back already?” she asked, noticing the sparkle in his step. “Was she carrying you again?”

Verdantvee blushed and nodded slowly, trying to keep his composure. “Dragonvee’s really strong… and gentle. I... like being held by her.”

Lilligant chuckled, adjusting a vine-woven basket of herbs. “You always did prefer the comfy route, little vine.” she teased affectionately. “That VR mare’s got you tangled up.”

Inside the café’s back kitchen, a lively hum and glittery beat pulsed through the comms. There, leaning against a mirror and fine-tuning her mic headset, stood Divavee, Verdantvee’s birth mother. She was every bit the Fairy/Electric spectacle, her pastel hues shimmered like neon stars, and her vocals still topped regional rankings.

Though she was a devoted idol even now, her personal life had always marched to its own beat.

She’d once fallen in love with Boggyvee, a mellow yet charming Grass/Poison Divian Eeveelution who served as her creative director back in Div-9K. Their bond had been electric (and mildly toxic, in the artistic sense), but not the kind meant for marriage.

“It was never about rings.” she’d told Verdantvee once. “Only rhythm and resonance.”

So when she discovered she was pregnant, she left for Heavenly Verdant, where society was gentler, and where her son could grow without whispered judgment. Verdantvee had been only six when they arrived, still a Normal/Electric Divian Eevee, barely understanding why his mother looked sad after long calls with her agent.

Now he was a full Verdanian evolution, but he still looked at her with awe.

After a quick meal and a bath, Verdantvee slipped into his usual butler uniform and quietly retreated to the staff break room. There, with a dreamy sigh, he pulled out a holo-print screenshot: Dragonvee, his VR crush, gently carrying him in bridal fashion by the digital sea.

He traced her outline with a clawed finger, then clutched it to his chest.

“I wish I could be with you... not just in data.”

A warm shift in the room’s energy followed.

From the shimmering entrance arch stepped Gardevoir, ageless and serene, dressed not just for enforcement but also as a gentle traveler. Her gown softly blended with the glowing flora behind her.

“Still the same longing hearts in this world.” she murmured, smiling faintly.

Verdantvee blinked, stunned. “Lady Gardevoir...?”

“I visit when I can.” she said calmly. “The last time wasn’t the first... and it won’t be the last.”

She stepped closer and peered gently at the image in Verdantvee’s paws. “That’s Dragonvee, isn’t it? The daughter of those two immortal Eeveelutions, Vaporeon and Flareon. The one you dream of.”

Verdantvee shrank back slightly, embarrassed, ears flattening.

“I-I’m not even worthy to walk beside her... She’s confident, immortal, a carrier. I just... I just want to be carried forever.”

“And there is no shame in that.” Gardevoir replied kindly. “Some souls shine brighter when held.”

She knelt to Verdantvee’s level and offered a knowing smile. “Maybe it’s time someone helped make that meeting real.”

With a brief flick of her fingers, a subtle psychic shimmer traced across a hidden uplink, one that quietly pinged across systems, setting things in motion.

Love, after all, took many forms.

-----------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------

Ch 77 : Verdant Distress Pt 1

[Scene: After the Wonderland]

Seven months had passed within the harmony of VR Wonderland. Time outside had ticked by much faster, but within that lush virtual dream, Vaporeon, Flareon, Lil Eve, and Keldeo had shared laughter, peaceful games, and unforgettable memories in pastel-styled equine forms. They’d remained logged in longer than expected, perhaps because no pain or politics dared intrude there.

Now, blinking into the bright physical world once again, the quartet stepped out from the VR stasis pods, greeted by light, air, and gentle concern.

It was Dragonvee who met them first, her maid uniform slightly wrinkled from pacing. Her expression was not one of joy, but anxiety.

“There’s trouble...” she said, voice trembling. “In Heavenly Verdant.”

The name alone snapped Flareon and Vaporeon to attention. Their daughter’s tone spoke volumes beyond the words.

“A rogue bandit, an Enefftian Meganium, female, Grass/Ground, snuck onto the planet and caused localized quakes. She’s been scamming gentle residents by pretending to be a fortune teller with ‘soil blessings.’” Dragonvee wrung her paws. “But... she’s taken Verdantvee hostage.”

That last line broke any remaining calm in her voice. The other immortals listened intently, Gardevoir already adjusting her coat, Alolan Ninetales closing her eyes to tap into her Chronoscene Reflector, tuning their ship’s arrival window.

“I’ll show you everything...” Dragonvee insisted. “Please... help me save him.”

-

[Scene: Verdant Dangers]

On Heavenly Verdant, lush foliage swayed nervously as underground tremors rolled like uneasy whispers. Deep in a cave lined with cracked crystals and upturned roots, Verdantvee lay tied with electric-proof vines, still in his butler uniform, bruised and shaken.

He was particularly vulnerable to seismic pulses, his Poison/Electric body short-circuited easily under pressure, and he’d collapsed the moment a tremor struck.

Hovering nearby, the Enefftian Meganium loomed with a crooked smirk. She was clearly no native. Her body bore asymmetrical scars and markings typical of NFT777-Enefftia’s lawless zones, where banditry and "disaster mimicry" were once common scams.

“You're softer than the leaves here...” she scoffed at Verdantvee, dragging a jagged vine staff across the ground to conjure another tremor.

Elsewhere, Divavee darted through flowering alleys and crystalline walkways, dressed still in her idol skirt and headset. Her mic had been turned off. There was no time for song, only a mother’s frantic search. Her son’s scent had vanished after the third quake, and her heart had been pounding since.

“She took him... underground...” she muttered, voice nearly cracking.

The townsfolk whispered rumors of a cursed tremor-bringer, a stranger from afar. She didn’t need confirmation. She knew who it was.

Back in the hidden cave, the Meganium hissed under her breath. “They threw me out of Enefftia like garbage. Just for rattling a few cities. That Enefftian Ninetales couldn’t handle real power.”

Her tone dripped with disdain. She hadn’t forgotten being exiled. She hadn't forgiven it either.

-

[Scene: Arrival of the Immortals]

The Verdantian docks shimmered with aura as a sleek, time-piercing vessel touched down without delay. The Chronoscene Reflector had done its work well, Alolan Ninetales guided their entry perfectly, as always.

From the ship emerged the familiar figures:

- Gardevoir, polished in her immortal police uniform, eyes sharp and calm.

- Flareon, butler cloak swaying with his confident stride.

- Vaporeon, her maid eyes sharper than ever, tail twitching with quiet fury.

- Alolan Ninetales, in sundress, already analyzing the quake zones.

- And lastly, Dragonvee, hurrying ahead in her maid uniform.

They were not alone.

Groundvee, Dragonvee’s younger brother, had come prepared. Wearing his clean white doctor’s coat, he held a handheld seismic reader with a confident grip.

“Her quakes aren’t random,” he muttered. “She’s using artificial patterns to mask her location, but not well enough.”

He activated the tracker and pointed down a mossy slope near the outskirts of the café sector.

“Multiple shortwave bursts. Northeast quadrant. Cave system under the old Ivy Springs.”

Flareon smirked. “Then let’s treat this like a dungeon.”

The group followed Groundvee like a search dog through twisted, glowing vines and cracked walkways. Even as tremors shook loose petals and dust, none of the immortals faltered.

Dragonvee gripped her skirt tighter. “Verdantvee, please hold on.”

-

[Scene: Seduction and Rescue]

Beneath the shimmering ivy-laced earth, the hidden chamber opened up like a breathless wound. Verdantvee lay helpless, still bound in vines, his breath shallow and face flushed, partly from stress, partly from something more humiliating.

The Enefftian Meganium loomed closer, her tone slithering like vines through soil. “Such a gentle face... soft and weak. Why serve others when you could be kept?” Her Ground-type aura surged with manipulative heat, intent laced in her claws.

But then...

A blur of violet and pink stormed in.

“Don’t touch him!” shouted Dragonvee, her maid uniform smudged by earlier quakes, eyes ablaze.

With the speed of a comet, she charged, tackling Meganium aside with enough force to send her tumbling against the cave wall. The illusion of seduction shattered instantly.

“Verdantvee! I’ve finally found you, not like this, but still...” she gasped, cutting his bonds with her claws and lifting him effortlessly into a bridal carry.

He blinked, stunned at her strength and presence. “Dragonvee... it’s really you...”

Their eyes met, and without hesitation, Verdantvee leaned in and kissed her, sweetly and sincerely, his face pressing against her cheek mid-carry.

It was brief. It was real.

But not quiet.

A violent tremor erupted beneath them as Meganium, recovering, slammed the ground in a rage. The floor collapsed, dragging Dragonvee and Verdantvee deeper into the cavernous fault below with a landslide of stone and roots.

-

[Scene: Descent of the Immortals]

Above, Groundvee had just caught up. Seeing the collapse, he scanned with trembling paws.

“They fell, hold on!” he barked, flinging ropes down the opening. “Tunnel’s stable for now. Follow me!”

One by one, the immortals descended with practiced ease:

- Groundvee, first down, eyes locked on the tremor readings.

- Gardevoir, teleporting in flashes of moonlight, coat still crisp.

- Alolan Ninetales, gliding on frost-imbued stones.

- Flareon and Vaporeon, trailing behind, a few seconds slower.

In the depth of the lower cavern, the battle was already underway.

Groundvee unleashed a targeted seismic pulse, a signature counterquake tuned to disrupt foreign quaking patterns. It hit its mark. The Meganium stumbled, her limbs briefly paralyzed by the interference.

That was Gardevoir’s cue.

She reappeared behind Meganium in a flash, whispering, “You’re done.”
Moonblast, direct hit. The glow erupted, knocking Meganium back. She groaned, trying to lift herself.

But then came the frost.

A sheet of icy air swept through, Alolan Ninetales had arrived, her breath a glacial mist. Meganium froze in place, encased in elegant but unrelenting frost.

The bandit’s eyes widened. “Ninetales... again?!”

Alolan Ninetales stepped forward calmly. “You mistake me for my descendant...” she said coldly. “But I carry her will.”

Meganium’s pupils shrank. With that, Gardevoir clamped cuffs of glowing psychic energy over her. The scammer’s rampage was over.

-

[Scene: Bittersweet Discovery]

Moments later, Vaporeon and Flareon arrived, ready for a fight, but the dust had settled.

Flareon looked around. “Where are the kids?”

Groundvee adjusted his tremor scanner, pausing when he spotted something unusual through an aura trace.

“They’re not far. Wait... they’re beside someone.”

Deep in a smaller, quieter chamber, he saw them:

Dragonvee, still bridal-carrying Verdantvee, was kneeling near a shimmering figure of peace and resonance, Bloominian Meloetta, luminous and serene. The immortal being had appeared as if summoned by shared longing.

The couple, even amid the chaos, had hearts that called for freedom, from burden, from fragility, from being breakable.

Meloetta gently touched both their foreheads, and they closed their eyes, not unconscious, just resting. A subconscious yearning echoed around them. Not for death. But for a gentler, eternal love.

Groundvee stepped back silently. “They may not know it yet...” he murmured, “but their call was heard.”

The cave trembled no longer.

[To be continued.]

-----------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------

Ch 78 : Verdant Distress Pt 2

[Scene: The Gift of Understanding]

In the still glow of the sacred cavern beneath Heavenly Verdant, Dragonvee, still carrying Verdantvee in her arms, gazed up at the serene figure of Bloominian Meloetta.

“I know what this means...” Dragonvee said softly. “But our loved ones, they already know who you are. They’ve met the others before. They’ll understand. We don’t want this to be a secret.”

Verdantvee, face nestled against her shoulder, nodded. “They knew we longed for something more. This... this is peace.”

Meloetta’s gentle eyes glimmered with understanding.

“I only remove memories...” she said, “from those too immature to carry the truth. But your parents... they are wiser than most I have ever seen. As is Gardevoir. They’ve lived beyond grief, beyond possession. They’ll remember.”

She gestured toward a crystalline hourglass altar, the time-glass shimmering with flowing sparkles, its top already beginning to empty. “Step forward when you’re ready.”

-

[Scene: Into Erosbloom-89]

Without hesitation, Dragonvee, still in her maid uniform, took a deep breath. “Verdantvee... are you sure?”

“Your arms are the safest place I’ve ever known.” he whispered.

She smiled, and stepped into the hourglass portal.

A pulse of harmonic energy surged, and with a flicker, both vanished, teleported to Erosbloom-89, the gardenworld of bridal-carry peace.

Their bodies shimmered, their life signatures altered, no longer mortal. Their breath, once fragile, now resonated with timeless rhythm.

And Dragonvee? Her arms, once tired, were now forever capable.

-

[Scene: Contact from Beyond]

In the cavern behind, Gardevoir’s telelink buzzed. A soft voice came through.

“Gardevoir? Mom? Dad? We made it. We’re safe now... forever. I can still call you. I have telecontact now, and it’s always conscious. I’ll stay in touch.”

Gardevoir, pausing mid-flight, slowed and smiled faintly.

Alolan Ninetales chuckled. “That girl... really did it.”

Flareon, though shaken, smirked. “You know... she said this before. That she wanted to find a guy to hold bridal-style... and never let go.”

Vaporeon, tail swishing, added warmly, “Now look where she is, right next door. Immortal, in love, and finally free.”

They all shared a knowing laugh.

Groundvee, standing in silence near the portal, finally exhaled. “I thought she was joking. But... I respect her. She’s earned it.”

-

[Scene: The Embrace of Madness]

Erosbloom-89, sometime later.

Dragonvee now wore a refined immortal maid’s gown, enhanced with living silk that adjusted to her eternal form. Her hold on Verdantvee was gentle, but constant, his butler uniform now styled with eternal threads, suited to a soft forever.

They walked along a peaceful riverbank, shaded with cherry-glow trees and rippling with petals.

Suddenly, she stopped.

Ahead stood a familiar figure: Enefftian Arcanine (Psychic/Electric), once her perverted enemy, now seated calmly with a fishing rod in his paws.

His electrifying mane was neatly tied, and a woven basket of modest river fish sat beside him.

“You?” Dragonvee blinked.

Arcanine turned, raising an eyebrow. “Dragonvee?! Is that, oh wow, is that Verdantvee in your arms?!”

She nodded shyly. “I... guess I joined the bridal-carry madness after all.”

Arcanine laughed, stretching. “Well I’ll be. Last I saw you, you were trying to kick me into a ravine. And now? You’re one of them.”

“Yeah...” Dragonvee said, holding Verdantvee a little closer. “And I wouldn’t change a thing.”

Arcanine leaned back, fishing rod bobbing lazily. “I’m a fisherman now. Swore off everything else. Too much earthquake karma. But hey, seeing you like this? Makes me believe this planet might just fix anyone.”

Verdantvee, eyes half-closed, muttered happily, “She always knew how to hold me...”

Dragonvee giggled.

And the river flowed on.

-

[Scene: Surface of Heavenly Verdant – A Tense Reunion]

As Enefftian Meganium was dragged back to the surface by Groundvee, ropes around her ankles and her leafy antennae drooping in defeat, the ground trembled, this time not from her own quakes, but from arrival.

A beam of light shimmered, revealing Enefftian Ninetales, regal and severe in skirt, alongside her human companion, Serenede, cloaked and composed in skirt.

They approached the group with careful steps.

“Meganium...” Enefftian Ninetales said calmly, “we came not to free you, but to propose your rework.”

Enefftian Meganium lifted her head in confusion.

Serenede added gently, “We believe she can be... reprogrammed. As a rate-quaker, to simulate rare quake tremors for gacha calibration events. It could be a peaceful job. No more scams.”

Gardevoir, wary yet calculating, narrowed her eyes. “And if I say no?”

Enefftia Ninetales tilted her head. “We'd rather not let this spiral into another incident between Enefftia and this planet. Again.”

The immortal’s gaze locked with Alolan Ninetales’. The two foxes stared.

“…That’s my descendant...” Alolan Ninetales whispered aloud.

Enefftian Ninetales blinked, confused. “Huh? DNA trace would need confirming, don’t make assumptions.”

Turning abruptly, she ordered Serenede, “We’re done here. Let’s leave before your family history creates a galactic scandal.”

With a frustrated flick of her tails, she and Serenede teleported away with the restrained Meganium.

“…That got unhinged real fast.” Flareon muttered.

Vaporeon, arms crossed, nodded with a sigh, “…Too unhinged.”

They spoke in perfect sync, then glanced at each other. “We need a vacation.”

-

[Scene: Erosbloom-89 – The Immortal Encounter]

Just hours later, aboard the quiet ship of the four immortals, the group descended upon the tranquil gardens of Erosbloom-89. Groundvee, Divavee, Flareon, Vaporeon, Alolan Ninetales, and Gardevoir stepped out into fields of everblooming roses and mist-lit rivers.

And there she was, Dragonvee, glowing faintly with her new immortal aura, holding Verdantvee gently, lovingly in her arms. His butler outfit had been refined, lined with runes of eternity. He smiled sleepily in her hold.

Divavee clutched her hands together. “My boy... you’re happy.”

Gardevoir, seeing the pair, whispered, “Another successful match. Another vow fulfilled... I think I really am a cupid now.”

Flareon waved with a grin. “There she is!”

Vaporeon gave a cheerful spin before lifting Flareon bridal style again. “Let’s make this a theme today.”

Dragonvee smiled at them, stepping forward. “Meloetta told me something… I can still visit Evoir or even wander the stars. Immortality isn’t a cage, it’s freedom, as long as we don’t abuse it.”

The group nodded, deeply moved.

Just then, they saw another couple pass by, Aqualice, the water-jet maid with sapphire glasses, elegantly holding her partner Burnabon, the flame-hearted butler with crimson hair and ember gloves. The two nodded in greeting, their love as radiant as theirs.

-

[Scene: A Return with No End]

Dragonvee, still in maid uniform now enhanced with gentle Erosbloom enchantments, carried Verdantvee aboard the return ship. His eyes closed peacefully, trusting her always.

Groundvee, silent but proud, gave one final nod.

Gardevoir, Alolan Ninetales, Flareon, and Vaporeon followed behind, while Divavee lingered for one last look at the sacred garden before stepping inside.

The ship launched, bearing the whole group back to Evoir, now with two more immortals aboard, forever bonded, not just in soul, but in embrace.

The bridal carry madness… continued.

-

[Scene: Evoir Newsfeeds – "From Maid to Myth"]

Screens across Evoir, Div-9K, and even Heavenly Verdant flared to life with breaking bulletins from the Dragonlet News Network, one of the most beloved game culture channels in the interplanetary fandom.

“BREAKING: Dragonvee, Dragonlet’s top-tier bullet hell developer/founder and iconic maid of HydroPyro Café, has officially achieved bridal carry immortality alongside her long-distance sweetheart, Verdantvee, during an emotional incident involving a scamming Meganium and a fateful visit to Erosbloom-89…”

The article glowed with radiant fan edits, showered in digital hearts and starburst filters.

Across the fandom, joy erupted.

On a stream panel, the Evoirian Rapidash, veteran developer of the My Little Ponyta visual filter and cult-favorite show of the same name, was seen watching the news. She wheezed hard through laughter and disbelief.

“SHE REALLY DID IT! DRAGONVEE REALLY WENT BLOOMINIAN! That’s it, I’m writing a special cameo for her in Ponyta Season 9!!”

The chat exploded:
“Verdantvee best gentle arms BF!!!”
“Never letting go even in patch updates, wow.”
“Marriage speedrun ANY% WR!!!”

-

[Scene: HydroPyro Café – Back to Routine, Sorta]

Despite the fame, Dragonvee remained as ever, present behind the counter at the HydroPyro Café, polishing cups, menus floating with seasonal combos. She smiled with calm grace, Verdantvee resting in her arms like a quiet, blushing angel. He adjusted his butler sash slightly but otherwise made no move to leave her hold.

“Still holding up?” she whispered.

“Always.” he murmured back, burying his cheek gently against her shoulder.

Bell chimes rang.

Lil Eve walked in with an amused shake of her head. “Well, sis… you really did it. Bridal carry locked… permanently. You one-upped me.”

Behind her came Keldeo, blinking several times. “…You’re really just going to carry him forever?”

Dragonvee nodded softly. “This is what I wanted. I just didn’t know when it’d happen.”

Keldeo chuckled awkwardly. “Well… I’m sticking with Arceus Elixir immortality. I like moving my legs, thanks.”

Lil Eve patted his side. “Same. But hey… we’re happy for you.”

Verdantvee smiled at them both, then quietly added, “I feel safe… here. Even if I don’t walk.”

Dragonvee leaned her head against his. “And I feel… whole. Now I’ll never be alone again.”

The café shimmered with warmth, not just from the tea boilers and ambient glows, but from the air of peace, eternal love… and a little madness.

-----------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------

Ch 79 : Danmaku Divaloid Marriage

[Scene: Dragonlet Dev Room, Evoir]

Within a serene side wing of the HydroPyro Café in Evoir, a cozy lounge is dedicated to quiet gaming and developer nostalgia. Lush vines wrap the window edges, and a shelf of antique game boxes frames the wall, each marked with logos from eras long gone. In the center, a soft pastel rug cushions a modest sitting area where Dragonvee, Alolan Ninetales, and Verdantvee gather.

Dragonvee is, as always, seated gracefully, Verdantvee nestled in her arms, his cheeks slightly flushed from the warmth of her embrace.

But the game controller? That’s in Verdantvee’s hands.

“I never thought I’d be holding the controls of Dragonlet like this,” he whispers, eyes shining. “To think you created this nearly 7,000 years ago…”

Dragonvee smiles, a mix of pride and nostalgia lighting her expression.

“6971 years ago, yeah. It was something to do after the first dream war... back when I was still trying to distract myself from all the silence.”

Alolan Ninetales lounges nearby, swirling a warm cup of freeze-berry tea, watching them with relaxed affection.

“It’s wild. I remember people arguing about whether the main ship should be Luma x Stralune or Arc x Wingna. And here you are... the original dev, going full straight route in real life.”

Dragonvee chuckles gently, resting her cheek on Verdantvee’s head.

“The fandom was always heavy on yuri. But in the end, I went the bridal route, literally.”

Alolan Ninetales lets out a laugh and adds playfully:

“Hey, I said I was straight too, but remember that weird Stellar Carnival mission? That alien octopus forcibly glitched my controls and kissed me through Gardevoir.”

They all burst into soft laughter.

Verdantvee, as shy and gentle as always, just manages a bashful chuckle and hides his blushing face against Dragonvee’s soft shoulder fluff.

Dragonvee strokes his head fondly.

“He’s perfect like this,” she whispers, “even if he won’t main anything but the healer ships.”

-

[Scene: Divaloid Concert at Evoir Plaza]

As the sun dips below the crystalline towers of Evoir, the city's central plaza glows with neon-like floral lights and gentle stage beams. Crowds, both local and interstellar, gather before a modern, holographic stage.

At its center is Divavee, adorned in an elegant performance outfit that sparkles in layered hues of pastel electric and opalescent fairy-light. Her voice rings out, not just melodically, but with a digitally-enhanced vibrance that feels equal parts synthetic and divine.

Her fans call it Divaloid, a series of songs that blend otherworldly charm and catchy digital beats. Despite the advanced projection tech, there’s no doubt the vocals are hers, alive and unfiltered. Tracks like “Sparkle Codes”, “Heart-Chime Delay”, and “Sweet Drift Voltage” echo across the city, touching even distant sky bridges.

Back in the lounge of HydroPyro Café, Verdantvee, still tucked comfortably in Dragonvee’s arms, tilts his ears slightly.

“That’s Mom…”

He smiles softly, eyes closed, listening.

“She’s using her natural tone this time. Not masked like she used to back in Verdinia…”

Dragonvee, her hand resting near his heart, nods with warm understanding.

“She finally found the stage she deserves. It suits her here.”

Cut to the backstage area, where Divavee steps off, cheeks flushed from encore cheers. She receives a bouquet from a young fairy-hybrid fan and takes a moment to answer a short comm-link call, Verdinian Lilligant on the other end.

“...Yes, I know. You’ll need new help now that my son’s chosen to stay wrapped in that dragon girl’s arms for all eternity.”

She giggles with melodic sincerity.

“No, no hard feelings. Honestly, it’s beautiful. He deserves peace. I’ll be staying here in Evoir, Lilli. Not sure for how long. Maybe… as long as my voice still finds listeners.”

She signs off and looks to the sky, humming a gentle melody to herself as she walks into the starlit city, one heel tapping lightly to the rhythm of her next song already forming in her mind.

-

[Scene: After the Final Note]

The crowd thinned as the last digital echo of Divaloid faded into the skyline. Under the softly drifting nightlights of Evoir, Dragonvee stepped out into the open plaza, carrying Verdantvee close in her arms, their forms still outfit-locked from the Hourai bridal pact.

Evoirian Rapidash, the eccentric fire/water mare known for her code contributions to My Little Ponya filters, trotted forward with a flushed expression.

“That final chorus... divine! I never knew Divavee's voice could crack binary!”

Divavee, stepping down from the floating platform, smiled as she approached the couple.

“Dragonvee, take good care of my son, won’t you? He's a gentle stream… and now, forever yours to hold.”

“Of course.” Dragonvee replied, her glowing pupils narrowing softly. “Marriage is already being planned.”

-

[Scene: The Marriage of Arms and Heart]

The central garden of Evoir was transformed. Petal projectors filled the air with flowing Danmaku confetti, softly glowing in radiant colors. A crystalline stage shone at the heart of it all.

At the center: Dragonvee, in her glistening scaled armor gown, still carrying Verdantvee, gentle and bashful in his soft butler suit, cheeks rosy under the watch of dozens of attendees and livestream viewers across worlds.

Divavee took the stage again, this time singing a romantic Divaloid piece composed specially for this day. Her voice rippled through the air like liquid light.

Nearby:

- Vaporeon cheerfully served drinks.

- Flareon took his chef apron duty seriously, arranging appetizers on hot plates.

- Groundvee wiped his eyes beside his distant cousin, Cosmician Braviary, both overwhelmed.

- Lil Eve and Keldeo sat back, hands intertwined, enjoying the vibe.

- Gardevoir and Alolan Ninetales soared above the crowd, casting sweeping Danmaku auroras, which Lil Eve enhanced further with a Dazzling Gleam, drawing gasps from the guests.

-

On a distant moon, Cosmician Sandslash watched the live feed.

“Congrats, little cousin…”

Next to him, Regigigas, still locked in his death-loop game tablet, was button-mashing through a Lunatic Mode bullet duel. One eye twitched as hearts and petals exploded onscreen.

“What... game is this??”

-

[Scene: Their Vows, Their Eternity]

At the end of the ceremony, Dragonvee leaned down and kissed Verdantvee, gently, passionately, as the crowd erupted in cheers and online fans spammed emotes and stream hearts.

“You’re my husband now.” Dragonvee whispered, tail coiling gently around his waist.

“And you’re my wife.” Verdantvee replied, arms around her neck, “my shiny-scaled protector forever…”

Still in her arms, he was carried all the way back to their private quarters. Their new immortal life had just begun.

-

[Scene: Two Months Later...]

It was a quiet evening. Inside HydroPyro Café’s back lounge, Alolan Ninetales set down her tea, giving a side glance to Dragonvee, still holding Verdantvee just as always.

“You’re… pregnant now?”

Dragonvee smirked slightly. Verdantvee flushed all over, his leaf cheeks bright.

“Sh-she has… a technique.” he mumbled, hiding behind her collarbone.

“Secret technique.” Dragonvee added flatly. “And it stays secret.”

Alolan Ninetales raised a brow, blinking. Then slowly lowered her head.

“No porkyman allowed here, huh… I see how it is.”

Everyone in the café burst into laughter.

-----------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------

Ch 80 : Heartfelt Danmakuloid Family

[Scene: The Egg of Eternal Bonds]

Seven months after the pregnancy announcement, on a soft afternoon lit by the pale shimmer of the Chronoscene Reflector, Dragonvee, the forever maid of silver-violet scales, rested peacefully on a silken platform in her living room, her beloved Verdantvee still gently nestled in her arms.

She blinked once, and… the egg was there. Laid without pain, without strain, nestled in a nest of psionic feathers provided by the Reflector’s ambient energy.

“So this is what it feels like…” Dragonvee whispered.

Her body, now wholly sustained by immortality, had no need for nutrient depletion. Eternal Maid Vaporeon, her mother, nodded knowingly, standing with arms crossed near the glass wall.

“Yup. The little one fed from your spirit the whole time. That’s the benefit of eternal-form pregnancy.”

Eternal Seifuku Lil Eve chimed in beside her:

“Still feels surreal the first time though, right?”

Dragonvee smiled down at the egg, softly pulsing with Normal/Psychic light. Behind her, Flareon and Keldeo, both forever boys in butler aprons and gakuran, just quietly whistled to themselves, watching the moment unfold like gentle father and son-in-law.

-

[Scene: The Arrival of Evovee]

Later that evening, the egg cracked open gently. The light within was not blinding, but warm, like a pocket of morning sun blooming inside a dream.

A tiny, fur-fluffed baby Evoirian Eevee lay curled within. Her fur shimmered lightly with a silvery coat that radiated faint psychic waves, subtle, but unmistakably tied to Evoir’s atmosphere. Her soft eyes fluttered open: eyes of pale crystal-violet.

“Her name...” Dragonvee murmured, “is Evovee…”

Lil Eve, carefully taking the newborn niece in her arms, glowed with a quiet pride. She wrapped her in ribbons of immortal seifuku energy, bathing the baby in warmth and comfort.

Just then, Divavee stepped in, having returned from a Divaloid rehearsal. Her eyes misted the moment she saw her granddaughter.

“She’s beautiful… just like you were, Verdantvee.”
“Mama…” Verdantvee said, quietly, hiding his eyes again.

Divavee knelt by her granddaughter and sang, a lullaby, soft and unrecorded, one that came from a realm no Vocaloid could ever replicate. The air calmed.

-

[Scene: Preparing the Path]

Elsewhere in the manor, Alolan Ninetales and Gardevoir were already busy syncing the Raising Program Matrix, a projected AI system built on fairy-type logic and psychic structure.

“She’ll need both defense and empathy.” Gardevoir said.
“And of course… a boundary filter for random Erosbloom waves.” added Alolan Ninetales.

Lil Eve, holding Evovee now fully wrapped in a glowing seifuku mantle, nodded as she stepped toward them.

“I'll be her big auntie. Just like Mama was for me.”

Everyone turned to look at Dragonvee and Verdantvee, still locked in their bridal cradle position. The new parents only smiled at their child… the start of a new eternity.

-

[Scene: Evovee Enters the Spotlight]

Three months after Evovee’s birth, the Dragonlet fandom ignited with excitement, Dragotlet’s new update dropped a surprise announcement:

“Daughter of the Original Dev: Baby Evovee Confirmed!”

The fandom erupted with love. Fanartists immediately drew grown-up projections of Evovee, some in radiant maid armor, some in twin psychic cannons, some imagining her with stylized ears and tech-noir wings.
Others modded her into fangames, complete with Normal/Psychic bullets and bridal-borne passive effects.

News threads boomed:

“Dragonvee’s line continues! Baby Evovee is canon!!”
“Playable Evovee when!?”
“Daughter of Eternal Dev and Bridal-Locked Husband… That’s some lore.”
“Verdantvee is just chillin’ in her arms like: 
- husband duties done
- baby out
- still being carried”

-

[Scene: Gaming and Domestic Peace]

That evening in the high room of Evoirian Manor, the family gathered as a new Dragonlet x Divaloid collab launched, with tracks composed by Divavee herself.

Alolan Ninetales sat cross-legged on a floating cushion, ears swaying with each beat of the rhythm-infused bullet hell.
Her tails occasionally tapped to the tempo.

“They really did it… Dragonlet with actual idol BGM. Dream fusion.”
“Also the bullet shapes are lyrical glyphs now. I can't.”

Divavee, recently offstage from her concert tour, joined in wearing a casual hoodie over her glam idol gear, tapping keys at near-pro level while sipping berry soda.

Across the room, Dragonvee, ever strong and patient, still carried Verdantvee in her arms, even while playing.

Despite her limited hand movement, she navigated Lunatic difficulty calmly, thumb-flicking across controls.

“Still got it.” she murmured.
“Wife’s unstoppable.” Verdantvee whispered shyly, his head nuzzled into her shoulder.

Nearby, Lil Eve helped baby Evovee take her first sips from a star bottle, while Keldeo fed her small spoonfuls of steamed berries.

In the kitchen space, Vaporeon and Flareon moved in sync. With years of practice and eternity of patience, they were the warm parental pair of the house, preparing soft, nutritious snacks for everyone.

-

[Scene: Reflections of the Fox]

Watching the peaceful harmony of this gathering, Alolan Ninetales stared momentarily into the faint gleam of the windowpane.

She thought of the moment months ago when Enefftian Ninetales visited Heavenly Verdant, agitated, guarded, still wrapped in mistrust and uncertainty. And yet, not without reason. The Enefftian line never had many good choices. Brutality was their history. Survival was their only pride.

Still… her.

The fact that her own descendant survived, and didn’t end up as cruel as the rest, was its own small comfort.

“Peace is a strange luxury.” she said softly.

Gardevoir, now sitting beside her polishing her wand-staff, smiled gently.

“But worth guarding, don’t you think?”

-

[Final Scene: “Under the Starsong”]

The evening sky over Evoir shimmered with twin moons and distant auroras, a sight that only a few planets in the system ever offered. In the vast garden balcony of the manor, the whole family gathered, wrapped in warmth and tranquility.

Above them, subtle stars twinkled through Chronoscene Reflector’s translucent field, filtering cosmic light like a gentle dream. Floating petals drifted on the wind, leftovers from earlier blooms, trailing behind like shooting stars.

Divavee stood upon a raised stone pedestal, eyes closed, her voice rising in a hauntingly beautiful Vocaloid-inspired Stargazer song, a track never released in Divaloid albums, sung live only once.

“We gaze, and time forgets to move...
Hearts immortal, tethered by truth...
Even if skies fall, the stars stay near...
Forever’s quiet… but never unclear.”

Her voice rang soft and clear across the valley.

Vaporeon, smiling calmly, gently carried Flareon in her arms, an old yet forever-new ritual between them. Flareon relaxed into her hold with deep trust, and together, they hummed to the melody.

On the lawn, Lil Eve and Keldeo sat close, Evovee resting in Lil Eve’s arms. The baby cooed gently, reaching one tiny paw toward the stars. Keldeo leaned over and nuzzled both girls affectionately, quiet in his contentment. They looked like young parents, not just guardians, bonded by care and legacy.

Near the edge of the balcony, Dragonvee, clad in her glimmering maid armor, held Verdantvee tenderly as always, her arms a cradle of eternal love. As the music swelled and twinkling lights passed over them, she turned toward him and kissed him on the forehead, then gently on the lips.

Verdantvee flushed, whispering softly:

“You really did it…
You built forever…”

Dragonvee answered, eyes calm but brimming with warmth:

“And you stayed with me through it all.”

As Divavee’s final notes echoed into the night, a gentle breeze swept across them all. Every pair, parent, child, lover, friend, looked upward, breathing in the serenity of a hard-won peace.

No alarms.
No betrayals.
No loops.
Just a moment of real eternity, starlit and shared.

And far away, beyond visibility, Enefftian Ninetales, watching the stars from her own corner of a cold, uncertain world… sighed.

She did not understand how they won such peace. But somewhere deep down, she hoped she might learn.

-----------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------

Ch 81 : Math Class Joke and Danmakuloid Anime

[Scene: Math Joke Initiation]
Alolan Ninetales is standing before a glowing frostboard near the Evoirian courtyard, drawing out the numbers:
“3¹², or 9²?” she muses with a sly smirk.
She draws them both in the air with Frost Print, crystallizing shimmering math signs that glow like constellations.
The numbers hover and spin, pure logic made aesthetic.

“Chapter 81. Mathematically elegant,” she says.
“Like how time loops always find a way back to one.”

-

[Scene: Musical Reaction]
From the nearby tree shade where verdant softness meets scaly protection, Dragonvee sits cross-legged, forever holding her husband Verdantvee in her arms.
Despite the posture lock, they’re both deep into sound mixing, composing a new BGM track for Dragonlet: Divaloid Fusion Edition.

The math pun catches their ears.
Verdantvee giggles softly, shy as always.
Dragonvee grins wide and begins to hum an old fan track:
"Perfect Math Class", a Dragonlet fandom remix they both loved from the early online era.

Together, they begin softly singing:

“Sensei wa suki desu ka?”
“Yes, very much.”

Alolan Ninetales pauses mid-joke, blinks, then bursts into frozen laughter.
“Don’t forget ‘Sayonara Temperature Laws’!” she shouts, and carves a parabola in the sky.

-

[Scene: Math Meets Music]
The moment becomes a small spontaneous concert.
The ice patterns of (9)² and (3)^4 float in sequence like rhythm notes.
Dragonvee taps them with her clawed fingers while Verdantvee syncs his soft male voice into the melody.

They remix the visual joke into a math-music fusion fan tribute right there, "Math Danmaku Sonata Op.81."

-

[Scene: Audience Gathering]
Vaporeon (holding Flareon again) hums to the beat from the balcony kitchen.
Lil Eve sways while rocking baby Evovee.
Even Groundvee, nearby fixing some outdoor mech, pauses and claps once, saying, “Ninetales math jokes never get old…”

Gardevoir nods, and uses gentle psychic light to draw fractals in the sky, evolving Alolan Ninetales’ math signs into glowing Euler spirals.
Keldeo joins in by drawing sword slashes that match the beat.

-

[Scene: Return of the Director]

The crystal dusk glows over Evoir when a gentle rift opens, an authorized travel corridor, flaring green-purple with shimmering clearance sigils.

Out walks Boggyvee, fur in muted jade and lavender stripes, a dignified weariness in his gait. He adjusts his studio director's scarf and takes a moment to soak in the scene: swirling math art, music echoes, his son forever held in scaled arms, and Divavee, his once-wild muse, shining like a starlit diva.

Before anyone else can greet him, Divavee swoops in with nostalgic speed, bridal-carrying Boggyvee with flair. He yelps, blushing deeply as she grins, “Told you I'd carry you again if our legacy ever hit planetary level.”
Boggyvee mutters, “...and now it’s interplanetary.”

Verdantvee blushes in Dragonvee’s arms, muttering, “That’s where I got it from…”

-

[Scene: Family Reunion and Dream Rekindled]

Boggyvee, still in Divavee’s arms, watches the math-song celebration end in soft applause.

He speaks to Dragonvee with a smile, “I once directed your old trailers 6969 years ago… but now I want to direct again. For you. For our son. Dragonlet x Divaloid needs a cinematic world.”

Dragonvee nods, deeply moved.
“I accept,” she says. “Let’s build it as a family.”

-

[Scene: A Diva, A Director, and A Muse]

To commemorate the moment, Divavee steps into the snowlit stage near Alolan Ninetales’ drawing board.
Her voice rings out, not just as an idol, but as a matriarch reborn with purpose.

She sings a new version of the Divaloid Anthem, joined by instrumental harmonies from Verdantvee.
Boggyvee closes his eyes, imagining the storyboards already.

Gardevoir, standing beside the math spiral visuals, lifts a stylus with psychic grace and draws herself on the drawboard, donning a futuristic, Vocaloid-inspired outfit with starlight mesh, layered skirt, and a gentle aurora visor.
“Maybe I’ll cameo as an unlockable skin,” she muses.

Everyone laughs softly as the dusk fully deepens, and Evoir’s sky pulses with quiet pride.

-

[Scene: Spark of a New Flame]

The melodic wind outside shifts as hooves gently echo into the courtyard.

Evoirian Rapidash, her mane glowing both steam-blue and ember-pink, gallops in with saddlepacks overflowing with holographic scrolls, scripts, pitch boards, and DVD box mockups.

She pants with joy. “They're ready. All the scripts. I pulled every unfinished anime pitch, fan storyboard, and cinematic wishlist ever posted online for Dragonlet or Divaloid. Outsiders keep thinking both were anime anyway, so why not make it real?”

She spreads her wings slightly, steaming trails curling behind her.
“With what I learned from the My Little Ponyta fandom, we can create a passionate learning studio. Bring fans together. Let the fandom direct itself. Everyone earns, everyone grows.”

Lil Eve, holding baby Evovee, squeals softly.
“I always wanted a magical girl spin-off… We can give her one! Evovee as a future Eevee heroine… transformation sequences... friendship lasers!”
Evovee giggles in her arms, ears twitching to the rhythm of possibilities.

Keldeo crosses his forelegs coolly. “I'll choreograph the warhorse scenes. No fake gallops, only real battleforms.”
He whinnies with pride, his gakuran fluttering slightly from a nearby fan breeze.

Alolan Ninetales stretches her neck lazily, then taps her icy paw on the courtyard tiles.
“I demand to be cast as the ‘Number Nine’... you know what that means. Coldest. Strongest. Slightly unhinged.”
Her smirk tells all. Her icy tail paints a frosty “9²” in midair, lingering like math graffiti.

Verdantvee, still nestled against Dragonvee’s heart, speaks up timidly.
“I-I’ll compose the theme songs and do the shy-boy voice lines…”
He glances at the others, blinking shyly. “Only if there’s a duet scene with my wife.”

Dragonvee holds him closer, wings gently cloaked over him. “There will be,” she says, gently determined. “There always will be.”

-

[Scene: A Universe Begins]

Rapidash gathers the group. “So this is it, then. Not just a game… not just music. We begin the true birth of the Dragonlet × Divaloid Universe Anime.”

She tosses an old, symbolic clapperboard into the air. It reads:

"Episode 0 – When Fire, Music, and Spellcards Collide"

As it clacks shut, the group gazes at the dusk sky together, composers, guardians, divas, and dreamers.

A spark of starlight crosses the Chronoscene Reflector. The birth of a fandom-built anime begins.

-----------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------

Ch 82 : Verdant Guests Contrasts

[Scene 1 – Earth-Eater’s Farewell Brunch]

Inside the modest ironwood café where Verdantvee once served tea with passive smiles and bent-spoon dignity, a new rhythm is forming.

Verdinian Mauville (Steel/Ghost), polished and prim in her metal-trimmed maid dress, slides a tray across the table to a stoic figure in titanium-reinforced robes.

“Sir Oathworm… another compressed tectonic crumble cake?” she flirts gently, tail swaying.

Oathworm Tim, a massive, armored Verdinian Oathworm (Steel/Ground) streamer, looks up from polishing his steel visor with one end of his prehensile back.
“No thanks. Still full from yesterday’s… earthquake festival.”
He pats his gut with seismic satisfaction.

Mauville sighs in ghostly disappointment.

-

[Scene 2 – The Psychic Peanut Gallery]

At the bar counter, Cosmician Kadabra (Psychic/Steel) stirs tea with two levitating spoons.

“Man, you’re wasting your luck.” he mutters. “You got a maid flirting and still nothing?”
Oathworm blinks, flatly: “Asexual. Choice.”

Kadabra raises a brow, then sees a shattered holocam slip from Oathworm’s coil and clatter.

He levitates it, fingers twirling as gears adjust.
“Let me fix that. I’m applying to mechanical university anyway. Practice, you know.”

Oathworm accepts the repaired cam with a respectful nod.
“Solid welds. Thanks, Kadabra.”

On the back of the holocam, a flickering Regigigas death-loop meme avatar flashes across the screen, grunting in an 8-bit font:

“WHY AM I STILL IN THIS BULLET HELL??”

-

[Scene 3 – Cosmic Family Fans]

As Kadabra hands it back, he says quietly, “My mom… Cosmician Gothitelle. She’s been watching Regigigas too. Big fan of Sandslash Requiem. That one where he just... watches.”

Oathworm smirks. “Groovy.”

They share a rare, respectful silence between psychic prodigy and steelstream tank. Kadabra leans back.

“I need a break from Evoir orbit studies. You heading there?”

Oathworm gestures outside to his Verdinian Oath-Shuttle, painted to resemble a parody of Earthworm Jim’s spacecraft, complete with detachable drill-nose.

Kadabra nods. “I’ll get my ship.”

As they walk off together, Verdinian Mauville leans against the café window, watching them leave with a ghostly sigh.
“Even the boring ones get adventures…”

A few steel-type customers grumble in the background, toasting their gears in mild envy.

-

[Scene 4 – Launch from Verdant]

As both ships ascend into the Verdant sky, Oathworm Tim in his chrome-threaded mechsuit and Kadabra in his folding-spoon cruiser, each leaves contrails of green and violet light.

On Oathworm’s rear wing, a fresh decal glows proudly:

"RegiLoop Supporter – Punch Through the Pain"

And as they vanish into slipspace toward Evoir, Kadabra quietly says to himself:
“Maybe I’ll meet that Gardevoir who cosplayed a Divaloid…”

Oathworm mutters back on comms:
“You’d better not.”

-

[Scene 5 – Inside the Oath-Shuttle]

As Oathworm’s shuttle enters hyperspace, the cabin lights shimmer with faint flame-colored overlays. In the center of the cockpit, surrounded by psychic runes and floating tarot gear-orbs, sits Genievee (Fire/Psychic), radiant in swirling shawls, fur a vibrant ember-orange tipped with psychic-pink, her gemstone eyes closed in calm trance.

She snaps her eyes open with a flourish and twirls mid-air with Shantae-like flair:
“Whew! I was starting to wish you brought me a snack, not a Kadabra.”

Oathworm grunts, strapping into the co-pilot chair.
“No snacks. Just a confused scholar.”

Cosmician Kadabra, stepping aboard and buckling into the third seat, stares.
“...Wait. You live with her? You’re not dating?”

Genievee beams. “Heehee~! Nope! Asexy psychic fire pals~! Been that way since Oathworm had zero emotions and I had too many.” She wiggles her eyebrows mischievously.
“We grant each other freedom and snack coupons.”

Oathworm deadpans, “She grants wishes. I grant firewall protection.”

Kadabra looks between them, completely baffled.
“You’re both asexual? Voluntarily??”

Genievee winks. “Voluntarily and glamorously.”

She taps a floating mirror with her tail. A reflection of Verdantvee working at the old café flashes briefly, a faint psychic memory.

“Also...” she adds with a proud smirk, “I’m Verdantvee’s cousin. Technically I’m psychic royalty now.”

Kadabra looks even more broken inside. “This… this defies every romance script ever written.”

Oathworm replies, “Good.”

-

[Scene 6 – Hyperspace Tarot and Sibling Shades]

As the ship stabilizes, Genievee hovers upside-down, arranging psychic tarot cards in midair ,  one card shows Dragonvee, another Verdantvee, both holding hands inside a music note sigil.

“Yup. Saw that coming.,” she says casually, then glances at Kadabra.
“Wanna know your fate?”

Kadabra crosses his arms. “No.”

She spins a card anyway, it shows him covered in glitter, trapped in a Danmaku love triangle with fanboys.

“Too late.”

Oathworm, without missing a beat, mutters,
“He deserves it.”

-

[Scene 7 – Preparing to Enter Evoir]

As they reach the spacegate to Evoir, Genievee hums a Divaloid track and synchronizes the rhythm with the warp corridor. The controls light up in pink flames, scanning her aura as a valid family member.

Kadabra slumps in his seat. “I’m entering the land of immortal musical couples while stuck between a fire-seer and a tank worm.”

Genievee grins with pure joy.
“Welcome to our fanfic!”

-

[Scene 8 – Homeland Reveal]

As the trio’s shuttle descends, shimmering through the upper skies of Evoir, a Galaxian Golurk floats in place, radiating light from his chest glyph. He salutes with a mechanical echo.

“Welcome home, Cosmician Kadabra. Visa-certified visitors detected. Processing... holographic confirmation... approved.”

In synchronized timing, both Oathworm and Genievee flash holo-visas from their wrists, Verdant-coded and flame-psychic in hue respectively.

Kadabra sighs under his breath.

“Yeah, this land of immortal musicals and orbital math jokes... is my homeland. Unfortunately.”

Genievee spins in place and whispers,

“So poetic. So tragic. So... Divaloid.”

-

[Scene 9 – At Cosmician Sandslash’s Apartment]

The door slides open with a nostalgic chime. Cosmician Sandslash, wearing galaxy-print house robes and thick-rimmed stream goggles, grins.

“Yo. Got new company?”

He gestures the trio in. Inside, Regigigas is hunched over a cosmic console, playing a brutal fusion game: Crash x Earthworm x Shantae, where his form swaps between:

- Mask-wearing twin-jumping bandicoot Gigas

- Blaster-toting earthworm suit Gigas

- Whip-swinging, spell-casting Genie Gigas

He mutters to himself while dodging lasers and mistiming TNT bonks:

“Lunatic crate physics... At least this one’s merciful... oh wait, NO NO NITRO ON CEILING!”

BOOM

The screen reads: “DEATH #∞: BONKIFIED”

Sandslash nods solemnly.

“His current run’s on the ‘Puzzle Switch Limited Gimmick Percent.’ Less painful death category, top 10% leaderboard.”

-

[Scene 10 – Reactions and Dispersal]

Genievee cringes, tail flame dimming into pastel pink.

“Eww... gross... endless dying in form-swaps? No. Just no. That ain’t aesthetic. I’m off to hug my cousins and vibe in a dress.”

She floats out with psychic grace, heading for the Dragonlet–Divaloid circle.

Oathworm tightens his mech suit.

“This death loop is highly technical. I respect it.”

Kadabra, arms folded, watching Regigigas respawn:

“And I keep telling myself this is academic research...”

They both sit beside Regigigas, who mumbles:

“Why are all Evoirian guests here either immortal or emotionally unavailable?”

Kadabra replies dryly,

“Because the emotionally available ones all got married in bridal-lock.”

BOOM.
Another bonk death. Least painful. High score incremented.

-

[Scene 11 – Reunion at HydroPyro Café]

As Genievee steps into the soft-lit charm of HydroPyro Café, where firelight flickers against gently flowing water walls, the familiar notes of Divavee’s voice trail through the warm air. She’s in mid-performance, a song equal parts haunting and radiant, tuned to the café’s relaxed ambiance. Her voice, shaped by years of Divaloid perfection, dances across the polished tile.

Behind the counters, Vaporeon swishes in a graceful arc, handing steaming drinks to guests, while Flareon flips café treats on a low flametail grill, the scent of roasted berries mixing with caramel.

As Genievee steps in, Vaporeon’s eyes soften.

“A guest of light and fire... you must be Genievee. We heard so much about you.”

Flareon, ever casual, waves his spatula.

“Aha! You’re the psychic seer cousin who keeps declining love confessions with poetry, huh?”

Genievee flicks her head proudly.

“Guilty as charmed. I see more futures than regrets, thank you.”

Then her gaze lands on them...

At the center table, Dragonvee, in full celestial maid aesthetic, is poised with a gentle smile. Verdantvee, ever blushing, is nestled in her arms like a lifelong valentine butler in soft-pressed mint-green and black.

They both greet:

“Welcome, cousin!”
“H-hi, Genievee... glad to see you…”

Genievee bows, respect glowing in her eyes.

“Forgive me… I can’t predict the Enefftians at all. Not even the boldest timelines catch their patterns.”

Verdantvee just nods softly, resting closer.

“That’s alright… no one ever can. Just… stay. With us.”

-

[Scene 12 – Regigigas Stream Intrusion]

Suddenly, the door shimmers, sliding open with playful icy sparkles.

Alolan Ninetales enters, tails raised like celebratory fireworks.

“Did someone say weird? I bring… today’s café entertainment!”

She flicks her snowy paw, a stream holo-projector activates on the side wall.

It’s Regigigas, again.

Now in full male genie outfit, complete with floating turban and sparkly cuffs, he’s streaming a chaotic minigame:

“Guess Which Wish Is Real!”
(A chaotic trivia game where every wrong answer is a cursed wish granted)

Regigigas squints at the camera.

“Okay, chat… which of these is a real wish from a 78th-century Evoirian child?”

– 1: Infinite cake without calories
– 2: Talking toilet that grants wisdom
– 3: Pikachu that dies politely every time it lies
– 4: Planet made entirely of onions

He clicks #3.

BOOM.
On-screen Gigas explodes into glitter with the caption:
“WRONG. Now you owe onion rent.”

Divavee: “…what.”

Verdantvee: “…eh?”

Genievee physically recoils.

“Eugh, Genie games are cursed. Nope. I'm not watching this."

Vaporeon and Flareon, without missing a beat, calmly serve drinks.

Vaporeon smiles:

“Long story.”

Flareon shrugs:

“This is Evoir. Get used to it.”

Lil Eve, appearing with a cookie tray, just whispers:

“At least it wasn’t the toilet again.”

-

[Scene 13: Loop Talk and Steel Demonstration]
Dragonvee, still calmly carrying Verdantvee, gently hums as she stirs her latte with a spoon in her only free hand. The Regigigas death loop stream finishes its chaotic genie game, and the screen fades to a ‘BONK AGAIN TOMORROW’ sign.

Verdantvee, still wide-eyed, whispers:

“…Was that… always part of Regigigas’ afterlife?”

Dragonvee, chuckling softly and brushing her cheek to his:

“Not originally… but the audience loved it. He wanted to game for pain reduction. Now it’s a job. Every game, every loop, if he plays well, he earns a less painful death than before.”

Verdantvee winces in sympathy.

“That’s so bleak… and yet… he’s oddly popular.”

“He’s a loopstreamer icon now.” Dragonvee says plainly. “Sort of our eternal clown of catharsis.”

-

[Scene 14 – Dangerous Tools Stream]

Suddenly, Lil Eve spots a new stream notification flashing on the hologlass wall:

[!!! LIVE: Steel Safety with Verdinian Oathworm & Cosmician Kadabra | Guest: Regigigas (loop segment)]
“Today’s demo: Blunt vs. Sharp – Historical Fatality Tierlist”

Lil Eve tilts her head.

“Uhh, why is a SteelCraft education video also part of the Regigigas death loop?”

She taps it open.

On-screen, Verdinian Oathworm is suited in his shiny green mech armor, holding two differently shaped steel tongs. Cosmician Kadabra, scholarly in a mechanical apron, adjusts a camera angle. Cosmician Sandslash, laid back but nerdy, scribbles scientific notes.

Oathworm: “Reminder: This is an educational program. DO NOT try this at home unless your home has a registered mechsmith license.”

Kadabra: “We’ve calculated the torque resistance needed to break ribs versus split bone at diagonal angles…”

Cut to Regigigas, nervously glancing at three simulated steel contraptions inside a virtual arena:

– Crushing vice
– Scalpel guillotine
– Rusty wrench whip

Gigas (flatly): “…Can I pick... none?”

Voice-over AI: “Incorrect. Pick one or get surprise banana peel spike death.”

Lil Eve sighs as Regigigas slowly selects the guillotine.

“Yep. He’s definitely become the stream icon.”

Verdantvee, half-hiding under Dragonvee’s maid apron:

“Is… is it bad that I’m starting to enjoy watching this?”

Dragonvee, stroking his head:

“No, darling. Everyone’s got guilty pleasure streamers. Regigigas is just… universally guilty.”

-----------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------

Ch 83 : Crossroads of Chaos and Calm

[Scene 1 – Chronoscene Room: The Tale of Uneven Eternity]
Inside the flickering, polished dome of the Chronoscene Reflector Room, Alolan Ninetales addresses the viewer directly. Her many tails sway like metronomes in thought.

Alolan Ninetales:
“Some live forever in peace, others in performance… and one… dies for our amusement.”

On the Chronoscene screen, scattered realities flicker in soft transition:

- Regigigas, stuck in his simulated crate-bonk roulette loop, forced to choose between cartoonish deaths while audience polls cheer or boo.

- Vaporeon bridal-carrying Flareon once more across a rainy boulevard lit by neon lanterns, their smiles soft and wordless.

- Divavee, glowing on stage as a diva in rise, not yet immortal, but her stardust potential brews thick in the air.

Alolan Ninetales (continued):
“Immortality is not given to all... but every spirit shines, even when its flame is brief.”

-

[Scene 2 – Visa Holders: Genievee and Oathworm]
Genievee (Fire/Psychic), spark-eyed and cheerfully relaxed, leans beside Verdinian Oathworm (Steel/Ground), the muscular mech-hero streamer. Both gaze into the Reflector.

Genievee:
“Still not leaving. We’ve got four months. Might as well enjoy the weird, huh?”

Oathworm:
“Evoir’s got breathable silence. Feels less like I’m performing. More like I’m… just allowed to be.”

Alolan Ninetales nods approvingly at them. Her gaze turns forward.

-

[Scene 3 – NFT777-Enefftia: Meganium’s Quake Gacha]
The Reflector ripples, now displaying NFT777-Enefftia, and the camera centers on Enefftian Meganium (Grass/Ground), standing beside a mechanical behemoth: the Quake Gacha Engine.

A spinning, gear-laden cylinder resembling a volcanic lottery drum whirrs with tension. A crowd watches behind a safety fence.

Meganium (dryly):
“Gamble for aid. Sponsored by the treasury. How… benevolent.”

The wheel stops spinning. A screen flashes:

“Result: 2 Soil Coupons. Try again next fiscal quarter!”

The audience groans.

-

[Scene 4 – Tyrantrum Hypocrisy]
From the side, Enefftian Tyrantrum (Rock/Steel) struts up, trying too hard to be cool.

Tyrantrum (grinning):
“Meganium, if I could rearrange the tectonic plates, I’d put U and I together.”

Meganium promptly stomps the ground in irritation, triggering a Ground-type counterattack. But the tremor fizzles out beneath Tyrantrum's feet.

Narration:
“But he had Earth Eater. Ground moves turn into nutrients. Lucky bastard.”

Before Meganium can sigh again, a comm buzzes.

Radio:
“Tyrantrum! A soldier was caught flirting with Officer Ninetales and Serenede again!”

Tyrantrum (snapping into role):
“Ugh, ON MY WAY! No one disrespects officers while I’m on shift!”

He stomps off in a mix of rage and hypocritical dignity.

Meganium (flat):
“Love laws enforced by lawless lovers.”

-

[Scene 5 – Closing: Genievee's Observations]
Back in the Reflector Room, Genievee snickers.

Genievee:
“Every time I try to read Enefftians’ future, they just… contradict it with stupidity.”

Alolan Ninetales (grinning faintly):
“Some fates refuse patterns. That’s why we watch. That’s why we remember.”

Oathworm (quietly):
“And why some… escape.”

They continue watching, the Reflector humming as the next chaotic thread prepares to surface.

-

[Scene 6 – "Groovy" Dispatch]
In the Chronoscene Room, Verdinian Oathworm quietly taps a few buttons on his wrist console, capturing the scene of Tyrantrum’s failed flirt attempt and abrupt switch to faux professionalism. He saves the footage.

Oathworm (deadpan):
“Groovy.”

With a mechanical flick, he forwards the clip directly to Cosmician Sandslash, tagging it:

“Hypocrisy dot exe – Enjoy this loopbait.”

-

[Scene 7 – Regigigas’s Next Punishment]
Back in the Regigigas Death Loop Stream, the machine detects fresh audience reaction data from Evoirian and Verdinian viewership.

The screen glitches into a new punishment level:

Game: “Jurassic Lurk: Run from Your Mistakes”

A pseudo-realistic illusion Tyrantrum, scaled up and roaring, bursts through jungle-like ruins as Regigigas is forced to sprint at Mach 3, smashing barriers and dodging explosions while comedic subtitles appear like:

"NO FLIRTING ALLOWED"
"RIZZ-PERSECUTION LEVEL 5"
"Ground immunity: ENABLED"

Regigigas is laughing even while running for his life.

Regigigas (through wheeze):
“Okay. Okay. That’s actually funny, MACH 3? Really?!”

-

[Scene 8 – Reaction Streamers: Oathworm & Friends]
Oathworm, now back on his ship, streams the moment live in a calm commentary overlay beside Cosmician Kadabra and Cosmician Sandslash, both watching intently.

Oathworm (without blinking):
“Groovy.”

Cosmician Kadabra (smirking):
“This Tyrantrum sim has better animation than our government PSAs.”

Cosmician Sandslash:
“Honestly, I’d discipline myself just to stay in this stream. It’s gold.”

They mark the moment with a tag:
#DeathLoopOscars #TyrantRun #GroovyPunishment

-

[Scene 9 – Reflector Shift: Diamond-666 Feed]
The Chronoscene Reflector glows again, gently humming as it reconfigures. The misty projection fades from jungle Tyrantrum chase into a quieter, but equally awkward, scene on Diamond-666.

There, beneath a harsh neon sun and the glass-dome skylines of a militarized capital, stands General Enefftian Rillaboom. One arm wrapped possessively around his pregnant human girlfriend, Junipa, the other hand tapping a spreadsheet screen projected from his wrist tablet.

General Rillaboom (booming):
“These children, yes, plural, will be my finest investments. Genetic ROI through the roof. Efficient, disciplined, versatile…”

Junipa, weary-eyed but emotionally balanced, places a hand on her belly.

Junipa (dryly):
“It’s called having a baby, not founding a startup.”

Rillaboom (grinning):
“Everything's a startup on Diamond-666. Especially life.”

She sighs. He lifts her gently anyway, bridal-style, continuing to discuss projected outcomes with genuine excitement, mistaking it for romantic affection.

-

[Scene 10 – Back in the Reflector Room]
Only Genievee and Alolan Ninetales remain inside the quiet, glowing Chronoscene Reflector chamber. The kaleidoscopic colors of interplanetary surveillance softly paint their fur in shifting patterns.

Genievee leans forward with her chin on her hand, totally dumbfounded.

Genievee (eyelids half-lowered):
“Did he just call fatherhood... capital growth?”

Alolan Ninetales blinks slowly, ears twitching.

Alolan Ninetales (softly):
“I’ve met gambling algorithms with more maternal instinct.”

They sit in silence for another beat.

Genievee:
“...Verdantvee was right. Evoir’s weird, but Diamond-666 is economically feral.”

Alolan Ninetales (whisper-snorting):
“And yet, somehow... I want to see the baby’s quarterly report.”

They both start giggling in disbelief as the Reflector fades into standby mode again.

-

[Scene 11 – Back at the Reflector Room Exit]
As the Chronoscene Reflector winds down to a neutral glow, Alolan Ninetales stretches with a soft sigh, tail tips curling in slow patterns.

Alolan Ninetales (musing aloud):
“Classic NFT777-Enefftia mindset. Capital growth as fatherhood? That’s so on-brand it hurts. At least Rillaboom’s gonna be protective for once... Maybe.”

Genievee flicks her ear, letting out a little “heh” as they exit the room side by side.

-

[Scene 12 – Arrival at the Park]
The scene shifts to a serene, leaf-swept park plaza in Evoir, light filtered through fluttering petals and floating holograms. A beautiful arched pergola frames the center fountain, where a new surprise unfolds:

Divavee, radiant in a wedding gown accented by gently glowing blue-gold embroidery, is bridal carrying Boggyvee, who’s dressed in a regal tuxedo colored in verdant-violet hues. His demeanor is soft-spoken, his voice calm and affectionate, eerily reminiscent of Verdantvee’s gentle tone.

Divavee (grinning, to Genievee):
“We decided. Evoir is where we’ll stay. I’d rather sing in a café and direct in dreams than fly back to dusty studios.”

Boggyvee (smiling faintly):
“Besides... your cousin sings here.”

Genievee smiles warmly, touched but stunned.

-

[Scene 13 – Gardevoir’s Arrival]
A burst of soft shimmer swirls in beside them. Gardevoir, clad in her formal immortal-police uniform, steps out of a graceful teleport, a clipboard in hand and her ribbon-like hair flowing.

Gardevoir:
“Ah, good timing. They’re not eloping, don’t worry. This is just the pre-practice for the actual wedding. We’re checking lighting, emotional auras, wind speed… y’know, Evoir things.”

Genievee raises her eyebrow with a grin. Alolan Ninetales smirks and lifts a paw in a spin gesture.

Genievee (teasing):
“One side of the story: pure romance.”

Alolan Ninetales:
“Other side: background noise of death loops, weapon tutorials, and fatherhood stock portfolios.”

Gardevoir (sipping tea that wasn’t there a second ago):
“Balance, my dears. One immortal’s chaos is another’s honeymoon.”

The trio shares a chuckle while the soft music from Verdantvee’s recent café performance echoes faintly in the background, almost like a lullaby threading the timelines together.

-----------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------

Ch 84 : Until Forever Do We Stay

[Scene 1: Morning After – Parkside Reflections]
Newly married, Divavee bridal-carries Boggyvee beneath a blooming Evoirian tree. She’s in a soft teal emerald wedding gown, and he’s in a dark green formal tuxedo. They talk about their childhood, sandstorms, makeshift microphones, singing into wind tunnels.

As they stroll, they notice a dusty gacha machine left behind in the park. Divavee gently sets Boggyvee down and activates it.

-

[Scene 2: The Machine of Regret]
The machine whirs. Holograms bloom: Neo-Earth couples divorcing, children screaming over in-game purchases, entire households crumbling under dopamine debt and digital debt traps. The final insult: scenes of Humanity Dividend UNITED, a scam game disguised as a “unifier,” sold during the crisis to milk the last coins from desperate families.

Just as tears start forming, Cosmician Kadabra dashes in and yanks the machine out.

Kadabra:
“WHOOPS, Sorry! That one was flagged for psycho-emotional hazard! I was supposed to scrap it after that mess on Neo-Earth…”

Divavee and Boggyvee look stunned, less at Kadabra’s timing, and more at the wound it reopened.

-

[Scene 3: The Jealous Realization]
As they continue their walk in silence, Boggyvee finally mutters:

Boggyvee:
“Our son… got to live forever.
But in her arms. Not ours.”

Divavee pauses. Then speaks gently.

Divavee:
“It’s not too late to join him. We just need to… want it.”

-

[Scene 4: Request at the Reflector Room]
They arrive at the Chronoscene Reflector Room.
Gardevoir, still in her elegant law-enforcement attire, stands watchful.

Divavee:

“Please… show us the full truth of Neo-Earth before the war. We want to understand why we can't go back.”

Gardevoir nods reluctantly.
The Reflector shows the four-month collapse: endless debts, asset burns, and then the cruel arrival of Humanity Dividend UNITED, a manipulative "investment sim" meant to "rescue the masses" but actually harvested their last resources.

Divavee turns away in disgust.
Boggyvee shivers.

-

[Scene 5: Hourglass Fate]
Outside, waiting silently under a vine-wrapped arch, is Bloominian Meloetta, the embodiment of bridal eternity.

Divavee looks to Gardevoir.

“Let her take us. Let us… stay together. No more regrets.”

Gardevoir does not speak. She opens the Hourglass Gate.

Divavee picks Boggyvee up again, bridal-style, and they enter.

-

[Scene 6: A Light Hidden in the Cards]
Genievee, hiding in shadow, sees the zap of the Hourglass Machine.

Cards fall from her sash.
The Lovers. The World. The Fool reversed.
Her eyes narrow.

Genievee:
“So that’s where this was always heading…”

-

[Scene 7: Arrival at Erosbloom-89]
The couple awakens together, still bridal-carried, still dressed for love, amid fields of floating petals and twilight sunbeams.

They are greeted by Aqualice, a poised, glasses-wearing water-jet maid, bridal-carrying her fire-burst butler lover, Burnabon.

The two couples nod in mutual understanding.
Divavee quietly transmits coordinates back to Gardevoir.

-

[Scene 8: Reunion – Hourai Drifter Touchdown]
Soon after, the Hourai Drifter lands: Gardevoir’s sleek starship for immortal reunions.

Offboard come Dragonvee and Verdantvee, locked in their eternal bridal embrace, glowing faintly with Hourai essence.

Genievee joins, holding her tarot deck tight.

Genievee:
“Weird or not… this was the only way the strings aligned.”

-

[Scene 9: Full Circle – Return to Evoir]
Back at HydroPyro Café, Divavee sings once more, voice brighter than ever.
Still in her eternal wedding dress, she carries Boggyvee, her backup vocalist in matching tuxedo.

The performance stuns the crowd.
But to Dragonvee and Verdantvee, it's familiar. It's family.

Vaporeon, carrying Flareon again, nods at them.

Vaporeon:
“Yeah, this is normal now.”

Lil Eve and Keldeo share a knowing smirk.

Keldeo:
“Guess we’re the flexible ones.”
Lil Eve:
“At least we can still switch roles.”

-

[Scene 10: Reunion of Locked Poses]
Still at HydroPyro Café, the sun settles beyond the crystalline towers of Evoir.
The air smells faintly of steamed berries and calm nostalgia.

From across the open courtyard, Dragonvee, forever the immortal maid, gently carries Verdantvee, still in his eternal butler poise. Their forms shimmer slightly, Hourai-bonded, yet fully present.

They walk up to Divavee and Boggyvee, also now in their eternal wedding embrace.

Dragonvee (softly, with a playful grin):
“Looks like locked poses run in the family now.”

Verdantvee, gently cradled, tilts his head toward his mother.

Verdantvee:
“I… I didn’t think you’d follow us this far.”

Divavee:
“We didn’t either. Until we realized the only arms we want… are the ones we already trusted.”

They all share a soft laugh, tender, unforced.
A family of frozen embraces, but never frozen hearts.

-

[Scene 11: A Whispered Choice]
Watching from a nearby bench, Lil Eve leans toward Evovee, the quiet and perceptive daughter of Dragonvee and Verdantvee. Evovee’s eyes shimmer with inherited awareness.

Lil Eve (whispers):
“You don’t have to choose now…
But someday, you’ll decide how you want to be held… or to hold.”

Evovee remains quiet, her gaze curious, not fearful, just contemplative.

From across the plaza, Genievee, leaning against a fountain’s side, locks eyes with her niece.

She recognizes that gaze. She knows the cards.
But she chooses silence.

Genievee (to herself):
“Not yet. Let her story flow on its own thread…”

-

[Final Transition – Curtain Pull]
Above them all, in the heights of the Chronoscene Reflector, Alolan Ninetales watches the scene through mirrored lens, tail coiled calmly.

Alolan Ninetales (to the viewer):
“Evoir's not normal. But it’s honest.
Some seek drama. Others?
…A pose that never breaks.”

The image fades, and for once, the scene ends not with tragedy or spectacle...
...but with stillness. With laughter. With choice waiting patiently.

-

[Final Reflection - Chapter 84:]

As Divavee stood in the quiet of the Chronoscene Reflector, her thoughts drifted, not to war or death, but to the strangely hollow immortality of her own creation. Once, her voice was a freedom. Now, she feared it could be boxed, resold, and fragmented into limited-time banners. 
Memories of gacha collabs from far-off worlds like B. Archive and Nikki returned. The image of "herself" dressed up in themed skins, songs behind paywalls, fans chasing illusion, FOMO feeding frenzy. Was that the fate of her music?

Then, she looked down.

Boggyvee, forever in her arms, in that wedding tuxedo. No longer just her childhood friend, now her immortal partner, her anchor. 
He was her Len, and she was his Miku, not the kind sold off for collabs, but the one that chose to live a song beyond gacha, beyond ownership.

He nuzzled her gently, whispering, “You’re not a product anymore. You’re a being. I’m here to remind you of that.”

And so, in lifting him, she also lifted herself.

For once, her voice didn't echo through a stage or a screen.

It rested peacefully in a heart that didn’t need to pay to listen.

-----------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------

Ch 85: Ditto Suspicious Tales

[Scene 1: Divian Café Invitation]
In the lush cities of Div-9K, Divian Amoonguss (male, Grass/Rock) sets up a casual game of Ditto Amogi in a cozy rooftop café. His first invite is Citravee (female, Fairy/Poison Eeveelution), a light green singer known for her calming voice and playful sass, also the twin sister of Boggyvee. She's intrigued and joins without hesitation.

Next, Divian Torterra (male, Grass/Steel), a gruff immigrant officer tired from patrol duty, agrees to play just to "kill some time." Divian Empoleon (male, Water/Poison) and Divian Milotic (female, Water/Grass) are invited while tending to acid-fruit vines nearby, Citravee’s regular hangout spot.

Then, Enefftian Scovillain (male, Grass/Electric) jumps in uninvited, clearly eager. Amoonguss protests: “Too sus.” Citravee grins. “Let the freak in. I like spice.” Scovillain is accepted.

-

[Scene 2: First Match – Sus Failures]
The first round begins. Among colorful halls and shapeshifting shadows, Citravee and Scovillain secretly play as impostors. But Divian Torterra, with a detective-like patience, uncovers inconsistencies in their paths and forces a double ejection vote. Amoonguss, watching smugly, laughs. “Told you he’s the type to ruin chaos.”

-

[Scene 3: Second Match – Reversal]
Roles flip. Now Amoonguss and Torterra are impostors. With practiced deception and psychological misdirection, they dismantle the crew one by one ,  including a shocked Empoleon. Victory screen flashes. Milotic is horrified. “You lied to me?” Torterra shrugs. “Part of the game.”

-

[Scene 4: The Real Terror, Flashback Tape]
Afterward, Empoleon says, “That was fun. Now watch this.” He plays a recovered ship log from NFT777-Enefftia:
A cam-recorded tragedy. One lone Enefftian Ditto, nameless, forgotten, hated, boarded a refugee ship and, over time, shapeshifted and silently murdered the entire crew. Onscreen, terror builds until static consumes the feed.

Milotic screams and leaps into Empoleon’s arms. Citravee hides under Torterra’s shell, whispering, “That’s not a game anymore.” Amoonguss stares wide-eyed: “Who… lets this even happen?”

Scovillain just mutters, “This was normal back home.”

-

[Scene 5: Evoir – Truth Confirmed]
In Evoir’s Chronoscene Reflector chamber, Cosmician Sandslash and Alolan Ninetales watch the Div-9K game replay and the infamous Ditto tape. 
Verdinian Oathworm walks in quietly.
“I remember that Ditto...” he says. “I launched him into a dead galaxy with my mech’s kinetic core.”

Alolan Ninetales narrows her eyes. “No way.”

She scrolls the Reflector footage, rewinding time, until she finds the incident. Oathworm, battle-scarred, hurls the Ditto into cosmic darkness with a blinding light-speed blast.

-

[Scene 6: Death Loop Hell]
Meanwhile, Regigigas suffers. In the Death Loop Tablet, he's forced to play an AI-powered, nightmare-mode Ditto Amogi simulation. Impostors here aren’t clever, they’re insane. He must guess who’s real or risk suffocation. As crewmate, the fear is being sliced. As impostor, he must survive sheer chaos and glitch logic.
And worse, these bots remember previous runs.

Each time he’s wrong... another brutal “lesson.”

-

[Scene 7: Froggy and Foxvy by the Pool]
Back on Div-9K, Froggy, the Water/Rock-typed human man, hoists his Fire/Ground-typed wife, Foxvy, out of the glimmering pool. Her sundress clings loosely, damp from the swim, and she nestles against his chest with practiced ease. The moment’s peace lingers only until they notice a Pokémon group preparing for another round of Ditto Amogi nearby.

Enefftian Scovillain, still sparking faint electric jitters from his floral heads, waves them over. “Froggy! Foxvy! You in?”

Foxvy smiles, “Not today, but I’ll be visiting Pizzero more often.”

Scovillain chuckles, “Good luck with that. He’ll overheat. The guy’s got serious woman-shyness.”

Overhearing from a nearby table, Citravee (light green Fairy/Poison) and Divian Milotic exchange sly glances.
Milotic: “Oh? Maybe we should all drop by.”
Citravee: “Time to make that oven blush.”

The girls laugh. The tension cracks, and the casual gossip spirals into harmless teasing, mission accomplished.

-

[Scene 8: The Dead Galaxy]
Far away in a forgotten corner of space…
The dead galaxy, where Verdinian Oathworm flung the monstrous Enefftian Ditto two years ago, remains as lifeless as ever. Amid the cosmic stillness, Ditto’s distorted, melted corpse drifts silently, its purple atoms have slowly dispersed across the stars like a miasma of past hatred. There’s no wind in space, but it feels like the corpse is still smirking.

-

[Scene 9: Calculated Banishment]
Back in the Reflector room, Alolan Ninetales reviews the trajectory.
“How the hell did he calculate that vector…” she murmurs.

Cosmician Sandslash shrugs. “Oathworm doesn’t guess. He math-bludgeons.”

Alolan Ninetales nods slowly. “A math genius who can aim a Ditto at a dead galaxy and hit.”

Verdinian Oathworm, from behind, casually adds, “It was a normal day.”

-

[Scene 10: Death Loop – Space Physics Game]
Regigigas, still trapped in his Death Loop Tablet, has graduated to a rocket simulation game. The rules: Build a spacecraft. Launch properly. If done right, you achieve painless, oxygen-depleted drifting in space. If wrong, the rocket combusts on launch or collapses mid-air.

As he floats in a capsule post-successful launch, screen dimming slowly, Regigigas mutters, “Honestly... awesome.”

Then he laughs. “Oathworm’s space-yeet was cooler, though.”

-

[Final Scene: The Dittokind Policy]
On NFT777-Enefftia, the decree had been absolute for two years now: all Dittokind eradicated, quarantined, or banished off-planet. The scars left by the spaceship massacre had never faded, and the public’s fear evolved into state-sanctioned prejudice.

General Enefftian Rillaboom, now fully stationed in the capital's central garrison, reinforced the mandate with ruthless consistency.

“No more shapeshifting saboteurs. The safety of this world comes first.”

In a distant villa, Enefftian Ninetales recounted the story to Serenede, her voice calm but laced with unease.
She spoke of the Ditto’s infiltration, the deaths, and the incident’s aftermath. Serenede listened in silence, her expression unreadable.

A long pause followed. Then finally, Serenede sighed.

“Fear doesn’t heal anything.”
She looked toward the horizon.
“Maybe... those Dittos don’t need punishment. They need containment, support, and somewhere else to exist. A planet that doesn’t mock them for being born different.”

Ninetales stayed silent. Even in a world of policies and security, Serenede’s voice cut through, soft, but impossible to ignore.

-----------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------

Ch 86: SteelCraft Legacy and Enefftian Genesis

[Scene 1: The Ancient Tape]
Cosmician Sandslash, Verdinian Oathworm, Cosmician Kadabra, and his father Galaxian Alakazam gathered in the Chronoscene Reflector room, eager to finally open the old, forbidden recording, the legendary Steelvee’s flashback tape.
The tape was passed down through several hands but had never been fully played. It contained the mysterious origins of NFT777-Enefftia, back when it was not yet a Pokémon world.

Oathworm, munching on a steel-forged snack bar, hyped up the group, calling this the SteelCraft Genesis File.
Sandslash muttered, "If this is real... it changes everything."

-

[Scene 2: The Steelcraft Flashback – 6966 Years Ago]
The tape played.

Back in the ancient era, Steelvee (the Steel-type Eeveelution) and his wife Alexian (a Persian-like alien with galaxy patterns) cruised through space aboard their hand-built steelcraft spaceship, searching for resource-rich planets. Steelvee, known across dimensions as the creator of the classic game SteelCraft, sought materials to build more worlds.

They landed on proto-Enefftia, untouched by Pokémon DNA. Instead, it was home to pre-evolved, alien species, aggressive and resource-hungry. Steelvee’s mining attracted local hostility. The aliens tried to hoard steel and even kidnapped Alexian.

Steelvee charged to the rescue. Together, they battled fiercely against the dominant male gorilla-shaped alien, an ancestor of today’s Enefftian Rillaboom.
In the skirmish, both Steelvee and Alexian were wounded, but instead of finishing them, the gorilla shooed them away.
It wasn’t mercy.
The gorilla wanted the DNA samples from their wounds. He grinned as the ship fled, victorious in his own way.

-

[Scene 3: The Beginning of Evolution]
The flashback accelerated...
3780 years ago, long after Steelvee and Alexian’s departure.

The descendants of the gorilla’s people studied the DNA obsessively, tracing its genetic structure to something far beyond their own biology.
Eventually, their telescopes locked onto Pokeplanet.
They realized that Pokémon DNA was now flourishing there, its ancient seed perhaps linked to those steelcraft visitors.
Through centuries of effort, they engineered drones capable of evolutionary interference.

Some drones seeded themselves on Div-9K, transforming both local aliens and humans into Divian Pokémon and Typed Humans.
Eventually, the evolutionary ripple reached Heavenly Verdant, where the Verdinian Pokémon took form.

What was once a scattered, unshaped galaxy had now been shaped by steel, DNA, and curiosity.

-

[Scene 4: The Present – "Mad Genius"]
The tape ended.
Everyone sat in silence, absorbing what they’d just witnessed.

Oathworm, smirking with deep respect, simply said,
“Steelvee’s a mad genius. A godfather of this mess.”

In the Death Loop Tablet, Regigigas was playing a SteelCraft-SpaceCraft fusion game, holding a steel pickaxe. He raised a ghostly thumbs-up to the screen,
“Mad lad. I’d follow that guy anywhere.”

The scene ended with Cosmician Sandslash quietly murmuring,
“And now, we walk in the steel footprints...”

-

[Scene 5: Regigigas Brags, Again]
While the others processed Steelvee’s impact, Regigigas spun around in his Death Loop Tablet, grinning smugly as he constructed a steel tower in his game.

“Look what’s happening now.” he bragged, eyes half-glowing. “The ripple I caused when I slayed Arceus for that Arceus Elixir, way before Saga 1, set all of this into motion.”

He thumped his chest proudly, his voice echoing through the tablet.
“My moves in Saga 4? That made Steelvee’s parents, Flareon and Vaporeon, go all ‘Let’s be immortal’ just to hold Poketopia together against me!”
He leaned back arrogantly.
“Face it! The reason Steelvee even exists… is me! I’m the unintentional architect of this mess. Generations upon generations of cause and effect, all because of me!”

As he spun his virtual pickaxe in triumph, a Crustle illusion miner suddenly spawned beside him, slamming a rock pick toward his ghostly frame.

Regigigas yelped, barely dodging the lethal strike.
“WHOA, OKAY, OKAY, bragging too much, my bad!!”

-

[Scene 6: Mad Respect]
Cosmician Sandslash chuckled, completely unfazed.
“I already knew. I’ve been following your mess for ages. Your butterfly effect’s got class, big guy.”

Cosmician Kadabra and Galaxian Alakazam nodded in reluctant agreement, both mentally calculating the timeline ripple and seeing it align perfectly.

Verdinian Oathworm leaned on his metal staff, amused.
“Well, Regigigas, I guess you’re not just a walking ruin... you’re the indirect godfather of half this reality.”

Regigigas, still panting from his near-death, gave a thumbs-up from the Death Loop, grinning wildly.
“Indirect? Nah. Cosmic Grandpa. Sounds way cooler.”

The group laughed, even as the weight of this lineage sunk in.

The scene faded out with Cosmician Sandslash quietly carving into his notepad:
"Every godfather leaves footprints. Some, even galaxies can’t erase."

-

[Scene 7: Steel Popcorn Flashback]
As the laughter settled, a steel popcorn particle bounced off Regigigas’s ghostly screen, accidentally hitting the playback controls. The ancient flashback tape skipped backward, revealing an unfiltered memory from 6966 years ago.

On the near-deserted continent of Evoir, Steelvee bridal-carried Alexian out of their battered steel spaceship, the weight of their escape still fresh on their faces.

Proud, bruised, but undeniably alive, Steelvee raised his steel pickaxe into the air and roared with boundless, chaotic energy:
"I… AM STEELVEE!!"

His voice echoed across the lifeless plains, loud enough to scar the sands and etch his name into history.

Alexian, still in his arms, softly sighed.
“…You’re so weird…”

-

[Scene 8: Regigigas’s Death by Cringe]
In the Death Loop Tablet, Regigigas stared at the scene in pure, unfiltered horror. His ghostly hands trembled.
“N-no… the cringe… it’s… it’s too raw…”

The steel popcorn bounced again.

Regigigas collapsed, unable to process the sheer secondhand embarrassment. At that precise moment, a swarm of Crustle illusion miners appeared out of nowhere and buried him alive under piles of ghostly pickaxes and boulders.

His screen flashed:
"YOU DIED – DEATH BY CRINGE."

-

[Scene 9: Ungroovy, Man]
Verdinian Oathworm shook his head slowly, the faintest smirk curling at the edges of his mouth.
“…Oops. Ungroovy, man.”

Cosmician Sandslash simply nodded, crossing his arms.
“Cringe is the one thing Regigigas can’t brute force.”

Cosmician Kadabra and Galaxian Alakazam discreetly saved the footage. Kadabra whispered, “We’re so playing this at the next gathering.”

The steel popcorn gently rolled across the tablet screen, as if eternally celebrating Steelvee’s legendary cringe.

-

[Scene 10: I… AM GIGAS!!!]
Moments after his ghostly collapse, Regigigas respawned in the Death Loop Tablet’s bizarre illusion game lobby. Without hesitation, without shame, he roared with the same chaotic pride that once echoed from Steelvee’s memory:

"I… AM GIGAS!!!"

His voice thundered through the illusion chamber, shaking the ghostly steel walls as if declaring war on cringe itself.

The swarm of Crustle illusion miners reappeared, ready to bury him again.

But this time, Regigigas was ready.

With colossal speed, he crushed them all one by one, 
BOOM. SLAM. CRASH.
Every last Crustle illusion exploded into pixelated dust.

And then, as the final Crustle fell, Regigigas calmly crafted his victory piece: a self-vaporization beacon, his key to the painless death win condition.

He placed his ghostly hand on the activation panel.
With a grin, he muttered:
"Cringe may kill me, but this time... I choose how I go."

The beacon pulsed... 
FLASH. VAPORIZE. VICTORY.

His Death Loop screen flashed:
"YOU WON – PAINLESS SELF-VAPORIZATION ACHIEVED."

Somewhere, Verdinian Oathworm snapped his cosmic fingers.
“Now that… is groovy.”

And thus a battle cry is sometimes how you win life, mostly under chaotic situations.

-----------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------

Ch 87: Vortexian Black Markets

[Scene 1: Tyrantrum's Arrival]
Enefftian Tyrantrum lands his rugged, retrofitted spaceship on Vortex-888, a lawless, bio-pokefied carnivore planet, evolved by Enefftians 2,780 years ago. The planet’s crimson skies and cracked grounds are lined with meat stalls, bone towers, and roaming apex predators.

Note: Vortex-888 is explicitly off-limits to herbivores, omnivores, and all humans by order of General Enefftian Rillaboom.

Tyrantrum shrugs off the danger, enjoying the forbidden thrill as a carnivore.

-

[Scene 2: Black Market Deal]
In the underground bazaar, Vortexian Mabosstiff (male, Dark/Ground), a notorious meat trader with a reputation for brutal efficiency, welcomes Tyrantrum to his shop.

Mabosstiff shows off his premium stock, including Pikachu meat sandwiches, Pikachu jerky, and raw Vortexian Pikachu cuts.

Tyrantrum, drooling with primal hunger, negotiates to buy 69 kilograms of Pikachu meat with no remorse.

Other Vortexian predators nod in approval; here, Pikachu are seen as nothing more than livestock.

-

[Scene 3: Forbidden Transactions]
Tyrantrum’s deal is shadowed by secretive figures, agents of the Vortexian Hunter Guild, possibly tracking the spread of Vortexian Pikachu species to other planets via black market trades.

Tyrantrum doesn’t care. 
He even jokes that he might sell some Pikachu burgers back on Div-9K for extra cash.

-

[Scene 4: Rillaboom's Stance]
Cut to Enefftian Rillaboom on NFT777-Enefftia, reviewing restricted planet lists. He glares at Vortex-888’s name and mutters:
"Those carnivores… they can rot in their own laws."
He would never set foot on that planet. To him, it’s a cesspool unworthy of policing.

-

[Scene 5: Meat Culture of Vortex-888]
Mabosstiff prepares a Vortexian Pikachu sandwich with special hot sauce. He tells Tyrantrum the sandwich is a cultural delicacy. Tyrantrum tears into it on the spot, savoring it with barbaric joy, and slaps a sack of credits onto the table.

Mabosstiff: "Come back anytime. The Vortexian Pikachus multiply like weeds anyway."

-

[Scene 6: The Pikachu Slave’s Lament]
In the grimy pens behind Vortexian Mabosstiff’s butchery, Vortexian Pikachus (Dark/Electric type) work as livestock and labor slaves.

One particularly defiant Pikachu mutters under his breath while sharpening a broken tool:
- "Why us? Why always us? The official media worships Pikachus. Protected, promoted, adored… but here, we’re meat. We’re the cursed ones. Why can’t we be the chosen ones for once?"

- He spits out, almost narratively aware:
"The author hates us…"

Before he can finish, Mabosstiff swiftly beheads him with a single brutal cleave, unfazed and merciless.
Mabosstiff: "Know your place in this story."

Other Vortexian Pikachus shudder in silence, their sparks fizzling into submission.

-

[Scene 7: Preparing for New Customers]
Mabosstiff returns to the front shop, wiping the blood from his cleaver just in time to greet two towering regulars:

- Vortexian Krookodile (Dark/Poison) – A grinning, gold-toothed carnivore who loves his meat spicy.

- Vortexian Feraligatr (Water/Dark) – His quieter but more brutal brother who prefers his meat raw and still twitching.

Mabosstiff: "Welcome back, crocodile brothers. Fresh cut today. Got a bold one trying to narrate his own fate, head’s on special if you want it."

Krookodile: "Nice. Fry it in venom oil."
Feraligatr just grunts and slams down a pouch of black market credits.

-

[Scene 8: Business As Usual]
Mabosstiff butchers the remains and prepares the order while casually chatting about the next Vortexian Pikachu culling event.

- Krookodile laughs, calling it the "Pikachu Seasoning Festival."

- The store’s carnivore customers cheer for the coming feast.

- The cycle continues, on this planet, the Pikachu species are nothing but hunted, harvested, and consumed.

-

[Tone Reflection:]
This planet stands as a deliberate satire and karmic inverse of Pikachu’s mainstream plot armor and favoritism.

- Here, they are not mascots. They are prey.

- Even narratively aware Pikachus have no privilege, their fates are laser-guided karmic punches.

-

[Scene 9: Lycanroc’s Apathy]
Vortexian Lycanroc (female, Dark/Rock), known for her ability to switch between Midday and Midnight forms at will, prowls the outskirts of Mabosstiff’s butchery, visibly disgusted by the relentless Pikachu harvesting.

- She refuses to partake in Pikachu meat, growing sick of the culture that glorifies targeting the "cursed species."

- Instead, she sticks to hunting Vortexian Parasects (Bug/Fire), in this planet’s lore, they are non-sentient, treated more like invasive pests than citizens.

Krookodile, having noticed her aloofness, tries to flirt again:
Krookodile: "Hey, you gonna keep playin’ hard to get, rock girl? I got a hot bone cut for ya, "
Lycanroc (deadpan, chewing Parasect leg): "Fucking incel croc."
Krookodile, defeated but unwilling to back down, grumbles: "Bitch."

She walks off, unfazed, leaving him in his perpetual loser cycle.

-

[Scene 10: Cosmic Observers]
From the Chronoscene Reflector in Evoir, Alolan Ninetales and her old guest, Galaxian Arbok (Fairy/Poison), observe the Vortex-888 situation with somber curiosity.

Arbok, leaning back, shakes her head: "That planet’s a mess. I’d rather just eat non-sentient fishes and bugs. Safer, cleaner… no tragic last words."

Alolan Ninetales nods, slightly relieved.
Alolan Ninetales: 
"Good. You know, Gardevoir and Keldeo are strict herbivores anyway. 
And while Vaporeon, Flareon, and Lil Eve might technically be omnivores, they’re such easy prey to carnivores in a normal world. 
Except… well, those five are immortal. 
Their meat would just regenerate and poison carnivore stomachs anyway. Free meat’s impossible from them. Nature says no."

Arbok chuckles. "Living poison bait, huh? Immortality has weird perks."

Alolan Ninetales: "Pain’s still real though. Even if it’s endless."
She scrolls the reflector away, almost tired of watching the constant carnivore brutality. Some cycles never change.

-----------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------

Ch 88 : Vortex Food Chain and Refugee

[Scene: Refugee Arrival]
In Div-9K, Divian Torterra, the steadfast immigrant officer, carefully reviews the crash landing site of a battered spaceship. 

Emerging from the wreck is a terrified Vortexian Dubwool (female, Grass/Normal), panting, shaken, and desperate. 

She explains she escaped the relentless pursuit of a Vortexian Hydreigon (male, Dragon/Poison), known for hunting sentient herbivores for sport. 

She barely survived by stealing his spare ship and crash landing here. 
Torterra, stern but compassionate, offers her safe passage into Div-9K society.

-

[Scene: Cafe Healing]
As Dubwool wanders the streets in fear and confusion, Citravee (Fairy/Poison) notices her and gently invites her to the cozy cafe where she works. 

The cafe is owned by Divian Gogoat (male, Grass/Fighting), who has a reputation for offering a haven to refugees, especially fellow herbivores.

Over warm drinks, Citravee sings softly to calm the Dubwool’s nerves, using her voice to heal the emotional wounds. 

She chats with Gogoat, who reminisces on their shared vulnerability as herbivores in a universe where carnivores can be a legitimate threat.

-

[Scene: Bitter History]
Their conversation turns somber as Gogoat recalls the tragedy:
Years ago, a group of egoistic Vortexian Pikachu refugees tricked Divian Eevee children into joining them on what was supposed to be a luxurious vacation to their "ancestral home." It was a trap. The Vortexian Pikachus butchered the Eevee children in cold blood, sparking outrage across Div-9K.

Since that day, Divian Torterra had no choice but to impose strict racial bans against Vortexian Pikachus. 
Though a painful and controversial decision, the measure was widely accepted as necessary to prevent further massacres. 

Even now, Torterra carries the weight of those decisions, knowing what had to be done to protect the Divian citizens.

-

[Scene: The Emotional Undercurrent]
Citravee quietly muses to Dubwool:
"You escaped monsters... but you’ve landed among those who’ll understand. Here, we don't forget the danger... but we don't forget how to heal, either."
The scene ends with Citravee singing again, the melody gently blanketing the cafe in a bittersweet, cautious peace.

-

[Scene: The Karma of Noise]
While sipping her drink, Citravee further recounts to the Vortexian Dubwool how those Vortexian Pikachus were ultimately undone by their own arrogance and noise. Their loud, ego-driven celebrations attracted the attention of Vortexian Mabosstiff, the notorious meat trader, who captured them and sold them off as livestock.

"Guess who became the meat racks this time..." Citravee smirked.

Dubwool, with a rare glimmer of vindication in her eyes, simply muttered: "Deserved."

Divian Gogoat, always dry-humored, chuckled: "That dog is goated."

-

[Scene: Family Ties]
The conversation softens again as Citravee shares more about her family. 

Her twin brother Boggyvee now lives peacefully in Evoir, forever cherished in the protective arms of Divavee, his wife and Citravee’s beloved sister-in-law, who was also an old friend from her earliest days.

Gogoat lights up: "I’ve got their autographs! They’re legends, you know."

Dubwool looks around the warm cafe, taking in the kindness, the safety, and the lack of predators.

"This place... it’s heaven compared to Vortex-888."

She allows herself, finally, to relax.

-

[Scene: Vortexian Horror]
Meanwhile, back on Vortex-888, the Vortexian Hydreigon seethes in rage that his prey, a simple Dubwool, slipped through his claws. 
He storms through the carnivore-dominated markets he controls, an apex predator and the shadow king of Vortexian black markets.

In a grotesque display of power, he swallows a Vortexian Miltank (female, Normal/Fairy) whole, her screams silenced mid-gulp, then gulps down a Vortexian Buffolant (Fighting/Steel) with sadistic ease.
His roar echoes across the city, striking terror into the remaining sentient herbivore livestock, who scramble in vain for cover.

The carnivores in the crowd erupt in applause and roars of approval.

Among them, Enefftian Tyrantrum, snacking on Vortexian Pikachu jerky as if munching popcorn, casually watches the slaughter like a spectator sport.
Nearby, Vortexian Krookodile and Vortexian Feraligatr gleefully devour their Pikachu sandwiches, unbothered, fully immersed in this merciless culture.

-

[Scene: The Prey’s Horror]
Keldeo, the eternal gakuran stallion, was quietly watching the Chronoscene Reflector in Evoir, alongside Cosmician Sandslash, who was monitoring Regigigas's death loop tablet nearby.

The earlier carnage from Vortex-888 had already disturbed him, but he kept watching, committed to understanding the dangers spreading through the stars. 
He thought back to his kind, equine Pokémon, forever vulnerable prey in the great food chain, no matter the planet. Not even his immortality could erase that primal reality.

And then the next scene appeared.
It was worse.
Far worse.

-

[Scene: The Griffon of Vortex-888]
On Vortex-888, a Vortexian Moltres, a male, Fighting/Flying type with the brutal shape of a griffon, was savagely tearing into the flesh of a sentient female Vortexian Rapidash (Dark/Bug type, her form resembling a changeling-like horse).

Her screams were silenced when the griffon-like Moltres devoured her whole, a grotesque display of dominance and carnivore culture.

-

[Scene: Keldeo Bows Out]
Keldeo immediately slammed the Chronoscene Reflector shut.
"Nope. I'm out."

Trying to shake off the trauma, Keldeo glanced over to Regigigas, who was playing a brutal meat-hunting survival game in his death loop tablet, set in an environment devoid of plants. 
The only food sources in the game? Illusionary Pikachu meats.

Keldeo deadpanned:
"Good luck with that, Gigas."

Without missing a beat, Regigigas smirked back:
"Good luck recovering from that scene."

Cosmician Sandslash, who had been casually snacking on Evoirian Parasects (Normal/Bug) flavored popcorn, chimed in:
"This popcorn? Goated."

Keldeo gagged.
"I'm a herbivore, Sandslash. Even with immortality, that’s a hard pass. That scene’s gonna haunt me for centuries."

-

[Final Scene: Death Loop Gaming, Gigas Style]
Back inside the Death Loop Tablet, Regigigas had stockpiled plenty of Pikachu meat from the survival game. The environment was harsh, barren of plants, forcing him to rely on whatever the illusionary game engine threw at him.

As he wandered deeper into a system-generated cave, he stumbled upon something new, a Portal Gun.

"No way... this just got interesting."

He tested it. One portal on the floor. One on the ceiling.
It worked perfectly.

Then the final boss illusion appeared, an enormous, charging Emboar.

Regigigas grinned.

With practiced timing, he baited the Emboar to charge straight into the floor portal. 
The beast fell into an infinite loop, endlessly plummeting through ceiling and floor. Gigas let him spin like laundry, then slammed the portals shut, causing the Emboar to splat into a pile of bacon guts.

"What a way to hunt..." Gigas chuckled to himself, genuinely impressed.

He cooked the virtual bacon. He devoured it all. He overate.
And when the Death Loop reset again, he laid there, bittersweet.

"Over and over, huh... But at least I eat well."

Screen says : Death #∞++, Death Loop Recursion to Bittersweet win.

Game over. Game restart.
Bittersweet as always.

-----------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------

Ch 89 : The Birthday Noodle Tree

[Scene 1: Div-9K, The Surprise Plan]
At the Divian cafe, Citravee’s eyes sparkled as she checked her calendar.
“Oh, no way! My birthday’s coming up… and so is Boggyvee’s! Still can’t believe we share the same day…”

Divian Gogoat overheard while cleaning the counter.
“Well, sounds like we need to crash a party in Evoir!” he said, flexing his green-furred arm with a proud grin. “We’ll close the cafe, call it a field trip!”

Vortexian Dubwool, now a fully registered Divian citizen, looked up from her tea.
“Wait, we’re going to Evoir? That place isn’t even on Vortex-888’s star maps. You’re telling me it actually exists?”

Gogoat laughed, “Oh, it exists. It’s just too groovy to show up on their systems.”

Dubwool’s eyes lit up. “I’ve only dreamed of places like that…”

-

[Scene 2: Spaceport Entry]
Upon arriving at Evoir’s spaceport, the Ground/Fairy Golurk guard thumped his staff.
“VISA check. Step forward.”

Citravee confidently flashed hers. “Here you go. Born ready.”

Gogoat slid his over with flair. “Gogoat. Earthbound legend.”

The Golurk hummed in approval but stared at Dubwool.
“New face.”

Dubwool nervously handed over her papers. “Refugee from Vortex-888. Got the stamps from Div-9K.”

Golurk’s glowing eyes softened. “Welcome to Evoir. Your predators can’t see this place. You’re safe here.”

Dubwool blinked. “For real? They really can’t find me?”

Golurk smirked. “Invisible to Vortexian eyes. Enjoy your stay.”

-

[Scene 3: HydroPyro Cafe, The Family Assembles]
Inside the cozy cafe, the family reunion was in full swing. Divavee twirled gracefully, carrying Boggyvee like precious cargo.
“Happy Birthday, Boggy! Still as light as ever, my love~”

Boggyvee chuckled. “And you’re still the strongest bridal carrier I know.”

Dragonvee entered, proudly holding Verdantvee bridal-style as usual.
“Hey hey hey, guess who’s here! Dragonvee the Maid is back, bearing a precious butler as always!”

Verdantvee, in his butler uniform, sighed but smiled. “I’ve long accepted my fate. I am forever cargo.”

Lil Eve giggled while holding her niece Evovee. “This family is getting way too cute to handle.”

Vaporeon cradled Flareon in her arms.
“Hey, save some cute points for us, will you?”

Flareon groaned. “Vapey, seriously? You’re still carrying me everywhere?”

Vaporeon winked. “Yep. My arms, my rules.”

Groundvee leaned over, sipping tea. “Cosmician Braviary’s out shopping. Said the noise might ‘damage his cool image’ or whatever kids say these days.”

Genievee waved from the side. “Nice turnout today! We’ve got cousins, siblings, grandkids… and oh, look who Gardevoir dragged in.”

Gardevoir stepped in with a calm smile, accompanied by Solarvee and Rock Fox Gallade.
Solarvee cheered, “I brought snacks!”

Rock Fox Gallade sighed. “I’ll be outside. Too much noise. I have to protect my coolness.”

Citravee laughed out loud. “This… this family tree is so unhinged now.”

Just then, Alolan Ninetales appeared, pulling up her Chronoscene Reflector with a big smirk.
“Wanna see how messy it actually is? Check this out!”

She displayed the family tree. It was a chaotic tangle of noodle doodles, arrows crisscrossing in ridiculous directions, little doodled hearts, bridal-carry icons everywhere, and hilarious side notes like "forever cargo" and "permanent maid."

The whole room burst out laughing.
Boggyvee snorted. “I can’t even find where I am on this thing!”

Verdantvee pointed, “There. Next to the note that says ‘eternally carried.’”

Dragonvee twirled him proudly. “Darn right he is!”

Vaporeon shook her head, smiling. “This is the most chaotic, most wholesome mess I’ve ever seen.”

Citravee sighed happily. “Yeah… feels good to be home.”

-

[Scene 4: The Twin's Song]
Citravee leaned in close to her twin brother Boggyvee, who remained forever nestled in Divavee’s bridal arms. She gave him a playful grin.
“Happy birthday, you old leaf. Still cozy in there, huh?”

Boggyvee chuckled as Divavee swayed him gently. “Hey, I earned this spot. No intention of leaving.”

Divavee teased, “And I’ve got no plans to put him down. Ever.”

Citravee giggled and suddenly started singing the birthday song with a playful, jazzy twist.
“Happy birthday to us~ Happy birthday to us~”

Verdantvee, still eternally held by Dragonvee, chimed in from across the room, singing the last lines with a surprising bit of flair.
“Happy birthday dear Daddy and Aunt~ Happy birthday to you~”

Citravee blinked in surprise. “Wait, wait, hold up! You’re my nephew, right? I just met you, and you’re already permanently bridal-locked?!”

Dragonvee twirled with Verdantvee proudly. “Fastest family record, thank you very much!”

Verdantvee shrugged, “What can I say? I fell into the most comfortable trap.”

-

[Scene 5: Gaming Vibes]
Nearby, Genievee, Groundvee, and Solarvee were crowded around a floating screen, deeply engrossed in a Shantae-like genie platformer. The bouncy, magical background music filled the air.

Citravee strolled over and started rhythmically bopping her head to the beat.
“Ooh, this bgm slaps. Mind if I vibe with you all?”

Genievee spun in her chair and started dancing with exaggerated, silly moves.
“Join in, it’s a family groove zone!”

Solarvee, focused but smiling, tossed in, “By the way, Groundvee, these platform tiles? They’re definitely made from basalt infused with psychic-reactive crystals. See the shimmer?”

Groundvee nodded seriously. “Yup. That’s quality rock right there. Wouldn’t mind mining that myself.”

-

[Scene 6: Baby Snuggles and Cool Uncle Vibes]
At another table, Lil Eve gently nursed her infant niece, Evovee, while Keldeo sat nearby, arms crossed, trying to project the image of a calm, cool uncle.

Citravee approached and smiled warmly. “So… this little one is my grand-niece, huh? Cute.”

Lil Eve nodded, “Yep, welcome to Evoir. Grandkids, grand-nieces, grand-nephews, it’s normal here. We stay young, but our family tree grows wild.”

Keldeo leaned back, smirking. “Yeah, yeah. Call me Cool Uncle Dad, by the way. Just roll with it.”

Evovee made a tiny happy squeak, and Citravee’s heart melted.
“This family is dangerously cute.”

-

[Scene 7: Serious Chat with Gardevoir]
Across the room, Divian Gogoat and Vortexian Dubwool chatted with Gardevoir about planetary security.

Gogoat rubbed his chin. “So… how’s the stealth refugee route coming along?”

Gardevoir tapped her reflector. “Currently, we’ve achieved 69% undetectability from Vortexian tracking systems.”

Dubwool’s eyes widened. “Oh… nice.”

Gardevoir chuckled softly, “I thought you’d like that.”

-

[Scene 8: Citrus Gifts and Family Tastes]
Citravee approached Vaporeon and Flareon, handing them a small basket.
“Divian-grown oranges, for the family’s sweetest grandparents-in-law, who still look like they’re in their prime.”

Vaporeon beamed. “Oh, that’s so thoughtful!”

Flareon puffed his chest. “Grandparents-in-law, huh? I like the sound of that.”

Meanwhile, Divavee sat munching on a fresh raw leek, occasionally fed by Boggyvee, who munched on ripe bananas in her arms.
“You know, nothing beats a raw leek.” Divavee hummed.

“Bananas forever!” Boggyvee said with a grin, offering a peeled one to her.

Citravee sat beside them, biting into her gifted oranges. “Well, these are unbeatable to me. Guess we’ve each got our flavor fix.”

-

[Scene 9: Psychic Gossip]
Across the room, Solarvee and Genievee used their psychic abilities to gossip without words.
Genievee: “Hey, did you notice that noodle doodle family tree? Absolute chaos.”

Solarvee: “Total spaghetti code. Pretty sure there’s a time loop hidden in there somewhere.”

They both quietly giggled while watching the others.

-

[Scene 10: The Birthday Cake Moment]
Flareon carefully lifted the fusion cake, layers of orange and banana flavors, freshly baked by his own paws. Vaporeon set the drinks around the table.

Genievee and Flareon each lit the candles with tiny, precise fire sparks.

Divavee gently leaned Boggyvee closer to the cake. “Come on, birthday boy. Time to make a wish.”

Citravee joined him at the table, smiling softly. “Together, huh? Just like old times.”

The twins blew out the candles in perfect unison.

Citravee sighed contentedly. “I should treasure these moments while I can. You two might outlive me after all…”

Divavee, still holding Boggyvee, leaned him into a cozy hug position. “Well then, let’s make every moment count.”

Without hesitation, Citravee wrapped her arms around both of them in a warm embrace.

Meanwhile, Lil Eve looked to her parents.
“Mom, Dad… do the lift!”

Vaporeon laughed and hoisted Flareon into her arms. Lil Eve hugged them tightly, mirroring Citravee’s embrace.
“I feel warm… this is what home feels like.”

-

[Scene 11: The Son’s Wish]
As the laughter settled, Dragonvee gracefully leaned Verdantvee closer toward his parents, Divavee and Boggyvee. Verdantvee fidgeted nervously, his butler gloves gripping Dragonvee’s sleeve.

“U-uh… Daddy Boggyvee… happy birthday…” Verdantvee mumbled, barely audible.

His voice stumbled as he turned toward Citravee, who watched him with a kind smile. “A-and… Auntie Citravee… happy birthday to you too…”

His pale-green cheeks flushed furiously, and he immediately buried his face against Dragonvee’s shoulder, embarrassed. “Ahhh, why did I say it like that… too cheesy…”

Dragonvee giggled, kissed the top of his head, and whispered, “You’re perfect. Always.”

Then, carrying her bashful husband with her, Dragonvee walked over to their daughter, Evovee, who was happily playing peekaboo with her uncle-in-law Keldeo.

Keldeo gave a playful wave. “Hey hey, the little one’s got quick reflexes. Future swordswoman right here.”

Verdantvee peeked out of Dragonvee’s arms. “H-hey there, my little dragon flower…”

Evovee squealed happily, reaching out toward both of them.

-

[Scene 12: Reflecting on Roots]
Meanwhile, Lil Eve sat comfortably next to her parents, Vaporeon and Flareon, who were still sharing their warm family embrace.

Lil Eve softly said, “You know… it all really started with your story, Grandpa Umbreon and Grandma Espeon. Back in Saga 1… Umbreon saved Espeon from that… that pre-chosen-one Tyranitar. That’s what sparked our family’s path.”

Alolan Ninetales casually slid into the conversation, tail swishing. “And don’t forget me. I first showed up during the legendary Porkyman joke incident back in the first Poketopia Saga. Real classy entrance, huh?”

They all laughed quietly, a nostalgic warmth filling the air.

Lil Eve looked around at her unhingedly connected family, watching Dragonvee, Verdantvee, Evovee, Keldeo, the twins, and the others sharing cake, drinks, and silly stories.

She whispered, “This peace we have right now… it’s such a rare privilege, isn’t it?”

Alolan Ninetales nodded, her expression unusually serious for once. “Yeah. Out there, in Enefftia, Vortex-888, Neo-Earth… chaos is their everyday. But here? This is the exception. This is precious.”

Lil Eve gently hugged her parents tighter.

“Let’s not waste it.”

The chapter softly closed on the laughter, the flicker of candle smoke, and the tangled, beautiful noodle of their ever-growing family tree.

-----------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------

Ch 90: The Timer Ticks On

[Scene 1 – Cosmician Sandslash’s Channel: A Legacy Stream]
13 years have passed since the peaceful Hydropyro Cafe gathering.

The stream is live.
The chat is bustling with long-time viewers, now adults, spamming:

"Childhood streamer LET’S GO!"
"Uncle Sandslash STILL GOING STRONG??"
"Day 5478: Never missed a stream!"

Cosmician Sandslash chuckles, adjusting his slightly greying scarf.
Sandslash: "Yeah, yeah, I'm still here, you geezers. I said I’ll stream till my claws fall off. Not today."

Cosmician Alakazam (is Kadabra evolved during the timeskip) floats by, polishing the backup streaming tablet with precision.
Alakazam: "Signal is stable. Tablet’s functioning at 69% efficiency. Optimal."
Sandslash: "Nice."

-

[Scene 2 – Regigigas: The Gamer's New Purpose]
On the Regigigas Death Loop Tablet, Regigigas is laser-focused on a Za Warudo-style time-stop platformer.
He stops time, throws knives in midair, and unfreezes them to hit moving platforms perfectly.

Regigigas (grinning): "Fifteen years, huh? Not bad... I’ve been enjoying this new loop. Less screams, more skill."

Timer counts down. He either:

Wins: Boss defeated, rewarded with blood-themed candies (illusions of Pikachu’s blood) that he overeats.

Loses: Instant brutal gut punch death, now part of the thrill.

Regigigas: "Not as painful as before. Almost fun now. I never thought I’d say that."

He checks his karmic debt:

2,004,573,539 years elapsed since First Saga...
2,096,427,282 years remaining...

Regigigas (dry laugh): "At least the last two digits moved. Progress is progress."

-

[Scene 3 – The Future Hand-off]
During a casual post-game chat:
Sandslash (stretching): "Y’know… I can’t stream forever. One day, my back’s gonna give out, or I’ll get too slow."

Regigigas: "You’ll ditch me when you get too old, huh?"

Sandslash (grins softly): "Nah, I’ll pass you to Keldeo. He says you could become your own streamer someday. Self-sufficient, self-entertaining. A community gamer. Use your loops for good, y’know?"

Regigigas (quiet for a moment): "A public service, huh… I’d like that."

Sandslash: "You’ve come a long way from just dying passively, big guy."

Regigigas (genuinely): "Thanks to you. You made the deaths worth playing for."

They both laugh. The chat spams:

"BRO-MANCE!"
"REGI GAMER FOREVER."
"DEATH LOOP KING."

-

[Scene 4 – Closing the Day’s Stream]
Cosmician Alakazam floats by, serving hot Evoirian tea.
Alakazam: "Tomorrow’s maintenance is scheduled. Another game download completed."
Sandslash: "Good. Gigas, ready for another run tomorrow?"

Regigigas (pumping fist): "You know it."

Sandslash: "Alright, chat, say goodnight to the Death Loop King."

The chat floods:

"GOODNIGHT GIGAS!"
"GOODNIGHT SANDSLASH!"
"THANK YOU FOR TODAY!"

Stream ends. The tablet dims, but Regigigas keeps playing offline.
The timer ticks on.

-

[Scene 5 – Evovee’s Teenage Days]
The scene shifts to Evovee’s room in Evoir.

Evovee, now 13, casually spins a pompom in her hand while watching Regigigas’ stream on her laptop.

Evovee (grinning):
"Go, Regigigas! Stick those knives in time, let’s gooo,  YES!"

The game boss explodes in a digital flare as Regigigas claims victory.

Evovee (leans back, satisfied):
"Death loop king’s got style today."

She closes the laptop and stands, fixing her cheerleader uniform as if it’s her default casual wear now.

-

[Scene 6 – Home is Eternal]
Evovee steps out into the lively household, where her immortal parents Dragonvee and Verdantvee are still forever in their bridal lock, Dragonvee in her maid dress carrying Verdantvee, her butler husband.

Evovee (smiling):
"Morning, Mom, Dad."

Verdantvee (waving from Dragonvee’s arms, slightly bashful):
"Good morning, sweetie! I saw you on the stream chat again."

Dragonvee (soft giggle):
"Verdy’s been bragging about your dance routines again."

Evovee shrugs with a smirk and moves on to see her immortal grandparents, Divavee and Boggyvee, forever young, Divavee in her wedding dress, forever bridal-carrying tuxedo-clad Boggyvee.

Evovee (grinning):
"Morning, Grandma, Grandpa! Still sharing snacks, huh?"

Divavee (teasing):
"Bananas and leeks. The food of eternal love!"

Boggyvee (playfully munching):
"And a bit of orange for flavor. Got enough energy for school, kiddo?"

Evovee (confidently):
"Always. Gotta keep the cheers going."

The household bustles with peaceful energy, no quarrels, no stress, just a short-term immortal bliss.

-

[Scene 7 – The Mortal Walk to School]
Outside, Lil Eve and Keldeo wait to escort her.

Lil Eve (cheerfully):
"Ready, cheer star?"

Evovee (joining them):
"Yeah, but... can I ask something?"

They walk through the quiet streets of Evoir, the soft breeze carrying faint flower scents.

Evovee (serious):
"Mom, Dad, Grandma, Grandpa… they never change. But I will, right? I’m not sure if I even want immortality. I mean… it’s kinda cool, but… maybe not for me."

Lil Eve pauses, glancing up at the sky.

Lil Eve (gently):
"That’s okay. Immortality isn’t for everyone. It’s not a goal. It’s… just something that happened to us."

Keldeo (smiling calmly):
"You can still live fully, even with a limited clock. You can make ripples that last. You’ve already made your own stage, haven’t you?"

Evovee (softly, but with resolve):
"Yeah. I like that. Living with a purpose… not necessarily forever."

Lil Eve (nudging her playfully):
"And you always have family to catch you when you fall, immortal or not."

Evovee (grinning):
"Thanks, Auntie. Thanks, Uncle."

They continue walking toward school, the sunlight catching her pompom as she twirls it with a new sense of peace.

-

[Scene 8 – Quiet Reflection]
As they fade into the distance, the scene briefly cuts back to Regigigas’ tablet.

He’s queuing up another brutal game, eyes sharp, as the karmic countdown ticks on.

Regigigas (smirking):
"Some of us don’t get a choice. But I’m okay with that."

He leans forward into his next run, his timer forever ticking.

-----------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------

Chapter 91 : The Reflecting Glass of Progress

[Scene 1 – The Chronoscene Reflector Room]
Alolan Ninetales sat cross-legged on a floating cushion, her sundress as pristine as ever despite the weight of years. The Chronoscene Reflector Room glimmered softly around her, walls alive with looping memories and galactic data feeds. Vaporeon gracefully poured tea nearby, while Flareon adjusted a scarf he wore as a permanent butler gesture.

Gardevoir stood guard, her stance proud but relaxed, watching the reflections with quiet satisfaction.

Alolan Ninetales hummed.
"Thirteen years... and we still look like we haven't aged a day. The galaxy would call us anomalies."

Flareon chuckled, setting a tea cup before her.
"Maybe. But anomalies are what made all this progress happen."

Vaporeon added with a gentle laugh, "We don't just sit around, after all. Eternal, but always moving."

-

[Scene 2 – The Rescue Project’s Results]
A projection shimmered, showing Gardevoir’s stealth rescue fleet in motion, silent, invisible to Vortex-888’s sensors.

Gardevoir crossed her arms proudly.
"Despite the risks, we pulled it off. Thousands of Vortexian herbivores and prey omnivores... relocated safely. And we’re still running silent. No detection to this day."

Alolan Ninetales’ tails flicked.
"And the Vortexian Pikachus?"

Gardevoir’s expression soured just a little.
"Too ungrateful. Every time we tried to offer them a path out, they turned on us. They would’ve sold us out in a heartbeat. We left them behind."

Flareon sipped his tea.
"Let them stew with their own kind. It’s a self-made echo chamber now."

-

[Scene 3 – The Gratitude of the Saved]
Another memory played: Citravee, Divian Gogoat, and Vortexian Dubwool leading a caravan of rescued refugees through a wormhole gate.

A young female Vortexian Girafarig bowed deeply to them.
"Thank you... truly. I didn’t think anyone would come for us. I owe my life to all of you."

Citravee beamed.
"Just pay it forward. That’s how we grow these new worlds right."

Divian Gogoat flexed a little, grinning.
"Besides, we couldn’t let a cool birthday party teammate get left behind, huh?"

Dubwool giggled softly.
"Glad I came along."

The reflection paused. Alolan Ninetales smiled.
"Small, but real victories. We don’t always get those."

-

[Scene 4 – Closing the Reflections??]
Back in the room, Vaporeon sat beside Ninetales.
"We still can’t stop every war, but Evoir... our little pocket... it’s peaceful. A rare privilege."

Alolan Ninetales lowered her gaze, her voice soft.
"Enefftia’s scams still rage. Neo-Earth’s greed still gnaws. Vortex-888’s carnivores are eating their own now. But here, we managed to carve out something precious."

Flareon grinned.
"Let them eat each other. We’ll keep building, no matter what."

Vaporeon leaned against him.
"And the mortals we saved... their descendants will shape the next stories."

Gardevoir glanced at the Reflector’s timelines.
"And when new threats rise, we’ll still be here. Some things don’t change."

Alolan Ninetales’ tails swept gracefully behind her.
"Some things don’t need to."

Alolan Ninetales whispered to herself,
"We’ll watch the next age unfold."

-

[Scene 5 – NFT777-Enefftia: The Quarterback and the Cheerleader]
Alolan Ninetales’ tails flicked as she activated another scene in the Chronoscene Reflector.

"Not yet the ending." she said softly. "There’s more unfolding elsewhere."

[The scene displayed NFT777-Enefftia.]
A 12-year-old boy, half-human, half-Rillaboom, grass markings lining his metallic arms and vines coiled around his football gear, had just scooped up an 11-year-old Neo-Earth girl in a cheerleader uniform from a gang of street thugs.

As he sprinted to his parents’ spaceship, Enefftian Rillaboom and human Junipa waved him in, the crowd cheering wildly.

Someone in the crowd shouted...
"Yo! It’s like King Kong but he’s the hero this time!"

Rillaboom’s eyes gleamed with dollar signs.
"Wait a sec… King Kong heroic… hold up… we can make that movie. Billions of tickets. Billions of scams."

His son deadpanned, carrying the girl bridal style into the ship...
"Dad… we’re gonna scam the whole galaxy, huh?"

The rescued girl just mumbled to herself while still cradled in his arms...
"I just got saved… by anti-heroes."

-

[Scene 6 – Evoirian Immortals React]
Back in the Chronoscene Room, Flareon laughed aloud.
"Rillaboom… never changes."

Vaporeon sipped her tea, amused.
"At least his son has more sense."

Gardevoir chuckled.
"Anti-heroes saving cheerleaders... seems to be a running theme these days."

Alolan Ninetales smirked.
"Somehow, it suits them."

-

[Scene 7 – Div-9K: The Refugee Landing and Pizza Chaos]
The Reflector shimmered again, now showing Div-9K.
The rescue ship landed. Divian Torterra welcomed back Citravee, Divian Gogoat, and Vortexian Dubwool with a heavy nod.

Torterra gestured warmly.
"Welcome home. And welcome to our new friends."

Among them, the Vortexian Girafarig beamed.

Nearby, Pizzero, a Fighting-type human, and his buddy, the Enefftian Scovillain, scrambled to bake emergency pizzas for the tired refugees. Gogoat’s and Torterra's orders kept stacking.

Pizzero whispered, side-eying Citravee and Dubwool nervously.
"Why are we the ones stuck doing this? They creep me out."

Scovillain whispered back, "Just don’t make eye contact. Bake faster."

Suddenly, Divian Amoonguss appeared, pointing at a suspiciously mushroom-heavy pizza.
"That’s sus. You’re a sus chef."

Pizzero’s eye twitched. "No, it’s just a..."

Amoonguss jumped on the table.
"SUS. CHEF."

Scovillain sighed. "Okay, now we gotta fight."

The Reflector paused on their comical scuffle.

-

[Scene 8 – Evoirian Immortals React Again]
Vaporeon giggled into her tea.
"Scovillain always gets dragged into the weirdest fights."

Flareon wiped his eye from laughing.
"I’d pay to see Pizzero versus Amoonguss in a real tournament."

Gardevoir smiled faintly.
"At least the refugees are eating well."

Alolan Ninetales mused, "Div-9K always finds its humor in chaos."

-

[Scene 9 – Heavenly Verdant: 2 Billion Subs!]
The next scene shimmered in.

In Heavenly Verdant, Verdinian Oathworm jumped up in his mech suit, showing off his screen.
"Two billion subs! We did it!"

Verdinian Lilligant clapped politely.
"Congrats. Your asexual journey still inspires me."

Verdinian Mauville nodded.
"Respect. And now, back to books."

She turned to Genievee, who was calmly flipping through her seer’s fortune texts.

Genievee softly said,
"I foresee more subscribers. But I also foresee… you need to read that next chapter before spoiling yourself."

Mauville gasped. "You’re right! Wait for me!"

-

[Scene 10 – Evoirian Immortals React Again]
Flareon chuckled.
"Oathworm really made it. Respect."

Vaporeon smiled.
"Mauville and Genievee bonding over books is oddly precious."

Gardevoir added,
"Peace looks good on them."

Alolan Ninetales’ tails fluttered as she whispered,
"Let’s hope it lasts."

-

[Scene 11 – Vortex-888: Hydreigon’s Wrath]
The Reflector jumped to Vortex-888.
Hydreigon snarled in frustration, pacing in his chamber.

"So now NFT777-Enefftia is pulling heroic scams? I might have to declare war!"

He turned to Enefftian Tyrantrum.
"You! What happened out there?!"

Tyrantrum nervously backed away.
"Uh... welp... gotta go!"

He bolted.

Hydreigon, grumbling, grabbed another Vortexian Pikachu and swallowed it whole.
"Annoying pests."

-

[Scene 12 – Evoirian Immortals Final Reaction]
Vaporeon scoffed.
"Still eating his own allies. Lovely."

Flareon snorted.
"Hydreigon’s probably just mad he didn’t think of the movie idea first."

Gardevoir folded her arms.
"He’s still dangerous. But his orbit’s starting to shrink."

Alolan Ninetales nodded.
"Let him stew. He’s becoming his own cage."

-

[Scene 13 – Evoir: Evovee’s Bold Move]
Finally, the Reflector settled back on Evoir.
Evovee, now a confident teenager, spotted her boyfriend, Ninevee, a Divian Eevee quarterback, in the school courtyard.

Without hesitation, she effortlessly scooped him up in a bridal carry and walked straight into the locker room.

Ninevee stammered,
"W-Wait! We just started dating!"

Evovee smirked.
"That’s your first mistake. We don’t date. We marry the moment we click."

Ninevee blushed furiously.
"S-So fast!"

She leaned in. "Too late now."

-

[Scene 14 – Final Closing Reflections]
Back in the Chronoscene Room, the immortals all laughed softly.

Flareon grinned.
"She really inherited the family’s style."

Vaporeon sipped her tea, her eyes twinkling.
"Cheerleader bridal carries. It’s the new standard."

Gardevoir simply nodded.
"And so life rolls on."

Alolan Ninetales finally turned away from the Reflector.
"The author… is still a mortal, too."

She paused, whispering just loud enough for the others to hear.
"Which means, the story is far from over, but will one day."

-----------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------

Ch 92 : 2 More Billion Years Passed

[Scene: The Long Passage of Time]
Narration:
2,096,427,282 years have passed.

- Evoir, Div-9K, and Heavenly Verdant remain green, thriving through renewable resources. Evoir stays invisible to unfriendly planets, a protection system still enforced by Div-9K and Heavenly Verdant’s defensive fleets.

- Neo-Earth has entered a Neo-Ice Age / Neo-Dinosaur Era.
Enefftian Tyrantrum’s "dirty seeds" long forgotten, reshaped the continents. Dinosaurs that consume greenhouse gases emerged, overpowering humans over generations.
Humans became an endangered species.

- NFT777-Enefftia has decayed into a bot-infested factory world, barely clinging to survival through its war-scarred trade routes with Diamond-666. Their long war against the Gravitation55 octopus aliens decimated their population.

- Vortex-888 is in brutal poverty.
Prey species like Vortexian Pikachu are extinct. Carnivores now scrape by, relying on fishing and bug hunting.

- Div-9K thrives with an endless supply of mushroom pizza, electro chili pizza, and orange juice. New generations of Divian Pokémon and Typed Humans enjoy simple, prosperous lives.

- Heavenly Verdant remains a cultural paradise, alive with tarot card games, mech suits, and peaceful exchanges between Verdinians and visiting Divian humans.

-

[Scene: The Eternal Gathering in Evoir]
Inside the familiar green-lit hall of Evoir, under the soothing hum of ancient yet pristine technology, the timeless friends gather.

Their appearances remain unchanged, each frozen in their signature look across the ages:

- Gardevoir
Wears her policewoman uniform, sharp and formal with a dark navy blazer tightly buttoned over a white shirt, her pencil skirt hugging her form, and a silver badge still gleaming on her chest. Her white gloves are spotless despite the eons. She lounges with quiet authority.

- Alolan Ninetales
Draped in a flowy sundress, soft and pure white with pale blue floral patterns along the hem. The dress subtly sways with every delicate movement, paired with a thin sash tied at her waist. Her long, icy tails curl around her like a regal cushion.

- Vaporeon
Adorned in her classic maid dress, frilly and deep navy with crisp white lace trims, a perfect white apron snugly tied around her waist. The headband atop her head still perfectly aligned, her posture relaxed but ever attentive.

- Flareon
Still in his butler uniform, the jet-black vest snug over a pristine white dress shirt, sleeves rolled just below the elbow as a casual choice long embraced. His crimson necktie is slightly loosened, a sign of how much he’s let his guard down over the years.

- Lil Eve the 8 Element Eevee
Sporting her seifuku outfit, a school uniform forever youthful: a sailor-collared top with deep blue accents and a bright red neckerchief, paired with a pleated skirt that bounces with her steps. Her sneakers are well-worn but loved.

- Keldeo
In his gakuran outfit, the black schoolboy jacket buttoned up to his neck, sharp-edged and form-fitting. He lets it drape a bit loose now, his hands casually tucked into his pockets, with a playful swagger that never faded.

- Dragonvee
Dressed forever in her frilly violet-silver maid dress, detailed with layered petticoats that ripple like dragon scales, her white apron adorned with a tiny silver lily emblem. Her sleeves puffed slightly at the shoulders, and she wears long white stockings with black mary janes. Her violet-silver tail wraps around Verdantvee protectively.

- Verdantvee
Still permanently nestled in Dragonvee’s arms, wearing his butler uniform tailored in pale green and black, with emerald buttons and an elegant pocket watch dangling from his chest. He relaxes completely in her hold, one hand resting on her shoulder, the other lightly clutching his soft hat.

- Divavee
In her teal-blue wedding dress, silky and radiant with subtle pink floral embroidery trailing along the train, the bodice snug and shimmering under the soft Evoir lights.
She bride-carries Boggyvee effortlessly, her arms perfectly supporting him at his back and beneath his knees as if he’s lighter than air. Her teal heels click softly with every step.

- Boggyvee
Resting comfortably in her arms, dressed in his dark-green wedding tuxedo, lush in color with subtle leaf-pattern embroideries. His boutonniere is still a vibrant white lily, perfectly preserved. His hands rest gently around Divavee’s neck, completely content in her embrace.

Verdantvee (snuggling deeper in Dragonvee’s arms): “Two billion years in your arms… and I still never wanna leave.”

Dragonvee (smiling warmly, resting her chin atop his head): “You’re not allowed to leave. You’re my butler forever. Non-negotiable.”

Boggyvee (sly grin, tilting his head while comfortably bridal-carried): “Guess the family habit stuck. I haven’t touched the ground in a billion years.”

Divavee (softly tightening her hold on him, her teal-blue wedding dress glimmering faintly): “And you’re not touching it anytime soon. This is where you stay.”

Boggyvee (contently): “Wouldn’t have it any other way.”

They all hum happily together, their eternal bonds as natural as breathing.

-

[Scene: The Legacy of Evovee]
Lil Eve (placing down her cards): 
“Evovee really left her mark.”

Keldeo (grinning): 
“A cheerleader that became a legend… not just for leading cheers, but for leading lives.”

A hologram of Evovee’s statue appears:

Evovee in cheerleader uniform, bridal-carrying her husband Ninevee in quarterback gear.

Evovee’s Final Message:
"Mighty girls and humble boys create peaceful worlds. Chaotic boys and gentle girls shine in their own ways. There’s no perfect life, only your way."

Dragonvee (softly tearing up):
“She passed as a mortal… but she’s eternal in their hearts.”

Verdantvee (humming in her arms):
“She walked her own path… I’m proud of her.”

-

[Scene: Groundvee’s Final Rest]
Dragonvee:
“Groundvee… he passed, for real this time.”

Verdantvee:
“He went with style, huh?”

Dragonvee:
“He left earthquake safety protocols, rescue manuals, and emergency healing techniques for generations… even his grave stands strong, right next to Steelvee’s and Alexian’s.”

Verdantvee:
“He’s still shaking the world. Just more gently now.”

-

[Scene: Time Flies On]
Vaporeon has been bridal-carrying Flareon for five years straight.

Vaporeon: “I broke my own record. Five years, nonstop.”

Flareon (teasingly): “You’ll drop me when you see another number that shocks you.”

Alolan Ninetales flicks her sundress hem and activates a hologram.

Alolan Ninetales:
“Four billion… one hundred and one million… 
that’s 4,101,000,821 years since Saga 1.”

Vaporeon: “…Whoops!”
(She drops Flareon flat onto the ground.)

Flareon (face-down): “Yep. Called it.”

Lil Eve: “Time really flies when you’re immortal.”

Keldeo: “And when you’ve lost track of your own card game.”

Gardevoir, Divavee, and Boggyvee
Hum together softly.

Divavee (cradling Boggyvee close):
“Even so… I like that we’ve kept moving forward.”

-

[Scene: The Fate of Regigigas]
Alolan Ninetales (smiling slyly):
“And what about Gigas?”

Keldeo pulls out the Death Loop Tablet from his back.

Lil Eve:
“He’s become a legend… just not the one we expected.”

Inside the tablet:

- Regigigas streams games 24 hours a day, beloved by generations.

- Lil Eve and Keldeo have fully forgiven him for the near-death blows in Saga 4.

Regigigas is seen playing a Star Wars-style game, fighting a six-light-saber-wielding octopus general.

Regigigas:
“Haha! You think this is hard? I’ve been dodging punishment for billions of years, buddy!”

He wins the fight but collapses from exhaustion.

Game AI:
"Final healing protocol: engaged. Gentle exit in progress.”

-

[Scene: The Fate of Regigigas Continued]

Outside the Chronoscene Reflector Room, under the emerald skies of Evoir, the group gathers to witness the long-awaited moment.

Keldeo gently places the Death Loop Tablet on a shimmering pedestal as the timer ticks down.
Lil Eve stands close, her hands clasped behind her back, quietly watching the final seconds approach.

The tablet’s holographic countdown flashes:
3… 2… 1… 0.

A soft chime echoes, not the sound of doom, but one of release.

The screen flickers before Regigigas materializes before them in a shimmering light, his colossal form slowly stabilizing as if stepping from an endless dream.

Regigigas (stretching his massive arms, his voice deep but surprisingly gentle): “Ahhh… 4.1 billion years. That’s a good warm-up.”

The tablet remains on the pedestal, still glowing softly. Without hesitation, Regigigas taps the tablet’s screen with a colossal finger.

Fwoosh!
In an instant, his entire body is sucked back into the tablet like digital vapor. A second later, his face appears on the screen, giving a mischievous smirk.

Regigigas (voice now projecting from the tablet’s speakers): “Still works. Portable nap room, emergency escape, gaming station, you name it.”

He clicks a side-button from the inside, and pop!, he instantly re-materializes outside, standing tall again.

Regigigas (grinning):
“I can hop in and out now, like a backpack. Kinda cozy in there. I modded the software so I can control the tablet’s movement while I’m inside too.”

He casually picks up the tablet and demonstrates, tossing it lightly in the air and catching it.
Then, to test it, he hops back in, the tablet floats for a moment under its own power, zipping around playfully in midair before Regigigas pops out again in front of them.

Lil Eve (tilting her head, smiling): “You made it… fun?”

Regigigas (chuckling): “I figured if I’m gonna live like this, I better enjoy it. Besides… I actually miss the games now. Streaming made me… well, better.”

Keldeo (crossing his arms, smirking softly): “Took you long enough to become a decent guy. Four billion years, huh?”

Regigigas (grinning with a big stretch): “Eh, you can’t rush good character development.”

He winks.

Regigigas (softly, sincerely):
“I don’t care if I’m immortal or not anymore. I care that I can choose now. Stay out here, dive back in, help people, play with the next generations… without hurting anyone.”

Vaporeon (walking over with Flareon in her arms, nodding approvingly): “That’s all we ever wanted to see.”

Gardevoir (resting a hand on her hip, her police uniform pristine as ever):
“A full circle, huh? From a planet-wrecker to the galaxy’s most beloved game streamer.”

Regigigas (grinning sheepishly, scratching his head): “Yeah. Took a while to… respawn properly.”

Alolan Ninetales (softly, watching the skies): “The wheel turns. Some stories never end, they just… grow new branches.”

The group hums in agreement as the peaceful air surrounds them.

Regigigas gently cradles the Death Loop Tablet in one hand, still carrying it like an old friend, now fully under his control but no longer his prison.

He lifts it toward the horizon, his voice calm:
“Let’s see what’s next. This time, I get to choose.”

-

[Scene: A New Threat on the Horizon]
After the group shared their quiet, bittersweet moment with Regigigas’ newfound freedom, they returned to the Chronoscene Reflector Room, a familiar haven now drenched in layers of history and unspoken memories.

Alolan Ninetales, still poised in her timeless white sundress with golden trim, casually flicks her tail to activate the Chronoscene Reflector’s next feed. The holographic screen shimmers to life, revealing a chaotic scene unfolding light-years away.

A sleek, stolen spaceship tears through the skies above Neo-Earth, its hull scarred, its design unlike anything from the known planetary factions. The camera zooms inside.

A Pikachu-shaped alien stomps across the metallic floor of the bridge, his body bulkier and rougher than any Pikachu they’d known. His fur is jagged, his ears notched, his eyes carrying a glint of long-hardened bitterness. His worn black jacket bears faded insignias from countless plundered ships, a patchwork of pirate flags.

His ship’s console flickers with data.

Alien Pikachu (muttering to himself, voice sharp and desperate):
“Immortality… plot armor… somewhere… out there… there’s gotta be a way. I refuse to die like a pathetic side character. I refuse to be mocked… just because I’m a Pikachu.”

He slams a fist on the console, sparks flying.

Alien Pikachu (teeth gritted):
“For twenty-four years, I’ve been nothing but an outcast. They called me weak, expendable, a joke because of my species. I will prove them wrong. I’ll become the ruler of everything. No more laughing at me. No more being ‘just another Pikachu.’”

He snarls as he steers his ship toward the remnants of a Vortexian warship. His movements are sharp, aggressive, yet his pupils tremble, revealing his lingering insecurity, the cracks in his hardened persona.

Alolan Ninetales (watching with half-lidded eyes, quietly sighing): “Ah… here we go again. Another one chasing ghosts.”

She glances around at her fellow immortals.

Vaporeon (smoothing her maid dress, still carrying Flareon with practiced ease): “Haven’t we… seen this before? That need for power, that hunger for more?”

Flareon (tilting his head, resting comfortably in her arms): “Yeah… but this one feels… oddly familiar. Not in the face, but in the desperation.”

Dragonvee (holding Verdantvee securely against her chest, whispering to him): “A young one, still blinded by the idea that immortality can fill what’s missing inside.”

Verdantvee (softly from her arms, half-smiling): “History loops itself. Sometimes literally. Sometimes… through people.”

Divavee (firmly holding Boggyvee bridal style, her wedding dress pristine, humming thoughtfully): “But what do we do when a storm returns, wearing a different face?”

Boggyvee (chuckling softly in her arms): “We dance in the rain.”

Lil Eve (leaning over the table with her seifuku sleeves slightly sliding, smirking): “Or we deal with it like always. Together.”

Keldeo (gently shuffling his deck of cards, his gakuran jacket still perfectly neat): “And we give them a chance. Sometimes even villains become streamers, right?”

Regigigas (grinning, resting one hand on his floating tablet beside him): “Yup. I’ll even stream his boss battle if it comes to that.”

Gardevoir (crossing her arms, her policewoman uniform sharp and pristine, eyes calm): “We watch. We wait. We guide if we must.”

Alolan Ninetales (softly, tails curling with an amused sigh): “Some things change. Some things don’t. But the author’s still mortal… and that’s why these stories keep going until it has to end.”

The group chuckles lightly, their bond palpable, the weight of eternity softened by their shared journey.

The Chronoscene Reflector lingers on the determined Alien Pikachu as his ship speeds into the vast unknown, his search for immortality just beginning.

The scene fades.

But their story?
Far from over.

-----------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------

Ch 93 : Regi Titan's New Life

[Scene 1 – Neo-Evoir City, Underground Metro Station – Regigigas' Studio]
The soft hum of the underground metro echoes through the vast, unused station, now repurposed as a cozy studio. Neon lights hang from the ceiling, old railway signs flicker like ambient decorations, and Regigigas sits calmly by a large retrofitted streaming desk, the Death Loop Tablet hovering at his side like a loyal pet.

Regigigas (stretching, talking to himself):
"Days passed... weeks? Huh. Still no hunger. Still no sleep needed. Looks like I'm fully in the forever club now."
(He gently taps his stone chest, then flicks on his pain toggle.)
"Let's see… pain on, Oof!"
(He pokes his own arm and winces.)
"Still works. Pain off, ah, relief."
(But a blinking warning icon pops up: Caution: Ignoring pain too often may attract karmic stink.)

Regigigas (grinning nervously):
"Yeesh. Even now? I get it, I get it. Old me would’ve laughed it off, but... not anymore. Better safe than sorry."
(He carefully locks his pain toggle to ‘active with limits’ and adds a personal note: ‘Pain is a friend now.’)

-

[Scene 2 – Exploring the New Tablet’s Powers]
He flips through the Death Loop Tablet's UI, now far more refined. The tablet hums like a sentient companion.

Regigigas:
"Whoa… this archive’s… massive. Games from every loop, all saved here? Even the ones I rage-quit? Oh, look at this, Starfruit Kart 89? Classic."
(He chuckles, flipping through hundreds of folders.)
"And now… you can capture games from the echoes around me? That’s… incredible."

(A faint shimmering pulse from the tablet scans the nearby station walls, and suddenly, a retro pixel game forms on the screen, Metro Dash: Shadow Run, a relic of the city's old entertainment days.)

Regigigas (delighted):
"You’re picking up ghost games from the city’s memory? You sly little artifact, you."
(He pats the tablet like it’s his gaming buddy.)

-

[Scene 3 – Setting Up the Underground Studio]
Regigigas uses his massive arms to haul equipment into place: old projectors, broadcast screens, comfy chairs for visitors, all repurposed from Neo-Evoir’s forgotten storages.

Regigigas (humming while working):
"Let's make this station the coziest hideout in Neo-Evoir… 'The Gigas Arcade.' Heh.
Oh, and snack shelf, even if I don’t need snacks anymore. For guests, of course."

(He carefully places chairs with built-in snack trays and sets up microphones for guest commentary.)

Regigigas:
"This time… it’s not just me and my loop. It’s me, the city’s echoes, and anyone who wants to play."
(He looks at his reflection in an old, cracked train window.)
"Redemption’s not a moment. It’s what you do… every day."

(He feels the weight of that truth, not bitter, but quietly resolved.)

-

[Scene 4 – A Moment of Caution]
(The tablet briefly flashes a message: "Immortality acknowledged. Pain systems calibrated. Consequence: Residual Karma Detected Nearby.")

Regigigas (concerned):
"Hmm. So… even now, traces of my past ripple around me. Can’t hurt people. Can’t let the karma pile up.
Just because I can’t die doesn’t mean I should live like I’m untouchable."

(He tightens his scarf, something Lil Eve gave him, a symbol of their forgiven friendship.)

Regigigas:
"Soft steps from now on. Game streams, soft steps, and good snacks for friends."

(He smiles, humming the faint tune Verdantvee used to hum, now part of him.)

-

[Scene 5 – Alolan Ninetales' Notification: Regigigas’ New Game Debut]
Alolan Ninetales relaxes in her Chronoscene Reflector room, her sleek silver laptop balanced gracefully on her crossed legs as the screen pings with a notification.

Alolan Ninetales (blinking):
"Huh? A new stream notification from… Gigas?"
(She clicks the link. The stream boot-ups with an excited announcer’s voice, Regigigas himself.)

Regigigas (on stream, cheerful):
"Welcome, welcome to the Gigas Arcade! Today, we’re diving into my very first freedom game, Subway Gigas Rush! It’s a runner, yeah! Gonna dodge, collect coins, and… apparently, a super-buff illusionary Machamp police guy is chasing me for… uh, running too fast without a ticket."

(The screen shows Regigigas, his stone body sprinting through neon subway tunnels, gracefully vaulting barriers and sliding under holographic signs. Golden coins sparkle as he snatches them mid-run.)

Regigigas (laughing while playing):
"And look at this, no deaths here, just pure fun! If I finish the mission? I get… a subway sandwich! Oh man, I can’t even taste food anymore, but hey, it’s the gesture that counts!"

(The stream chat explodes with reactions visible on Alolan Ninetales' screen:)

- [EeveeFangirl91]: OMG HE’S FREE

- [Octopus_Lover55]: no more loops? let’s GO GIGAS

- [NeoPokeWatcher]: wait… he can just… play now? that’s so wholesome

- [GigasWasBased]: bro went from villain to sandwich chaser, 10/10 arc

Alolan Ninetales (smiling softly):
"Who knew… the guy who looped for four billion years would be so thrilled over a sandwich?"

(Lil Eve and Keldeo enter, peeking at her screen.)

Lil Eve:
"Is that Gigas? Oh my gosh, he's actually smiling now!"

Keldeo (grinning):
"No death, huh? Just sandwiches and speedruns? Man, he’s really out here living his best life."

(They all watch together as Regigigas narrowly dodges the Machamp illusion and finishes the level with a victorious fist pump.)

Regigigas (on stream, triumphant):
"Mission complete! Subway sandwich unlocked! I know I can’t taste it, but let’s just imagine it’s extra spicy mustard today!"

(Chat erupts with emojis and cheers as Regigigas laughs warmly.)

Gardevoir (arriving quietly, arms crossed, soft smile):
"Looks like our ancient friend really found his freedom."

Lil Eve (nodding):
"He deserves this. Every bit of it."

Keldeo:
"And look, he’s having fun without hurting anyone. Real growth."

-

[Scene 6 – HydroPyro Cafe, A New Era]
Meanwhile, Vaporeon and Flareon stroll down Neo-Evoir’s vibrant streets, arm-in-arm as usual, escorting Dragonvee (still proudly carrying Verdantvee) to the rebranded HydroPyro Cafe.

Flareon (glancing at the building):
"Whoa… they’ve totally revamped this place. Wasn’t it more… industrial before?"

Vaporeon (smiling, still bridal carrying him):
"Yup. Now it’s sleek, green, and cozy, looks like they embraced the eco vibe. Come on, let’s get a table near the big screen."

Inside, soft plants drape from futuristic light panels, robotic servers float gently, and the entire cafe buzzes with the stream of Regigigas playing his games live.

Dragonvee (settling into a booth, adjusting Verdantvee comfortably in her arms):
"It’s beautiful here. Verdant, do you see? Even old places can grow new leaves."

Verdantvee (smiling up at her):
"And I’m glad I’m still in your arms to see it all with you."

(They glance at the big screen showing Regigigas now playing a playful Pikachu-capturing game, no violence, just survival and tag mechanics. Gardevoir’s voice softly echoes from a nearby speaker, providing commentary.)

Gardevoir (over speaker):
"Looks like Gigas is playing his next game, PikaTag Escape. The objective? Gently tag and collect mischievous illusion Pikachus before they cause subway delays. No harm, just hugs and sandwiches as rewards."

Flareon (chuckling):
"He’s fully embraced this new life, huh? From a feared destroyer… to the guy who catches Pikachus for snack coupons."

Vaporeon (softly, hugging him closer):
"And you know what? I think I like this Gigas more than ever."

(They all sip their drinks together, watching the stream, fully at peace with how far their old enemy has come.)

-

[Scene 7 – A Glimpse of Trouble]
Alolan Ninetales, back at her desk, studies the next upcoming games on Gigas’ playlist. Her ears twitch when she notices a strange title pop up on his stream preview list: "Pikachu Capture: Extreme Survival Mode", a new game the tablet just picked up from city echoes.

Alolan Ninetales (narrowing her eyes):
"Wait a second… this isn’t one of Gigas’ comfort games… where did this come from?"

(She clicks through the preview and freezes. The loading screen shows a shadowy Pikachu figure with crimson eyes, muttering to himself in the data echo:)

Pikachu Voice (echoing):
"I will take back the plot armor that was stolen from my kind… I will never be mocked again… even if I must crawl through the echoes of this city… even if I must confront the one who thinks games can replace power."

Alolan Ninetales (soft sigh):
"Ah… here we go again."

(She closes the laptop, standing up to alert the others, her tails brushing behind her.)

-----------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------

Ch 94 : The Eternal Punching Bag Pt 1

[Scene: Regigigas’ Descent to Neo-Earth]
Regigigas pilots his tablet ship like a cruising spaceship, gliding through the stratosphere of an old discovered world: Neo-Earth. His camera drones hover beside him, fully ready to record exciting, unfiltered content.

Regigigas (grinning, adjusting his camera angles):
"Let’s see what this place has to offer. I heard there’s some sentient dinosaurs… might spice up the channel."

As he descends, Regigigas spots a colossal battle unfolding below, sentient Steel/Rock-type Velociraptors with shimmering silver scales and jagged stone tails are chasing down a Mortillian Pikachu, a sleek, dragon-like Pikachu with crackling electric sparks and smooth dark scales.

Regigigas (mocking): "Oho! Look at that, what’s this, subway sandwich thief Pikachu on the run? Hey, dinos, move over! I got this one!"

The Velociraptors briefly pause, turning their sharp, ice-blue eyes toward Regigigas. They size him up, not as prey, but as an anomaly.

Lead Velociraptor (gruff, calm): "We do not ‘move over.’ But… if you are here to hunt the same pest, perhaps… an alliance."

Regigigas (grinning wider): "An alliance? Sure, why not? Long as I get to keep my sandwiches."

The Mortillian Pikachu, cornered and panting, snarls at them both.

Mortillian Pikachu (hissing): "You… you’re the Regigigas who escaped the death loop. I’ve heard your name in the forbidden echoes. I envy you."

Regigigas (mocking): "Aw, want a sandwich, little guy? Too bad, this is a no-freebies run."

The Pikachu launches a desperate electric blast and barely escapes by activating an emergency spaceship module, blasting off mid-chase. His ship flickers and sputters as he vanishes into the sky.

Mortillian Pikachu (through crackling comms): "This isn’t over, Regigigas! I will reclaim what was denied to me!"

Regigigas’ stream chat explodes.

- [SubwayBeats]: LMAO sandwich thief Pikachu

- [VCamper]: yo raptor ally W??

- [MortEcho]: he’s after immortality huh? this could get dark…

-

[Scene: Worship and a New Idea]
The few remaining humans on Neo-Earth, having witnessed the battle, gather around Regigigas. 
They kneel, treating him as a savior, one who drives off dangerous predators.

Human Elder (with tears in his eyes): "You’ve given us a chance, mighty Regigigas… You are the god who calmed the storms."

Regigigas (awkwardly waving his hands): "Whoa, whoa, nah, I’m not a god. I’m just… a guy who likes sandwiches. But hey, thanks, I guess."

The Velociraptors slowly approach, looming but not hostile. The lead Velociraptor munches on a fresh-caught fish, its silver teeth glistening from the water’s sheen.

Lead Velociraptor (serious, low growl): "We no longer hunt humans. Fish satisfy our hunger. But our worlds still clash. Perhaps… you can broker peace?"

Regigigas (stroking his chin): "Broker peace, huh? Sounds like the kind of game I’d build."

His tablet flickers as he begins designing a new game right on the spot, a survival simulation where predators and prey trade instead of hunt. Humans and dinosaurs will play a negotiation game, guided by Regigigas as a neutral middleman.

Regigigas (smirking to his chat): "Watch this, Subway Sandwich Diplomacy speedrun, any%."

Stream chat fires up with support.

- [FishDiplomacy]: this is gonna be SO good

- [VGamersUnite]: FINALLY A GAME FOR US

-

[Scene: Alolan Ninetales Reacts]
Back in Evoir, Alolan Ninetales lounges at the HydroPyro Café, lazily flipping through her laptop as she sips her smoothie. She clicks open Regigigas’ stream, her tails twitching as the footage rolls.

Alolan Ninetales (teasing): "When did he even get to Neo-Earth? Just casually saving dinosaurs now, huh? Not bad, Big G."

Lil Eve and Keldeo arrive, watching the stream over her shoulder.

Lil Eve (beaming): "He’s really happy now! Look at him! He’s teaching raptors to… to negotiate for sandwiches!"

Keldeo (grinning): "He’s finally using his tablet for peace instead of pain. This is… honestly amazing."

Gardevoir walks in with gentle steps, smiling as she places a hand on Alolan Ninetales’ shoulder.

Gardevoir: "He’s found his purpose. And he’s making the world… better."

-

[Scene: The Rise of Neo-Earth’s Gaming Culture]
Over the next few days, Regigigas remains on Neo-Earth. In public plazas, humans gather with battered retro consoles, while the Steel/Rock Velociraptors proudly display shiny modern handhelds. Together, they form gaming circles, trading strategies, sharing games, and building a new set of laws.

Regigigas walks among them, not as a ruler, but as a facilitator.

Young Human (grinning at a Velociraptor): "Bet you can’t beat my subway score while chomping fish at the same time!"

Velociraptor (grinning with sharp teeth, a fish tail sticking out of his mouth): "Challenge accepted. I multitask like a pro."

Humans and dinosaurs work together to paint murals of their new codes:

"Fish Over Flesh. Trade Over Teeth. Play Before Prey."

Regigigas’ camera drones sweep over the new society. His stream chat buzzes in admiration.

- [PeacePatch]: they made poketopia 5 but with raptors

- [VGamersUnite]: we out here eating fish and playing retro games, life’s good

- [MortEcho]: …he’s still out there, watching

-

[Scene: Departure and Homecoming]
When Regigigas finally prepares to leave, the humans and Velociraptors accompany him to his tablet ship.

Lead Velociraptor (serious, but respectful):
"You brought… balance. A new game. We will keep it alive. You are… welcome here."

He offers Regigigas a handcrafted necklace made from shiny, polished scales and retro game cartridges.

Lead Velociraptor: "A symbol of peace. Between fish-eaters and bread-bringers."

Regigigas (accepting it carefully): "Thanks. And hey, keep those leaderboards clean, yeah? I’m watching."

He boards his tablet ship and waves as it lifts off, cutting through Neo-Earth’s skies, returning to Evoir.

Back in his underground subway station studio, he finds Alolan Ninetales waiting with her smoothie and laptop open.

Alolan Ninetales (grinning): "You’ve got Neo-Earth fans now. And a raptor cosplay trend. You’re basically an influencer."

She flips her screen to show him raptor fan art wearing Gigas merch and carrying sandwiches.

Regigigas (laughing): "Cosplaying raptors? Oh man, I love this timeline."

Alolan Ninetales (teasing): "Neo-Earth’s not Jurassic Park anymore. You made it… gentle."

Regigigas (booting up his tablet, new trade requests pouring in): "Peace is a good game. One worth playing."

On his tablet, a new invitation flashes: “Predator-Prey Unity: Co-op Tournament Now Live.”

-

[Scene: Crash Landing on NFT777-Eneffita]
Mortillian Pikachu’s spaceship sputters and coughs as it crash-lands onto a desolate, gray landscape, the surface of NFT777-Eneffita, the forsaken planet of ancient scammers and abandoned tech.

Mortillian Pikachu (panting, clutching the ship’s controls):
“Damn it… I can’t see Evoir, can’t see Div-9K, can’t see Erosbloom-89, can’t even trace Heavenly Verdant… Where the hell am I?”

His footsteps echo across the barren plains as he stumbles into a ruined marketplace, littered with broken vending stalls and rotting holograms. A rusted gacha machine catches his eye, half-buried in cracked stone, its signage faded but still faintly readable: "Property of Enefftian Ninetales – 2 Billion Years Obsolete."

Mortillian Pikachu (curious, tapping it): “Huh? Gacha? Maybe there’s some scraps, ”

The gacha machine sputters violently, sending an electric pulse that triggers a robot factory buried beneath the surface. Sirens blare. Dozens of ancient rogue robots with glowing red eyes emerge from underground vents, activating into the now-dystopian world.

Mortillian Pikachu (eyes widening, stepping back): “…Oh. Shit.”

He sprints away as the robots start scanning and attacking anything in sight. 

As he rounds a corner, he freezes: in a decrepit plaza, a female Enefftian Lilligant (Grass/Ice), dressed in a dirt-stained peasant dress, is chained to a stone pillar, bruised and trembling under the glare of surveillance drones.

Mortillian Pikachu (gritting his teeth): “Tch… can’t just leave her here.”

But before he can step in, a male Enefftian Bisharp (Steel/Fire) wearing sleek knight’s armor drops from above like a comet, crashing through the rogue bots with flaming slashes, carving a clean path to Lilligant in seconds.

Enefftian Bisharp (calm, but stern): “You’ve served your sentence long enough.”

He slices through her chains, lifts her carefully into a bridal carry, and walks away without sparing a glance to Mortillian Pikachu.

Mortillian Pikachu (offended, stomping forward): “Hey! That was my rescue! You stole my scene!”

Enefftian Bisharp (without stopping): “Finders keepers. No chosen ones.”

Enefftian Lilligant (resting in Bisharp’s arms, smiling faintly): “Yeah, no heroes here. Just survivors.”

Mortillian Pikachu (snarling): “Don’t you mock me, take this!”

He charges with a furious electric strike, but Bisharp swiftly turns and kicks Mortillian Pikachu with brutal precision, sending him flying through a broken space terminal. His body smashes into a deactivated ship’s console.

Enefftian Bisharp (dusting off his armor): “Destination: anywhere but here.”

The ship’s cracked autopilot screen flashes to life: “Auto-Launch: Calculating Trajectory → Vortex-888”

Mortillian Pikachu (dazed, sliding into the pilot seat): “W-Wait, hold up, what?!”

The ship launches with a violent blast, flinging Mortillian Pikachu into the sky on a calculated yeet angle.

Mortillian Pikachu (screaming as the ship disappears into space): “THIS ISN’T OVER!!”

-

[Scene: Evoir: Studio Reactions]
Back at Regigigas’ underground subway station studio in Neo-Evoir, his reflector screen broadcasts the entire scene in real-time. Regigigas bursts into uncontrollable laughter, nearly toppling his subway sandwich.

Regigigas (tears in his eyes): “Bro got kicked into a side quest speedrun! Oh my gears, that was perfect!”

Alolan Ninetales, sitting nearby with her laptop, winces and hides her face behind her tails.

Alolan Ninetales (groaning): “That was the cringiest one-liner I’ve ever heard. ‘Finders keepers’? Really?”

Regigigas (grinning wildly): “No no, it’s iconic now. We need merch.”

The stream chat is going wild.

- [CalculatedYeet88]: yeet trajectory: 100% success

- [SideQuestedLOL]: bro flew to another SAGA lol

- [BisharpStan]: I NEED A BISHARP SHIRT ASAP

Alolan Ninetales (shaking her head, but smiling): “…Well, at least we know Mortillian Pikachu’s next stop. Can’t wait to see him fail again.”

Regigigas (snorting): “Oh, it’s not just gonna be failure, it’s gonna be content.”

-----------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------

Ch 95 : The Eternal Punching Bag Pt 2

[Scene: Pikachu’s Starvation Arc]
Vortex-888’s skies were thick with perpetual storms, the winds howling like hungry beasts. Mortillian Pikachu crash-landed hard, tumbling into the muddy, bug-infested terrain. His spaceship, trashed. His ego, cracked. His stomach? Roaring.

Mortillian Pikachu (panting, clutching his belly):
“Ughh… how long have I been here? Days? Weeks? … Damn it. There’s nothing but bugs and slimy fish on this wretched planet.”

He snapped up another squirming fish from the river, devouring it whole with disgusted shivers.

Mortillian Pikachu: “This can’t be my fate… I’m supposed to be the chosen one! The reincarnation of greatness! The… urk, what’s that smell?”

Suddenly, thunder cracked above. The waters trembled. A colossal shadow surfaced, a Vortexian Gyarados (male, Water/Dragon + levitate), sleek and brutal, with jagged Vortexian scars and the glimmering mark of Levitate.

Vortexian Gyarados (deep, booming voice): “You dare feast in my waters, little rat?”

Mortillian Pikachu (gulping, backing away): “I, I’m no rat! I’m Mortillian Pikachu! The future ruler! The, ”

Vortexian Gyarados (snarling): “You’re food.”

The chase began. Mortillian Pikachu darted through rocky cliffs and muddy rivers, screaming as the Gyarados hunted him mercilessly.

-

[Scene: Regigigas’ Spicy Vacation]
Back in Evoir, Regigigas stretched his colossal limbs, spinning his Death Loop Tablet on his finger like a basketball.

Regigigas (grinning to his stream chat): “Alright, team. Time for something spicy. I heard Vortex-888’s got some rare bugs and fish. Perfect vacation spot, huh?”

His chat exploded:

[Chat] NeonSylveon69: “SPICY VACATION LET’S GOOO.”

[Chat] ChefDragonite: “Bro boutta eat Mortillian’s lunch and his dignity.”

[Chat] LilEveFan420: “Do a collab with Vortexian Gyarados! LOL”

Regigigas loaded himself into the tablet’s space cruiser mode and zipped to Vortex-888. 

-

[Scene: Regigigas’ Spicy Vacation - Landed]
He landed smoothly by the lakeside, sipping an electro chili juice from a straw, just in time to see Mortillian Pikachu screaming for his life in the background.

Mortillian Pikachu (off in the distance): “STOP CHASING ME YOU SCALY BEAST! I’M THE CHOSEN, ARGHHH!!”

Regigigas (snorting, muttering): “Chosen punching bag more like.”

He calmly set up a beach chair, opening his stream.

Regigigas (to chat): “Yo, let’s watch this. Free entertainment.”

[Chat] BigMoodMachamp: “This the best beach episode I’ve ever seen.”

-

[Scene: The King of the Lake]
Vortexian Gyarados turned his serpentine gaze toward Regigigas.

Vortexian Gyarados: “You. The giant. You’re not from here.”

Regigigas (grinning): “Just a tourist. Saw you chasing this Pikachu, I gotta say, your technique’s flawless.”

Vortexian Gyarados (smirking faintly): “This pest steals from my lake. But you… you’ve got an interesting aura. Stay out of my hunt, and we’ll have peace.”

Regigigas: “Deal. But hey, mind if I stream this? My audience loves a good survival chase.”

Vortexian Gyarados (shrugging his massive coils): “Do as you wish. As long as he suffers.”

The chat flooded with applause emojis and laughing emotes as Regigigas adjusted his camera to perfectly capture Mortillian Pikachu’s next humiliating sprint.

Mortillian Pikachu (wheezing, desperate): “I’ll get stronger! I’ll show you all! You can’t keep doing this to me!”

Regigigas (chuckling to himself): “Buddy, I’ve got four billion years of experience. You picked the wrong saga to star in.”

-

[Scene: The Crime]
Mortillian Pikachu’s eyes darted across the lakeside. His stomach growled again. Desperation twisted his logic.

Mortillian Pikachu (grinning wickedly): “If I can’t out-swim the sea king… I’ll break him where it hurts.”

With a rapid charge of electric sparks, he stunned the looming Vortexian Gyarados, just enough to snatch one of the smaller Vortexian Magikarp cousins, a semi-sentient fish boy, wide-eyed and trembling.

Vortexian Magikarp (weakly sputtering): “H-Hey, I’m just getting breakfast, what, no...”

Mortillian Pikachu showed no mercy. He swung the poor Magikarp like a blunt weapon, smashing him into the cold steel lockers of an abandoned spaceship hangar. Blood splattered. The Magikarp’s cries silenced in an instant.

Mortillian Pikachu (spitting coldly): “Food or a tool. Pick your fate.”

Vortexian Gyarados (roaring, enraged): “YOU WORTHLESS RAT! THAT WAS MY BLOODLINE!”

He charged with monstrous fury, teeth gnashing. Mortillian Pikachu sprinted toward a closing bay door and slipped through, barely escaping. But he ran straight into another nightmare.

-

[Scene: The Predator's Awakening]
A skeletal figure creaked to life behind the door, Vortexian Skeledirge (male, Fire/Dark). His fire-blackened bones radiated a faint crimson glow, his jagged teeth clicking with anticipation.

Vortexian Skeledirge (voice guttural, predatory): “Well, well… a Pikachu. Haven’t tasted one of you in years. I hear you’re chewy.”

Mortillian Pikachu (backing away, panic rising): “Look, pal, I’m not on the menu today! Just passing through, okay?!”

Vortexian Skeledirge: “Too late. You broke my door. You owe me… in flesh.”

The Skeledirge lunged, jaws snapping shut inches from Mortillian Pikachu’s tail. He zigzagged wildly, barely dodging the predator’s flaming strikes. In his scramble, he hijacked one of the derelict ships, smashing the ignition as the door slammed shut behind him.

The engines roared, the ship jerked forward, and accidentally ran over a Vortexian Pyroar janitor, who was just doing his humble maintenance rounds.

Vortexian Pyroar (crushed, in shock): “Wait, hey, NO, ARGH!”

Blood trailed in the dirt. The ship roared off into the sky.

-

[Scene: Gyarados’ Plea]
Regigigas had been recording it all, leaning back on his chair, sipping his drink with a stunned expression.

Vortexian Gyarados (gritting his teeth, pleading): “Please… hunt him for me. That… that thing is no hero. He’s a monster.”

Regigigas (with a deep sigh, flipping his tablet between his hands): “Well, I was on vacation, but you know what? This is personal now. Let’s see where that ship’s heading.”

He discreetly attached a small tracker from his tablet onto the fleeing ship, watching the radar signal zoom away.

Regigigas (to his stream): “Guess what, chat. We’re going on a rat hunt.”

[Chat] BigMoodMachamp: “LET’S GOOOO! THE CHASE CONTINUES!”

[Chat] LilEveFan420: “Vortexian saga is PEAK.”

-

[Scene: Return to NFT777-Enefftia]
The stolen ship spiraled uncontrollably through space, as if fate itself was dragging Mortillian Pikachu back to his past mistakes. He crash-landed into the scam-laden streets of NFT777-Enefftia.

Mortillian Pikachu (slamming the control panel): “SERIOUSLY? BACK HERE AGAIN? What, does the universe just hate me now?!”

Regigigas arrived shortly after, stepping out of his tablet with a heavy sigh.

Regigigas: “Out of all the planets, why this one again…”

The two stumbled into the central plaza, now under the reign of Enefftian Kingambit (male, Steel/Electric), a towering figure clad in sleek, electrified steel armor with glowing banners of currency symbols fluttering behind him.

Enefftian Kingambit (sternly): “State your business. This planet belongs to the house of scams now. No freeloaders.”

Mortillian Pikachu (mocking): “Yeah? Well, I own the main character license. I can go wherever I...”

Regigigas (groaning): “Here we go again…”

The camera panned out, capturing the scummy billboards and collapsing towers of NFT777-Enefftia, as if the planet itself was rolling its eyes.

-

[Scene: Showdown in NFT777-Enefftia]
Enefftian Kingambit’s eyes narrowed. Sparks flickered across his steel blades as he pointed them at Mortillian Pikachu.

Enefftian Kingambit (firmly): “Face me properly, you vermin. On this planet, I hold the high ground.”

Mortillian Pikachu (snarling): “High ground? Watch me jump over it.”

Just as they were about to clash, Regigigas casually reached out and grabbed Pikachu by the scruff of his neck like an annoyed parent stopping a toddler’s tantrum.

Regigigas (deadpan): “Not so fast, little rat.”

Suddenly, the ground trembled. An Enefftian Samurott (male, Water/Electric) in protestor gear stomped through, his electric-charged blades crackling as he challenged the corruption around him.

Enefftian Samurott (calling out): “Enough power plays! The people demand fairness! We demand...”

He skidded to a halt, blinking at the scuffle in front of him.

Enefftian Samurott (confused): “…What in the scam-verse is this?”

Mortillian Pikachu (quick-thinking, with a twisted grin): “Oh! Oh, you’re here to save me! Perfect! See, this guy’s the villain, look at him, he’s huge, he’s scary, he’s trying to catch me! Save me, bro!”

Enefftian Samurott (blankly staring at Pikachu): “…What?”

Regigigas (flatly unimpressed): “Nice try. I don’t care about your moral bait games.”

Before Samurott could decide, a female Enefftian Liepard nurse (female, Normal/Fighting) rushed in, skillfully bandaging Samurott with smooth, rapid motions.

Enefftian Liepard Nurse (hurrying): “Hold still! You’re not my only patient today, Lilligant’s still recovering, come on, quit squirming.”

-

[Scene: Bisharp and Lilligant’s Escape]
Meanwhile, Enefftian Bisharp gently carried the frail Enefftian Lilligant into a shadowed alley. She clung to him, her dress tattered but her eyes shimmering with hope.

Enefftian Lilligant (softly, resting against him): “Even in this cursed planet, your arms are… the warmest place I’ve ever known…”

They spotted an ancient hourglass-shaped machine, humming faintly with cosmic energy.

Enefftian Bisharp (curious): “…What’s this thing? A relic?”

Enefftian Lilligant (dreamily): “I heard… if two hearts enter, they can be frozen in eternal love. Maybe Bloominian Meloetta is waiting on the other side.”

Enefftian Bisharp (grinning): “Forever, huh? I’d carry you there any day.”

Just as they were about to step inside, Mortillian Pikachu overheard everything. His eyes lit up with greedy curiosity.

Mortillian Pikachu (struggling in Regigigas’ grip): “Wait, immortality? Again? Oh no, you’re not ditching me from this!”

With a sudden jerk, Mortillian Pikachu slammed his tail into Regigigas’ wrist, shocking him enough to loosen his grip. Pikachu darted forward, ramming into both Bisharp and Lilligant, tumbling them all into the machine together.

Enefftian Lilligant (startled gasp): “Wha, Pikachu?!”

Enefftian Bisharp (snapping): “Hey! This isn’t a group package!”

-

[Scene: Erosbloom-89, The Forever Embrace]
In a burst of blooming light, the three reappeared on the soft, vibrant fields of Erosbloom-89. Enefftian Bisharp still cradled Lilligant, but something had changed, their forms had subtly melded into eternal harmony, a forever knight and his forever peasant girl. Lilligant’s soft petals continuously melted and regenerated in his arms, creating an endless cycle of sweet, bittersweet warmth.

Enefftian Lilligant (smiling, teary): “It’s… forever warm. I could melt like this for all eternity…”

Enefftian Bisharp (gently tightening his hold): “And I’ll always carry you. Even as your petals fade and return.”

But nearby, Mortillian Pikachu was trapped. He banged on the invisible walls of a shimmering Death Loop Cosmic Bubble, glitching violently as if the system itself rejected his presence.

Mortillian Pikachu (frantic): “HEY! HEY! What is this?! Let me out!! This isn’t my story anymore!!”

Illusions surged inside the bubble. Talonflames tore him apart over and over. Machamp illusions carrying half-human, half-Gardevoir hybrids relentlessly slammed into him, crushing him flat, warping him toward an endless black hole that spun at the bubble’s center.

Mortillian Pikachu (screaming): “STOP! WHY IS IT ALWAYS ME?!”

-

[Scene: The Reflector Broadcast]
Back in NFT777-Enefftia, Regigigas activated his reflector and telecom’d Alolan Ninetales in Evoir.

Regigigas (amused): “Ninetales, you’re gonna wanna see this. Forward it to the whole gang.”

Alolan Ninetales peered at the stream on her laptop, lips curling into a smirk.

Alolan Ninetales (deadpan, but secretly enjoying it): “Wow. That Pikachu… is literally nothing but a punching bag now.”

[Chat] KeldeoCries: “THE COMEBACK ARC WAS A LIE.”

[Chat] GardevoirGalaxy: “LOOPED. FOREVER LOOPED.”

[Chat] LilEveFan420: “Even the Talonflames hate him now LMAO.”

Meanwhile, back on NFT777-Enefftia, Enefftian Kingambit, Samurott, and Liepard gathered around the broadcast.

Enefftian Samurott (stunned): “Uh… is that supposed to happen?”

Enefftian Liepard Nurse (nodding slowly): “Seems… kinda fitting, honestly.”

Enefftian Kingambit (shrugging): “The universe has a strange sense of humor.”

Regigigas simply chuckled, his cosmic studio brighter than ever.

-----------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------

Ch 96 : The Unholy Starter List

[Scene: Alolan Ninetales’ Grumbling Monologue]
Location: Gardevoir’s private library, Evoir

Alolan Ninetales is furiously scribbling on a holographic tablet.

Alolan Ninetales (grumbling): "Tch... twenty-seven starters. All of them finally appeared... and yet..."
She glances at her list, ears twitching in annoyance.
"Only four females. Four out of twenty-seven. Still clinging to those cursed official ratios, huh? You'd think, after four billion years of storytelling, they'd fix that imbalance."

She snaps the stylus with a flick of her claw, huffing as she scrolls through her own compiled "Unholy List".

-

[Scene: Reading the List Aloud (Breakdown of Each Gen)]
Alolan Ninetales paces while muttering, breaking the fourth wall heavily.

Alolan Ninetales: "Let’s see how fate handled these so-called starters..."

-

[Fate of Starter Pokémon and Their Introductions]
=Generation 1 Starters=
- Venusaur
Origin: Poketopian
Gender: Male
Occupation: Businessman of Ecology back in original Poketopia.

- Blastoise
Origin: Poketopian
Gender: Male
Occupation: Firefighter back in original Poketopia.
Introduction: Appears in the 8 Eevees beach scene, where he knocks teenager Flareon into the water, prompting Vaporeon to save Flareon in a bridal carry for the 69th time.

- Charizard
Origin: Poketopian
Gender: Male
Occupation: Master Chef of BlazeGrill Restaurant in original Poketopia.
Notable Role: Former strict boss of the original Pikachu. His harsh salary cut pushed Pikachu to attempt suicide, leading to Pikachu’s rescue by Suicune and eventual adoption into Vaporeon's family.

=Generation 2 Starters=
- Meganium
Origin: Enefftian
Gender: Female
Typing: Grass/Ground (alternate form)
Occupation: Gacha Quaker in NFT777-Enefftia (pre-billion-years-timeskip), who terrorized Heavenly Verdant and endangered Verdantvee.
Significance: Indirect catalyst for Dragonvee’s and Verdantvee’s bridal carry locked immortality.

- Feraligatr
Origin: Vortexian
Gender: Male
Typing: Water/Dark (alternate form)
Occupation: Unknown, frequent butchery customer in Vortex-888 (pre-billion-years-timeskip); brother of Vortexian Krookodile.

- Typhlosion
Origin: Poketopian
Gender: Male
Occupation: Headmaster of the school attended by Flareon, Vaporeon, Lil Eve, and Keldeo in original Poketopia.
Notable Event: Temporarily killed by Espeonbot in Saga 3, an event that deeply shocked Flareon.

=Generation 3 Starters=
- Sceptile
Origin: Poketopian
Gender: Male
Occupation: Meditation pupil and later meditation master under Urshifu’s guidance in original Poketopia.

- Swampert
Origin: Poketopian
Gender: Male
Occupation: Security guard at Umbreon’s Hospital in original Poketopia.

- Blaziken
Origin: Poketopian
Gender: Male
Occupation: Policeman and Gardevoir’s fellow law enforcer in original Poketopia.

=Generation 4 Starters=
- Torterra
Origin: Divian
Gender: Male
Typing: Grass/Steel (alternate form)
Occupation: Immigration officer in Div-9K (pre-billion-years-timeskip).

- Empoleon
Origin: Divian
Gender: Male
Typing: Water/Poison (alternate form)
Occupation: Likely a gardener and adoptive father of typed human Dawtiny in Div-9K (pre-billion-years-timeskip).

- Infernape
Origin: Enefftian
Gender: Male
Typing: Electric/Fighting (alternate form, changed from Fire to Electric)
Occupation: NFT crypto scammer exiled from NFT777-Enefftia; later invaded Evoir (pre-billion-years-timeskip).
On-Screen Death: Killed by Evoir’s security guard Galaxian Golurk.

=Generation 5 Starters=
- Serperior
Origin: Cosmician (Evoirian)
Gender: Male
Typing: Grass/Electric (alternate form)
Occupation: Quiet developer of EveX Kelzeo in Evoir (pre-billion-years-timeskip).
Notable Event: Attempted to sexually harass Vaporeon. Lil Eve and Keldeo forcefully knocked him into his senses. He was the last one to spit the cursed copypasta line.

- Samurott
Origin: Neo-Enefftian
Gender: Male
Typing: Water/Steel (alternate form)
Occupation: Protestor in NFT777-Enefftia (post-billion-years-timeskip).
Notable Fact: The final starter introduced in the entire story (and still alive).

- Emboar
Origin: Enefftian
Gender: Male
Typing: Fire/Dark (alternate form)
Occupation: Sales pitch guru exiled from NFT777-Enefftia; later invaded Evoir (pre-billion-years-timeskip).
On-Screen Death: Killed by Evoir’s security guard Galaxian Golurk.

=Generation 6 Starters=
- Chesnaught
Origin: Poketopian
Gender: Male
Occupation: Security guard at Espeon’s Library in original Poketopia.

- Greninja
Origin: Poketopian
Gender: Male
Occupation: Bounty hunter in original Poketopia; boyfriend/husband of Delphox.
Notable Role: Iconic waterboy and close ally of Vaporeon and Flareon throughout Sagas 2 to 4.

- Delphox
Origin: Poketopian
Gender: Female
Occupation: Seer who greatly assisted the heroic cast in original Poketopia; girlfriend/wife of Greninja.
Notable Role: Iconic firegirl and close ally of Vaporeon and Flareon throughout Sagas 2 to 4.

=Generation 7 Starters=
- Decidueye
Origin: Poketopian
Gender: Male
Occupation: Archery sports stadium owner in original Poketopia.
On-Screen Death: Killed by Darkrai in Saga 2 due to recklessness; Ho-Oh could not revive him.
Notable Fact: First starter mentioned in the entire story, during Darkrai’s arrest trial in Saga 1. His death set the dark tone for Saga 2.

- Primarina
Origin: Poketopian
Gender: Female
Occupation: Likely a lifeguard in original Poketopia.
Notable Event: In Poketopia Saga 3, she was the first victim of the bot war incident but was knocked out by Trevbot, not killed.
Posthumous Fame: Ironically gained more roles in the film The Vapor Mermaid 2 which was released in Evoir.

- Incineroar
Origin: Poketopian
Gender: Male
Occupation: Employee of Tyranitar in original Poketopia; boyfriend/husband of Meowscarada.
Notable Fact: First starter to physically appear in the entire story.

=Generation 8 Starters=
- Rillaboom
Origin: Enefftian
Gender: Male
Typing: Grass/Steel (alternate form)
Occupation: General and leader of NFT777-Enefftia (pre-billion-years-timeskip); known scammer; had a human wife named Junipa.
Notable Fact: Morally grey-zone character; waged war against Diamond-666 over Poké Ball enslavement until Junipa replaced Oaker as leader.

- Inteleon
Origin: Poketopian
Gender: Male
Occupation: Bartender and pub owner in original Poketopia.
Notable Fact: Meowscarada and Incineroar were among his favorite regular customers.

- Cinderace
Origin: Poketopian
Gender: Male
Occupation: Soccer coach in original Poketopia; had a Lopunny girlfriend.
On-Screen Death: Killed by Darkrai in Saga 2 due to recklessness; Ho-Oh could not revive him.

=Generation 9 Starters=
- Meowscarada
Origin: Poketopian
Gender: Female
Occupation: Employee of Tyranitar in original Poketopia; girlfriend/wife of Incineroar.
Notable Fact: Second starter to physically appear in the entire story.

- Quaquaval
Origin: Cosmician (Evoirian)
Gender: Male
Typing: Water/Dark (alternate form)
Occupation: Unknown; known to be one of Cosmician Sandslash’s subscribers in Evoir (pre-billion-years-timeskip).
Notable Fact: Shortest screen time of all starters; only appears during Pizzero’s visit in Evoir.

- Skeledirge
Origin: Neo-Vortexian
Gender: Male
Typing: Fire/Dark (alternate form)
Occupation: Spaceport owner and Pikachu-eater carnivore in Vortex-888 (post-billion-years-timeskip).
Notable Fact: Penultimate starter introduced in the entire story (and still alive).

-

[Scene: Rant Continues]
Alolan Ninetales: "Only four on-screen female starters out of twenty-seven. Official ratios? Still 87.5% male bias. Disgusting. They’re ‘rare’ as if female Pokémon are legendary or something. At least here, none of them got free pass immortality or cheap plot armor. They suffered. They lived. They died. They mattered."

She slams the tablet on the table, her fur puffed out in irritation.

-

[Scene: Gardevoir, Vaporeon, and Flareon React]
Gardevoir, sipping tea calmly, reads the list with a faint smile.
Gardevoir: "It’s... refreshingly fair, isn’t it? No forced favoritism. No off-screen ‘blessings.’ Just earned stories."

Vaporeon leans over the table, tail flicking.
Vaporeon: "And Cinderace and Decidueye… I still feel that. They went out recklessly, but it was real. No Ho-Oh reset. Yet it gives weight to the world."

Flareon folds his arms, nodding.
Flareon: "Tyranitar karma'd Darkrai, so it's not like the universe didn’t balance itself. Still... funny how Infernape and Emboar’s deaths felt like punchlines, though."
He smirks. "Serves the scammers right."

-

[Scene: Closing Reflection]
Alolan Ninetales sighs, finally relaxing.
Alolan Ninetales: "Yeah... no immortals among them. No Pikachu-tier favoritism. Starters? Just part of the crowd now. And that's how it should be."

Gardevoir gently closes the tablet.
Gardevoir: "Maybe someday... the official media will catch up to that."

The three of them share a knowing glance, as the distant stars of Evoir shimmer quietly.

-

[Summary of Key Points in Clean List:]
All 27 starters introduced across the story and spin-offs.

Only 4 females out of 27.

None of the starters became immortal.

4 starters died on screen:

- Cinderace and Decidueye: Heavy emotional deaths.

- Infernape and Emboar: Comedic deaths, karma for scammers.

All Poketopian starters only appeared in Saga 1-4 (original timeline).

Spin-off starters mostly gone for 2 billion years, only 2 still alive now.

Samurott and Skeledirge were the latest introduced starters.

Story deliberately avoids official Pikachu-style favoritism and gender imbalance, calling it out directly.

-----------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------

Chapter 97 : Timeless Bonds, Distant Punishments

[Scene: Erosbloom-89, near a tranquil crystalline lake.]

Two humans, Aqualice and Burnabon, wander the ever-blooming meadows of Erosbloom-89, unchanged for two billion years. 
Aqualice the maid, her water jet wings softly humming, still bridal-carries Burnabon the butler as if no time has passed. Their joy remains untouched by the ages.

(Aqualice = human woman with straight blue hair, glasses, and a functional maid dress equipped with water jet wings, forever bridal carrying her boyfriend Burnabon)
(Burnabon = human man with short red hair in a tidy butler uniform, uses his fire-summoning gloves to cook and clean, forever being bridal carried by his girlfriend Aqualice)

Aqualice: “It’s still funny, you know. Two billion years, and I’m still carrying you everywhere.”

Burnabon: “Of course you are. Who else is going to cook you those sky-fire parfaits while dangling in your arms?”

They both laugh, genuine, unbothered by the weight of eternity.

But Aqualice’s smile pauses. A faint, distant voice echoes in her mind. It’s strange. A cry, a plea from something trapped.

Aqualice: “…Did you hear that?”

Burnabon: “Hear what?”

Aqualice: “A voice. Faint… something trapped. Someone suffering.”

Burnabon: (raising an eyebrow) “Out here? There’s no one else for miles. And if it’s what I think it is… those punishment bubbles, they don’t link to the outside.”

Aqualice: “Exactly. They shouldn’t. But I heard it. I’m sure I did.”

She briefly glances toward the direction of the voice, a faint, barely visible ripple in space: the Mortillian Pikachu’s punishment bubble. But inside, that Pikachu is utterly blind and deaf to the outside. Aqualice knows she can’t communicate with him.

Burnabon: “Creepy. I don’t like this.”

Aqualice: (smiling again) “Then let’s go see something else. I’d rather not hang around ghost voices.”

With a burst of water jets, she carries Burnabon away into the air, leaving the echo behind.

-

[Scene: Evoir, near a peaceful lakeside gathering spot.]

Vaporeon gently carries Flareon in her arms once again, their bond as natural as breathing. Walking beside them, Lil Eve and Dragonvee (still bridal-carrying Verdantvee) chat softly, occasionally glancing at the lake’s reflection.

Nearby, Keldeo and Gardevoir sit in quiet thought, both visibly shaken.

Keldeo: “So that’s his fate? Trapped… forever?”

Gardevoir: (solemnly) “Mortillian Pikachu. A punishment bubble without sight, without sound. No exit. Even the most brutal deaths pale in comparison to that.”

Vaporeon: (looking at Flareon) “We’ve seen death. We’ve faced it. But this… this isn’t death. This is… isolation.”

Flareon: “I can’t even imagine. All we can do now is keep moving forward.”

Lil Eve: (softly) “Do you think he even remembers what life was like outside the bubble?”

Dragonvee: (holding Verdantvee a little closer) “Even if he did… he’ll never see it again.”

Alolan Ninetales had already explained everything. She had told them about Mortillian Pikachu’s punishment in vivid detail, leaving the group with heavy hearts.

But not everyone remains in sorrow.

Nearby, Alolan Ninetales casually plays card games with Divavee, who is forever carrying Boggyvee. With Boggyvee’s hands, Divavee flips the cards, occasionally smirking.

Divavee: “Don’t slack, Boggy. We’re playing against Ninetales here. She cheats.”

Boggyvee: (grinning) “Hey, I’m the one moving the cards. If anyone’s cheating, it’s technically me.”

Alolan Ninetales: (teasing) “Maybe I’m just that good. Or maybe the cards just love me.”

Despite the heavy truths, life goes on in Evoir, imperfect, bittersweet, but peaceful for now.

Alolan Ninetales gently places another card on the table with a soft clink of ice against the surface.

Alolan Ninetales: “Still, don’t forget, he dug his own grave.”

Her voice is calm, not bitter. The kind of reminder meant to bring quiet closure.

Alolan Ninetales: “He wasn’t trapped by chance. It was his own stupidity… his own unwise path. He killed a Vortexian Magikarp. A minor. A child. He crossed the line on his own.”

Divavee: (lightly moving Boggyvee’s hand to play their next card) “A child killer…”

Boggyvee: (softly) “There’s no redemption from that.”

Vaporeon: (nodding in somber acceptance) “Not just a reckless fool. Not just blind… but someone who chose to harm the innocent.”

Flareon: (quietly, as it settles in) “…So he truly earned that fate.”

Keldeo: (reflective) “I don’t know him. None of us did. He never crossed our story… but he crossed Regigigas’.”

Gardevoir: “And that’s the only reason we ever heard of him. Because Regigigas put a stop to him.”

Dragonvee: (holding Verdantvee close) “In the end… Regigigas had to deliver that punishment.”

Verdantvee: (softly agreeing) “And Regigigas believed it was the only fitting end.”

The weight in the air begins to lift, not from dismissal, but from clarity. They realize this wasn’t a tragic fall of a friend. It wasn’t one of their own. It was someone who spiraled far away from where they all stood, someone beyond their reach.

Alolan Ninetales: (quietly closing the game with a soft smile) “He chose his own ending. And that ending was earned.”

A calm, unspoken understanding settles. They no longer carry guilt for this stranger’s fall.
They don’t need to.
Life, as it always does, carries on.

-----------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------

Ch 98 : The Lurantis Brides

[Scene: Inside the Chronoscene Reflector Room, Evoir]
The Chronoscene Reflector hummed softly in the room, projecting visions of the distant past like a live memory reel.
Vaporeon cradled Flareon in her arms as she often did, her gentle movements a rhythm they had long known.
Beside them, Dragonvee stood tall, forever carrying Verdantvee with elegant ease.
Near them, Divavee continued her own bridal carry of Boggyvee, both watching the swirling visions on the Reflector.

“Mommy, is this really the past?” Dragonvee asked, glancing at Vaporeon while adjusting her hold on Verdantvee.

“It is, my sweet Dragonvee...” Vaporeon smiled, stroking Flareon’s ear. “That was a billion years ago. Watch closely.”

“Daddy, look!” Verdantvee nudged Boggyvee gently. “It’s starting!”

-

[Scene: Vortexian Lurantis Couple, 1 Billion Years Ago]
The scene on the reflector solidified into the depths of Vortex-888’s hidden cave, untouched by predators.
A female Vortexian Lurantis, radiant in a delicate wedding dress, bridal carried her husband, a male Vortexian Lurantis in a sharp tuxedo.
Both shared the unique Grass/Ice typing native to their variant species.

Her arms tightened around him lovingly as they entered the cave.
“Finally, we’re safe...” he said, brushing her leafy arm with a gentle smile. “Just the two of us.”

But her stomach growled.
It echoed in the silence.
The husband blinked. “…Is this part of the honeymoon?”

She giggled softly, but soon, her vines swiftly tied him up as she continued to cradle him.
“T-this is some roleplay, huh?” he chuckled nervously, his smile flickering. “You always surprise me...”

His words stopped as she leaned down and ate his head in one bite.
His body went limp in her arms.
A drop of sap-like fluid trickled down her petal.
“…You taste like wedding cake.” she whispered, her voice soft, bittersweet, but unapologetic.

The vision froze there.

-

[Scene: Back in Evoir, Chronoscene Room]
The room fell silent for a moment, the weight of the scene hanging in the air.

Then, Vaporeon smirked, glancing at Flareon in her arms.
“Maybe I’ll eat your head too.” she teased, her voice light and playful.

Flareon grinned back without missing a beat.
“Try it.”

She laughed. “Just joking, just joking.” She leaned down to nuzzle him.
Their foreheads touched as they shared a small, genuine kiss.

Dragonvee giggled, her long violet-silver maid hair flowing as she shifted Verdantvee.
Verdantvee smiled up at her, whispering, “I’m safe with you, wifey.”

Divavee and Boggyvee exchanged glances, both amused yet oddly understanding of the bizarre tale.

“Vortexian culture’s always been… extreme...” Boggyvee mused.

Divavee chuckled softly. “Extreme is one word for it.”

-

[Scene: The Reflector Shows a New Lurantis Couple]
The Chronoscene Reflector flickered and shifted, pulling everyone’s gaze to a more recent era in Heavenly Verdant.

A female Verdinian Lurantis in a gorgeous wedding dress was bridal carrying her husband, a male Verdinian Lurantis in a smart tuxedo.
Unlike the Vortexian Lurantis, these two were Grass/Bug types, the traditional, non-icy lineage, with the female notably sporting larger, stronger arms.

She carried him effortlessly, her leafy arms tender yet firm.
“You don’t have to worry, my love...” she cooed. “There’s plenty of food here in Heavenly Verdant. No need to eat your head.”

The male Lurantis chuckled nervously, still a little stiff in her arms.
“Well… that’s a relief. Vortexian stories kinda haunted me.”
“But…” he looked up into her eyes, “…I think I’m starting to like being carried like this.”

She kissed his forehead. “Good. Get used to it.”

-

[Scene: The Football Cosplay Incident]
Days passed. The couple grew even closer, happily exploring their shared hobbies.
One afternoon, they decided to cosplay football game characters for a local event.

The female Lurantis wore a cheerleader dress, pom-poms tucked under her arm, while her husband sported a quarterback uniform.
They laughed, posed for photos, and even caught the attention of passing tourists, some from Enefftia.

But in the commotion, a group of overexcited tourists mistook the husband for an actual football player and hurled balls directly at him.

He yelped as a ball smashed into his side, sending him stumbling.
His wife’s cheerleader pom-poms dropped instantly as she swooped in, bridal carrying him on the spot.

“Idiots!” she snapped, shielding him with her broad leafy arms.
“You okay, love?”

He winced but smiled. “I think I am now.”

Some rowdy Enefftian tourists catcalled her, not even fazed by the situation.
“Hey, cheerleader! Carry me next, babe!”

Her eyes narrowed.
Without a word, she boosted away into a hidden alley, still carrying her husband.

There, they stumbled upon Bloominian Meloetta, calmly sitting by the hourglass machine.

“You’ve had enough of the tourists, haven’t you?” Meloetta said softly, almost knowingly.

The Lurantis couple nodded. The wife glanced at her husband and then at the machine.
Without hesitation, she stepped forward.

“I want to carry him forever.” she whispered.

“You will.” Meloetta promised.
They embraced. They kissed. And as they entered the hourglass machine, they were forever immortalized in their cheerleader carrying quarterback pose.

-

[Scene: Back in Evoir]
The vision faded, returning everyone to the present in the Chronoscene Reflector room.

Vaporeon cradled Flareon.
Dragonvee carried Verdantvee close.
Divavee held Boggyvee with a serene smile.

Verdantvee looked up at Dragonvee, his eyes shining.
“Wifey… I’m really lucky, huh?”

Dragonvee grinned, her tail swaying proudly.
“You’ll be stuck in my arms forever. That’s your blessing.”

Vaporeon laughed softly. “Seems like it runs in the family.”

Flareon smirked. “I don’t mind being carried for eternity.”

Divavee gazed warmly at Boggyvee. “Neither do we, right?”

Boggyvee chuckled. “As long as I’m with you, wifey.”

Without needing to say anything else, the couples leaned in and kissed each other in perfect unison, still mid-carry.
Their bonds, their love, their eternity, intertwined across generations, across planets.

-

[Closing Scene: Erosbloom-89, Present Day]

Back in present-day Erosbloom-89, the immortalized Verdinian Lurantis cheerleader gently adjusted her forever bridal carry on her Verdinian Lurantis quarterback husband, teasing him with a playful glint in her eyes.

“You know...” she murmured, her voice soft but mischievous, “...your head still smells really tasty after all this time.”

He raised a brow in amusement, feeling the warmth of her arms supporting him as always. “It’s been a whole month already, huh?” Without missing a beat, he swiftly reached behind his neck, pulling the helmet that had been lazily dangling by its rope, and snugly placed it over his head. “Guess I’d better keep this on, just in case you get hungry.”

She laughed, her giggles light and sweet, and without any malice she leaned in and kissed the top of his helmet, lingering just enough to "taste" him through the thin layer of protective gear.

“Tch, still sweet...” she whispered, the moment soft, playful, and eternal.

Their laughter echoed gently in the flower-filled streets of Erosbloom-89, their forever embrace unbroken.

-----------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------

Ch 99: Repdigits Factorial Recursive Math Class

[Scene: Pre-Class of the "Perfect Math Class"]

Alolan Ninetales, strolling gracefully through the sun-drenched streets of Evoir in her eternal sundress, paused mid-step as a gentle breeze fluttered the hem of her dress. Her tails flicked with delight as she glanced at the date.

“Oh~ Chapter 99,” she purred to herself, eyes sparkling. “One of my favorite numbers. Nine, ninety-nine, eleven, sixty-nine, eighty-one… so many beautiful numbers. Today feels lucky.”

Her Poképhone buzzed softly in her bag. She fished it out, tilting her head curiously as she read the message from an Evoirian high school:
“Our main math teacher is sick today. Can you substitute? We need someone reliable and strong.”

She giggled, her eyes glimmering with mischief. “Strong? Oh, they have no idea how strong I am.” She texted back:
“Alolan Ninetales – the strongest math teacher – is on her way.”

With a confident spin of her tails, she trotted toward the school, already humming her favorite math-themed tune.

-

[Scene: Old Dragonlet's "Perfect Math Class" Fandom BGM]

Meanwhile, Dragonvee, clad forever in her signature maid uniform, gracefully floated through the halls of their home while cradling Verdantvee, her ever-chill butler husband, in her arms. His pale green butler uniform remained pristine despite their constant close embrace.

“Verdy~” she chimed sweetly. “Can you open a Pokespotify station for us? I feel like listening to something nostalgic.”

Verdantvee, relaxed in her arms, nodded and tapped his holo-bracelet, quickly launching the Pokespotify app.

“Starting station now… ‘KyukonMiru’ opening track, coming up.” he announced.

As the gentle beats of KyukonMiru began to play, Dragonvee’s tails fluttered happily. “Ah, just like old times in the Dragonlet danmaku game fandom…”

But suddenly, the playlist glitched and switched tracks. A new, upbeat melody blasted through the room:
“Alolan Ninetales’ Perfect Math Class”, a track Dragonvee instantly recognized.

Alolan Ninetales’ familiar humming overlapped the tune, as if echoing from the past.
“Huh… this song…” Dragonvee smirked and lightly tightened her hold on Verdantvee. “Looks like Ninetales is up to her old math class shenanigans again.”

Verdantvee chuckled, comfortably nestled in her arms. “Sounds like she’s about to make someone’s brain explode with numbers.”

“Let’s tune in.” Dragonvee grinned, her violet-silver eyes gleaming. “I want to see her ‘perfect’ math class in action.”

-

[Scene: Math Class - "Repdigit Mayhem"]

The high school classroom buzzed with youthful energy. Students from all over, Evoirians, Divian typed humans, Divian Pokémon from Div-9K, Verdinians from Heavenly Verdant, and even a few Erosbloomians, filled the room. Laughter, idle chatting, and soft Pokémon noises created a comforting background hum.

Alolan Ninetales entered with confident, graceful steps, her sundress flowing like she belonged more on a beach than in a classroom. She turned to the electro chalkboard and elegantly wrote in wide strokes:
“Fun With Repdigits!”

The students perked up, some curious, some already giggling because they recognized Ninetales’ reputation for turning math into comedy shows.

“Today...” Alolan Ninetales began, tails flicking playfully, “we celebrate my favorite number: 99. It’s a repdigit! Can anyone tell me what that means?”

A Verdinian Pikachu hybrid raised his hand, but before he could answer, Ninetales spun around dramatically.
“It’s a number made by repeating the same digit! Like 99, 111, 222… They’re delightful! And guess what? Ninety-nine is 3 × 3 × 11.”

She pointed at the numbers with a flourish.
“Ah, three times three, which is 9! My absolute favorite number~” she cooed, basking in the moment.

The students giggled, amused by her passion.

“But wait...” she continued, eyes gleaming. “The 11 here is special. It’s one of the rare prime repdigits. The next ones?” She scribbled quickly on the holo board.
1111111111111111111
11111111111111111111111

“Yeah, the next prime repdigits are these monsters.” She tapped them with the electric chalk. “Nineteen ones… twenty-three ones… and we don’t know that many more!”

The room erupted in laughter.

A female Evoirian Kirlia, sitting near the window, wiped a tear from her eye. “Nineteen ones? Twenty-three? That’s… that’s unholy! What kind of number is that?” She playfully shook her head. “This is so much better than the usual math class! No offense to Miss Evoirian Spectrier, she’s great but a bit too serious sometimes.”

A human teenage girl with ice-typed traits raised her hand, a bit anxious. “Um… is this going to be on the exam…?”

Alolan Ninetales paused, chuckling awkwardly as she rested the chalk on her shoulder.
“Hehe… well, not exactly. This is, you know, one of those math jokes you can bring up to impress people… or just to break the tension in a room.” She winked. “The exam won’t ask you to write nineteen ones, don’t worry.”

The class laughed even harder.

“Seriously though...” Ninetales added with a soft smile, “math can be fun. Sometimes it’s not about the formulas. It’s about finding the little things that make you go ‘Whoa, that’s cool.’”

The room settled, the students clearly enjoying her playful teaching style.

-

[Scene: Math Class - "Recursion Playground"]

The futuristic electronic board shimmered as Alolan Ninetales spun her digital chalk with playful mastery. The "chalk" glowed in her grip, flickering as she tapped on the responsive surface.

"Alright, class..." she announced, tails swishing excitedly, "today’s actual serious topic, recursion."

She clapped her hands, and a projection unfolded behind her: two perfectly aligned mirrors facing each other.
"You see, recursion is like… this." She adjusted the mirrors, angling them so that the reflections spiraled endlessly into each other.

The students watched, wide-eyed, as the digital board's screen began projecting the live feed of the camera, which was now recording the screen itself.
Another recursion loop.

"See? Infinite loop. It’s beautiful, right?" Ninetales twirled the chalk like a baton.

The Evoirian Kirlia student, smirking with determination, opened her sleek laptop and booted up PokePaint. She quickly snapped a screenshot of the recursion on the screen, then took a screenshot of that screenshot, again and again.

"PokePaint recursion confirmed..." she chimed, showing her spiraling image layers to her desk neighbor.

Ninetales beamed. "Impressive! You're catching on fast. You’d make a fine danmaku programmer, just like my old friends."

She turned back to the board, writing:
9! = 9 × 8 × 7 × 6 × 5 × 4 × 3 × 2 × 1

"Now..." she challenged, "tell me, how do we solve 9 factorial without a calculator? I want a programmer’s answer!"

Kirlia's eyes sparkled. "Using recursion!"
Her fingers danced on the keys, writing a recursive function that called itself until it hit the base case. She executed it, and the answer instantly appeared on the big screen.

"362,880"

The class cheered.

A male Divian Machoke leaned over. "Hey, that’s some real genius right there. Mind if we, uh, hang out sometime? Math chat?"

A male teenage Verdinian Riolu winked from across the aisle. "Yeah, I think I just found my favorite math partner."

Kirlia just laughed, “Solve your own factorials first.”

Encouraged, the other students excitedly typed up their own recursive codes, some using different languages like PokéScript and VerdantLang.

"Careful with memory overload though." Ninetales warned, tails waving in caution. "Recursion is powerful, but reckless coding can..."

Suddenly, a loud beep and a screen freeze blared from the Verdinian Pikachu hybrid’s desk.
His laptop glitched into a stack overflow error.
“Oops.”

Ninetales sighed and facepalmed. "Why are Pikachukind always like this… reckless even in recursion."

The class erupted in laughter once more, thoroughly enjoying this chaotic, hands-on math session.

-

[Scene: After Math Class - "Recursion is Everywhere"]

As the school bell rang, the students packed up, still buzzing about recursion and factorials.
The Evoirian Kirlia lingered by Alolan Ninetales' desk, curious.

Alolan Ninetales, humming to herself, scrolled casually through her multi-panel screen display, her tails flicking side to side in satisfaction.
"Ah… let’s see who else is playing with recursion today."

===
The first panel showed Regigigas, the legendary giant sitting on a beach in Div-9K, wearing a comically oversized vacation hat.
He was deeply focused on a recursive snapshot loop game, stacking images within images as his controller hands moved in slow but steady rhythm.
===

Alolan Ninetales smirked, "Even big guys like him can’t resist the recursion game."

Evoirian Kirlia giggled. "He’s actually kinda cute like that."

Another swipe, another screen.

===
Now showing Gardevoir, the immortal policewoman in her signature pencil skirt, enjoying her Heavenly Verdant vacation with Vaporeon (still in her eternal maid uniform, bridal carrying her butler husband Flareon as always).

The trio stumbled upon a futuristic genie lamp tucked among the tourist stalls.
Vaporeon poked it. The lamp suddenly started summoning endless copies of itself.

"Oh boy…" Gardevoir muttered on the feed, pulling out a baton.
Flareon blinked, “…We might need to backtrack this.”
Vaporeon calmly spun her maid tray. "It’s reversible. I got this."
===

The feed cut back to Ninetales, who chuckled. "Futuristic recursion, huh? Even their vacation gets chaotic."

The next panel popped up.

===
Divavee, forever in her glowing teal wedding dress, was mid-performance at her live concert. She twirled with perfect grace, all while carrying her husband Boggyvee, still locked in his tuxedo bridal-carry as always.

Suddenly, the stage camera accidentally zoomed into one of the giant recording screens, causing a delightful recursive background loop right behind her.

The audience laughed and clapped harder, loving the comedic glitch. Divavee just winked and kept singing, leaning into the joke.
===

Alolan Ninetales leaned back, satisfied. "Looks like recursion is just a natural part of our world now."

The Evoirian Kirlia smiled. "Yeah… and it’s actually kinda beautiful."

Alolan Ninetales closed the panels, picking up her bag. "Well then, until next class, where we might just accidentally start infinite loops again."

Kirlia laughed as she waved goodbye.
"Looking forward to it!"

-----------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------

Ch 100 : The Final Chronicle

[Scene: Chronoscene Reflector Room, Present Day, Evoir]

Alolan Ninetales sat alone, calmly scrolling through timelines on the shimmering Chronoscene Reflector. Her sundress fluttered gently under the cool indoor breeze, her nine tails curling as she watched her origin world, Pokeplanet, now entering a Neo-Ice Age.

The planet’s sun had begun cooling, blanketing regions in relentless snow.
Grass and Dragon Pokémon populations struggled. Ice Pokémon, however, flourished like never before.

Alolan Ninetales smirked.
Alolan Ninetales: "Tch. I could’ve been the strongest over there now. Could’ve shown them. But eh, whatever."

Her distant home, the Alolan Islands, flickered on the screen, reminding her of her long-lost youth.

Curious, she tapped into a flashback from 4.1 billion years ago.

-

[Flashback: Pokeplanet, 4.1 Billion Years Ago, Alolan Islands]
A modest seaside school, chalkboards and wooden desks, like a 1960s classroom.
Among the students, a young Alolan Vulpix, clumsy, awkward, and notorious for making weird math puns that no one seemed to appreciate.

Her classmates frequently picked on her, calling her "Nine-Times Failure" and mocking her obsession with palindromic numbers and repdigits.

But one Pokémon never laughed at her... 
A young Swinub. A Johto local who moved into Alolan Islands a while ago in the time.

He always sat in front of her, patiently solving math problems, shielding her from bullies with quiet confidence.

Young Swinub: "Let them talk. But numbers? Numbers don’t lie. They never leave you behind."

Years passed. The Swinub evolved into Piloswine, then into a strong Mamoswine.
The clumsy Vulpix evolved into the graceful Alolan Ninetales.

Eventually, they married and moved to Poketopia, where their story intertwined with the great events to come.

-

[Scene: Back to Present, Chronoscene Reflector Room]

As the flashback faded, Gardevoir entered the room, dressed forever in her sleek policewoman uniform and pencil skirt.

Gardevoir: "Looking back, huh? About time. You’ve kept that story quiet for billions of years."

Alolan Ninetales (grinning): "You too. You never shared your own beginnings properly either. Come on. Let’s scroll back further."

-

[Flashback: Pokeplanet, 4.1 Billion Years Ago, Hoenn Region]
On a warm island shore, a young Ralts and her childhood friend, a male Torchic, trained together.

Young Ralts: "One day we’ll be police officers, you and me! We’ll bring back the honor the old media stole from them!"

Young Torchic: "Yeah! The good ones! The ones who protect!"

They were inseparable.
Torchic, always asexual, was content with deep friendship, and together they dreamed big.

They evolved side by side, into Kirlia and Combusken, and left home to enroll in Unova’s prestigious police academy.

-

[Flashback: Pokeplanet, 4.1 Billion Years Ago, Unova Region]

There, they met other young cadets:

- A bold Riolu (who would become Lucario, Gardevoir’s future husband).

- A scrappy Machoke (future Machamp).

- A clever Metang (future Metagross) who came from Hoenn as well, but they never met him before back then.

- Their law school friend, a Tinkatink, often joined their study sessions, dreaming of justice from the judge’s seat.

The years rolled on.
Kirlia became Gardevoir, Combusken became Blaziken, Riolu became Lucario, Machoke became Machamp, Metang became Metagross, and Tinkatink grew into Tinkaton, the soon-to-be Judge of Poketopia.

Eventually, Tinkaton invited them all to settle in Poketopia, where their legends began.

Somewhere between Flareon’s and Vaporeon’s birth, but before those two became teenagers, Gardevoir and Lucario quietly married.

-

[Scene: Back to Present, Reflector Room]

Alolan Ninetales (softly): "Took us this long to reveal the beginning of our stories, huh? Guess we were late to our own timeline."

Gardevoir (chuckling): "Better late than never."

-

[Scene: Blade and Bubble]

The shimmering surface of the Chronoscene Reflector ripples again as Alolan Ninetales taps its edge, shifting the view back to the present day.

This time, the scene crystallizes over the western side of the continent.

High above the ground, nearly brushing the edge of the stratosphere, the Mortillian Pikachu Death Loop Cosmic Bubble floats, a haunting orb of endless repetition, shimmering with faint crimson and violet glows.

On a nearby floating terrace, the immortal knight Eneffitan Bisharp stands tall, forever carrying the immortal peasant-dressed Enefftian Lilligant in his arms. Despite their contrasting garb, armor and frills, they share a lighthearted conversation with their visitor: Regigigas, still enjoying his freedom from past death loops.

Bisharp: "So, the punishment holds? Mortillian Pikachu is still... looping?"

Regigigas, softly: "Worse than mine ever was. But... I guess that's what happens when you scam fate itself."

Lilligant, playfully: "Such a harsh fate for such a small spark. But, well, the cosmos has a way of balancing jokes and debts."

Regigigas: "Yeah... sometimes with a punchline that takes eons to land."

They all glance up at the shimmering bubble, which pulses like a stubborn reminder. Even in this strange peace, some stories never get to end.

-

[Scene: Lurantis and Laughter]
The reflector shifts to the opposite side of the continent, where sunlight bathes the high-tech gardens and gravity-stabilized walkways.

There, the immortal cheerleader Verdinian Lurantis carries her boyfriend, the immortal quarterback Verdinian Lurantis, bridal-style as if their eternal football season never ended.

Nearby, the human couple Aqualice the maid carries Burnabon the butler in a mirroring embrace.

The four lounge by a glimmering pond, sharing stories, old, new, and some purposefully left out of the reflector’s reach.

Burnabon: "You know, I still think she’s just showing off. Carrying me this long? Probably a personal record."

Aqualice, grinning: "You think you’re that heavy? I’ve lifted heavier trays."

Quarterback Lurantis: "Oi, oi! Don’t forget, I’ve been in her arms since the Verdant Bowl finals. Best win of my life."

Cheerleader Lurantis: "Best catch, you mean!"

The girls’ skirts flutter in the soft artificial breeze, their faces flushing in unison as they laugh together, the kind of laughter that drifts across timelines.

-

[Scene: The Curtain Talk]
Back in the Chronoscene Reflector room, Alolan Ninetales lingers for a moment longer.

Alolan Ninetales: "Four-point-one billion years... and the story’s ending cute like this."

She sighs, almost bittersweet.

Alolan Ninetales: "But the author… the one from the mortal world… I think they're losing interest. We’ll live on, sure, but the narrative might stop one day. Maybe someone else will pick it up. Maybe that Lurantis couple… they’ve got energy."

She smiles softly at Gardevoir.

Gardevoir: "All good things come to an end… at least for mortals."

Alolan Ninetales: "Yeah… but immortality is a kind of cosmic relief for mortals like them. A playful escape, a forever that doesn’t hurt."

With that, they leave the reflector room behind, stepping out into the open park.

Under the soft pink blossoms of a giant engineered tree, the immortal gathering had already begun:

- Vaporeon (eternal maid) serves tea.

- Flareon (eternal butler, walking alongside her) carries the picnic basket.

- Lil Eve (eternal seifuku Eevee) lounges in the grass.

- Keldeo (eternal gakuran stallion) sips quietly from a ceramic cup.

- Dragonvee (eternal maid) sits proudly, forever carrying Verdantvee (eternal butler) in her arms.

- Divavee (eternal wedding dresser) hums as she forever carries her husband Boggyvee (eternal tuxedo wearer), who gently leans against her shoulder.

The picnic settles into a soft lull, with the immortals basking under the gentle pink canopy. Vaporeon tops off tea cups, Flareon unpacks more treats, and Lil Eve naps in the grass with Keldeo quietly watching over her.

Alolan Ninetales, ever the playful archivist, suddenly stands and clears her throat dramatically.

Alolan Ninetales: "Alright, everyone, it’s time. A recount. But not just any recount, a squared recount. The sacred… square roots of this story."

The group perks up, familiar with her antics, but always amused.

Alolan Ninetales: "Let’s begin. No spoilers, no over-explaining, just… the sacred squares."

She raises a paw, counting them off:

-

[The Sacred Squares of the Story:]
1² = 1.
The Beginning.
The first 2-billion-year leap… and the visit to Neo-Earth before time fractured even further.

2² = 4.
Inside the Hourai Drifter.
About 69 years of drifting…
Conversations about an unholy beacon in a sandbox game.

3² = 9.
Origins of Saga 1… and Saga 4’s tangled roots.
The sharp memory of that needle, the one that would someday…
(But no details. No assumptions.)

4² = 16.
Lil Eve guiding Keldeo.
The nine-type trials of Evoir.
It had only been 69 years since the terraforming. A sweet time.

5² = 25.
Pop culture corners.
The rise of HydroPyro Cafe.
A casual spark… that caught fire.

6² = 36.
After the great 6969-year leap.
Lil Eve and Keldeo’s equine descendants.
And Dragonvee, exploring her… versatile attractions.

7² = 49.
A prehistoric rewind.
Poketopia before names were written.
Arceus landing.
Regigigas remembering.

8² = 64.
That math joke.
Ninetales’ favorite.
Also the day Flareon was freed from Vaporeon’s water-ropes.
Thanks to better friendship… and less clingy knots.

9² = 81.
Another math joke, this time involving Divaloid rhythms and Dragonlet spirals.
When the squares start laughing, you know you’ve gone too deep.

10² = 100.
We are here.
(“Oh no, the recursion,” said Alolan Ninetales, grinning at herself.)

-

[Scene: Cute Reactions]

Gardevoir: "That is so Ninetales."

The group bursts out laughing, the kind that shakes the air but not the timeline.

Alolan Ninetales: "Come on, it’s the final chapter. Gotta leave a mark somewhere!"

She spins, tails flowing, savoring the balance of play and meaning.

Vaporeon: "You already did. In squares, no less."

Flareon: "At least this time you didn’t tie me up in seaweed ropes."

Alolan Ninetales: "No promises for future recursions."

The immortals sip their tea, nibble their snacks, and let the square-counting, story-weaving day drift into the park’s soft, endless afternoon.

-

[Scene: Finale Camera]

As the golden sunset fades into the soft blues of evening, Alolan Ninetales sets up a futuristic auto-camera on a hovering tripod.

Alolan Ninetales: "Alright, nobody move! We’re capturing this moment. Eternal picnic vibes, squared."

She jogs to position it perfectly, framing the group with the pink tree arching overhead.

The immortal family arranges themselves:

- Gardevoir sits gracefully at the center, her gown fluttering.

- Vaporeon hoists Flareon into her arms in her signature bridal carry, standing proudly beside Gardevoir.

- Dragonvee cradles Verdantvee close, positioning themselves next to Vaporeon and Flareon.

- On Gardevoir’s other side, Divavee stands, forever carrying Boggyvee in her arms, their teal and green hues softly glowing.

- Nearby, Lil Eve and Keldeo sit on the picnic blanket, hugging like any sweet, normal couple, legs tangled comfortably.

Alolan Ninetales: "Perfect! Timer set, 10 seconds!"

She dashes to join Lil Eve and Keldeo’s side.

But, slip!
Her paw catches on the edge of the blanket, and in perfect comedic timing, the camera captures the exact frame of her adorable mid-slip tumble.

Click!

The picture freezes: one flustered, wide-eyed Alolan Ninetales caught in the moment.

The group bursts out laughing, not a trace of mockery, just pure joy.

Flareon: "That’s the best shot possible!"

Dragonvee: "Frame it forever."

Vaporeon: "No bully would ever understand how precious this is."

Alolan Ninetales sits up, brushing dust from her fur, cheeks warm but smiling.

Alolan Ninetales: "Thanks, everyone… really."

The camera hovers down and prints the image instantly, a forever memory.

As the sky darkens, the immortals continue their picnic under the stars. They break out tarot card games, light teasing, quiet stories.

Alolan Ninetales, this time sitting back and watching them play, gently turns toward the audience.

Alolan Ninetales:
"Hey… if you’ve come this far, remember something. Live the best mortal life you can. No one’s really the absolute main character in this universe. That’s just… well, that’s for some other franchise out there, a place where comfort hides in one formula of success."

Her nine tails flick softly in the night breeze.

Alolan Ninetales:
"This? This story’s a cosmic joke. A cosmic relief. Please, never take it too seriously. Laugh with it. Play with it. Let it be your light moment, not your burden."

She stands, facing the fourth wall directly.

Alolan Ninetales: "And now… I’ll be going."

She waves, slowly, with a playful, final grin.

Alolan Ninetales: "Goodbye."

The picnic carries on behind her as the stars shimmer above.

The wind, gentle and fragrant, stirs their clothes and fur, rustling through the scene like a quiet reminder:
The story may end.
But their forever… continues.

[The End.]

-----------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------
